Yeah and it's not like he's rich or anything... oh wait.That's called an addiction, intervention necessary.Luck has been given, attempting contact.That's not complaining.. that's an experience of fact.

And I was objectively pointing out faults. The only problem was that the specialty sub was... Well a specialty sub, and thus extremely bias and unable to maturely discuss the issues.The concept of a smoking section or non smoking is something that quite literally will be amazing to people born in the 2000's.Just a little fact but the lotto actually doesn't bring in money usually compared to how much it costs to maintain and such. It isn't good for those that have it. Especially not the government.For accuracy, you'd need a proper statistical representation by asking this in a non bias and niche sub.

It is very unlikely even a significant portion own PC platforms solely to game. That's more what the console is.

Computers maintain a large amount of storage and many other purposes, especially professionally.As of now the steam machine craze has pretty much died out in all but the most niche of places. That was never a concern. More likely you'd see PC gaming die out to console simply because of corporation maneuvers, exclusivity, mobile gaming, and other such factors.I feel you'll be very tired, getting sleep honestly might be the better option.

Still, I'll recommend Star Wars Republic Commando.Honestly two isn't enough to determine single either Reddit. I'm totally addicted to the game of constant commenting on the internet. And seeking karma, addicted to that too. My only addiction I've ever had..Seek out a disk analyzer instead, so you can find just what is the biggest file.Then RC should be fine. As for the return trip, you can make a new post and I'll figure out something.Well admittedly you used Amazon.. which other than outside of the US, isn't a bad company. Outside of the US.. the employees are livid at them.I mean there's a lot of blood where the legs got run over...Except according to Princeton it doesn't matter what they vote. Congress doesn't care one way or the other and instead votes on their own feelings and mostly the thoughts of corporations.To be fair they originally protected us from wolves by their own volition.Based on a homeworld 2 mod from MANY years ago that.. well never really was realized or finished properly. Due to such thing I am skeptical of it ever reaching full development.&gt; t the way I look at all these early access games any more is to estimate how much enjoyment I will get out of it for the dollars spent. I figure $14 is the cost of a movie ticket around here so as long as I get 2.5 hours of fun out of this game, it was "worth it". I'ave already played for 6 hours so I guess it was worth it.

I buy games when they're finished, every indie and early access has disappointed me otherwise and even sometimes at "finish" they're still just early access and barely have any content.

14? 5 dollars if you go during matinee pricing. But time isn't a measure of enjoyment, some times it's a measure of poor pacing or repetition. Like Destiny.Is okay! I still loves you!I repeated this back many times so I could sound russian.Its the fact she went through poor graphics that surprises me. You must have said you really wanted her to play it.Ehh. The user reviews are just as skewed on the extremes.Solely from the rating of games like Skyrim I have to disagree. It's best to just torture the game journalist until they tell you the truth. Costs less too.No.Actually what they truthfully said was that the campaign would be implemented through the multiplayer missions in an intrinsic way and that the story too would be extensive and immersive.MANY people did play it, actually.Well to be fair, in the old days the classics were really all that existed.. and there weren't many things to compare games too, much less high quality games to compare to see if it matched such and such's quality or story or experience.

Repetition was also for some reason easier to deal with than it is today for the majority.

As for CS itself, that has so many problems with it that calling it a classic based in the terms of quality is simply inaccurate.No. Respawn didn't make a campaign because they said they were going to weave the intrinsic story into the multiplayer missions themselves. They lied. It's simply that simple.

(This is actually True)It certainly looks good, but it needs so much more content.. and that's the problem.Never could get that last achievement from playing the arcade game in the bar...Actually according to Call of Duty Black Ops 2's developers at least 20% do.

In any case even if 5% did (and it's far more than that) you should really compare how many people in general complete games in the first place, across any type of game or spectrum.

While it isn't 5%, 5% of the many millions buying the game is a significant chunk of money.

Regardless, Titanfall had promised a good story interwoven into the multiplayer experience itself. They didn't even try. So they can make what excuses they like.What would Perry say?Better informed? There's a massive degree of distortion, misrepresentation, echo chambers, and other issues. Even in this comment trail it is far too obvious. You are not better educated through the internet due to these very issues unless you can see all these comments and say that instead you'll do research and actually find out the facts rather than assuming correlation is causation... how did you get that? I recognize this sub has massive distortion and echo chamber thoughts but your literal comment points to only one eventuality if we look at it as presented. That is to say that the shooter was sparing those of religion from pain rather than dying slowly. Hence the headshot (you don't just live from being shot in the foot or something usually). In this context this is more sympathy than mockery.

How.. how you could ever come up with anything else is quite improbable as I see it unless you're intentionally distorting.&gt; Everyone here is talking about how cute it is and I'm just worried for the tablet

Material object versus adorable puppy? Not hard to choose.I don't think I'd let my hooman get into the habit of using expensive electronics as a toy then.And I pointed out from the actual developer that Respawn came from that they were wrong. I even indicated the game. That means you could look it up instead of arrogantly insulting someone when you've no idea what you're talking about.

YOu clearly have no idea what the word stupid even means otherwise you might stop painting yourself as it.... The company developing Black Ops 2 indicated their campaign numbers.. as has Infinity Ward.

Respawn came from infinity ward which develops CoD.

As always, the distortion and trolling in these subs when's facts come out is always annoying.Their mod history is of many years towards Home world 2 and another game... But never actually finishing anything. I knew about their attempt to make an fps / ship game years ago and even then they hadn't finished things that had been out for years.

Though, now that money is involved, perhaps a chance exists but still.Really isn't the same.It always worked for me without any change other than some config ini edits.Err... Losing glass wasn't a UI change for me and I find for some reason loads are slower than 7 was for me.I have actually seen confirmed reports of issues disappearing once a clean install was done.I find display driver crashes much more often now from nvidia sadly.Most people aren't the niche vocal minority you find on these sites or the internet, so it makes sense.I enjoy male camaraderie and am far more comfortable with nudity around guys in general and relaxed environments without any sexual charge. I like that... Unfortunately despite all the problems that people may be understanding of that others have and sadly despite the fact that it's very rare to find others up for it... They can't really accept it usually and sometimes react extremely harshly in response.

Ill be over here having naked halo.I convincingly was a female online once for several years over a particular games internet chat. I think I acted the part but I was young then, I could do so much better now.

They were just kids so I didn't feel bad lying when I was a kid too.So just a handful of pages then? Because that was the extent of their story.Well there's a million sites showing it in very demeaning or abusive ways entirely focused on sexuality or bondage so...I would doubt the Dom would be the one being abused.... Jesus is the point so without context your statement makes no sense.I would say the bible has some particular answers for you in regards to surrounding yourself with a core of those of faith to keep you strong.

You should definitely try and find that core.I've read all the hundreds of star wars books from the old canon and the games and movies and shows and comics. 

The star wars sub is like all specialty subs.. just for those that want to gush over something, not actually discuss something.Well they buy Beats for two hundred but yes, the value is 30.Mine beeps before the actual beep. Just to let you know. It also beeps after it is turned off but not yet removed. Just to let you know.Technically bullying. People hate it when done to themselves but don't hate it when it's towards others usually.I'm busy today but they could come by and offer to spend a couple hundred together for a great steak dinner, premium cigars, and a bottle or two of wine. For tomorrow.

Great time. Maybe we can become friends over it all.Better if they do something kind to someone they either don't know or they know isn't treated very well. Means far more.Hair loss from my head.

According to science you're an adult when you're past twenty five and the brain doesn't develop as much. So at that point you usually deal with this.No, but they both were kind to each other which the world is in serious deficit of.Two people smiling? The thing people do so much less of this generation than the previous? Oh yes.Your need to tell me you feel differently though is already a given, you were not appropriate in doing so and I feel offended, but that doesn't mean you should take what I've said as an attack on your personal character.Ahh so not on reddit then.Removing the NCR doesn't remove the slavery of Caesar's Legion so the synthesis isn't much of one.Well he'd still need to find another Steve Wozniak to do his bidding.Sigh, they're trying to be SG-1 again?And then the driver crashed because he could not see past the many bullets.No we didn't. We made a slight trade restriction reduction. The embargo is still in full force. It's this type of non confirmation of thoughts that irritates me about Reddit.These cuban cigars are great too!I'm sorry but no, especially old canon mentions, that stuff gets downvoted quickly. Most there barely even know the lore of Star Wars in its entirety or even partially and prefer to have arguments of Movie vs Movie vs Movie, wherein all including Prequels were still fine movies.While the president certainly isn't the most powerful due to purse strings that got him there that's a bit off topic.

I am interested in how you secure a college of 30,000+ students that has public access for a president though. That just seems impossible."NO Mr. President, you must actually fulfill your campaign promises prior to retiring."It shows his family was a legacy and had money and connections and advantages.

I could give you the same and as immature as you are, you could go to Harvard.In truth, anyone perpetuating the mass corruption and desecration of the country IS an idiot. That's just hurting it.He was on tv for Stargate SG-1.

MacGuyver is Richard and no one else.There are over one hundred other books, the actual clone wars series, 20+ graphic novel series, and numerous other factors. No it gets a lot of downvote trolling there. I stopped going to that sub a long while back because it's just the same as any specialized sub. That's why you don't go to a game sub to talk about a specific game when its namesake is the location, objectivity is gone, and you don't go to news to talk about news.. objectivity is gone because of circlejerks and such.

When you have to point out the clearly most popular things as the things people still accept... you're not doing your point a very good job.This is True of every post that's ever been on /r/news. This sub usually has top posts misrepresenting what happened, circle jerking heavily, and going off what one person thinks or said about another who has not responded.The casino would like you to know that it appreciates you spending all your wealth back at the Casino."Treat now please!""Mmm you're warm, stay here and keep me warm.. or die."

Zzz...."Move and the claws will kill you.""Sigh, he's in my spot now..""Go away I'm sleeping!""Oh hai!"Does this mean we finally get to see Steve Jobs as the selfish, egotistical, and self-righteous asshole that he was towards others including his employees? Or is it just another "look how smart I am", because that's what the movies have got wrong each time as far as I can see it.True, we all know he was actually a Vampire.Honestly if we could just go out for cigars, a great steak, and some wine I'd be happy. Just a couple hundred. In truth I can guarantee it'll be one of if not the best meals of your entire life.

If you at the same time decide to want to pay off my college that's entirely fine too.Careful, one could easily appropriate your statement to defend extremely wealthy people that control the whole world.If you can afford it, you're going to start paying for things more often, sorry but I've paid for your shit for far too long anyway.Most of my friends don't work.. but they still don't find time to hang out with me versus others that often :-/Not for an addiction, no.I'd honestly be far more impressed with him if he focused on helping this countries impoverished first before other countries.. he became wealthy here primarily after all.

This is my opinion, you don't have to agree but it's still my opinion. I just feel that rebuilding prior to helping others will in the end help more people.Sorry I work for the tyrant warlords and had to report you.There's also the heavy distortion and overbias towards police, towards military, towards government, towards homosexuals, towards drugs, and towards anything possible that people might do or associate as.

FACT isn't a word that has ever really entered this subs vocabulary.Well, ignoring your immature insult that has no real meaning for what you intended and was unnecessary, no.

More like taking money from the rich with taxes or such, your statement is essentially a defense for that which nearly everyone that isn't wealthy wants to happen in this country.Well actually his wife got him to do it, so criticizing Bill is fair game, the wife not so much. In fact not just his wife. Warren Buffet also got him to do it.There will be a time to look at what we can do on other planets, but we could never reach that without an orbital elevator or similar means of getting goods off the planet cheaply and efficiently.

So looking at other planets makes no real sense, protecting against potential asteroid collisions is of course something that should remain funded.I wasn't really summing it up.. I was saying the entirety of the Elder Scrolls story is a few pages. The random side quests of no depth aren't really part of that but yeah they're a few pages too.Sometimes they use liquid to make it less sore.I don't believe in parties, I believe in voting history in regards to what is beneficial to the people and longevity, who volunteers it doesn't matter, though no one does because the government is corrupt and congress has a 0% care of what the citizens think according to studies. 

Your age analysis would relate to the vast immensity of the internet and its most common posters so I'm not sure what you're trying to get at.

Edit: It is a fact though that a weak country can't help people as much as a strong country can.That really more depends on where he did this at.Raising taxes relates to post taxed income because that income would be less.- Yeah; it's amazing how many people seem to think that you owe them a slice of your money when you get a sudden windfall.
- If I ever acquire a large amount of money, I'm going to keep that as private as possible.

A sudden windfall? Just like sudden success in business and the further success coming from investing it and using the funds to get you breaks, loopholes in tax code, and lobbyists?

You very clearly highlighted the exact issue of, taking money from the rich, not taking money from the rich, and your statement could be used in defense of the latter which I was warning against.Angels Fall First, same name as the other mod they tried to develop, and the other mod, and the SoaSe mod.The lottery is a unique situation,t he money is quite literally the desperate funds of millions of people. Lotteries actually cost more to implement than they bring in too so that's not so good.

But I see your point, you wanted to say something specific and in this context it could easily be distorted or even plainly used which has to make us think if our own reservations or thoughts really are.. fair or proper.The house did get 3 once. One would be guessing in determining who if any did something. Could have been the dog. Apparently spore is very..  protected.I have the best entertainment and I usually prefer going out skydiving, to cigar lounges, for fancy wine, or for steak dinners.Loses* And I have yet to lose, let me know when that happens and we can debate it, make sure you don't distort, misrepresent, or lie in said debate though. The rules would disqualify you.Yes, such a tool to be informed.. that's clearly the definition of snob. Shall we review your post history to see how uninformed you've acted? I'm sure you always know what you're talking about.. what with all the lack of actual informing you do for yourself.That really depends on how much is actually spent on their production versus free gifts to celebrities and advertising and marketing.When someone gives me some money for my college debt, sure.Yes, he has fur and I do not. That is very special.. Why do I not get fur. :-(If only we had a name for that... like.. a HEAD-GUARD. Yes, these are clearly all HEAD GUARDS. There's a guy trying to call them Helmet but that doesn't make sense, don't go with him.I dare you all to try this and see if you do better.Sky diving, and then fine cigars and scotch to celebrate it after."Warm hooman is warm"You mean the fact that Moff was trolling and lying and distorting things and I wondered why and then found that he was trying to do the same here too within about 1 minute? Oh yes it took so long to find this post.

Yes, I am though.

You're right, it is good to change them when evidence shows up. You don't ever have evidence though, you troll or distort things or just do whatever. You're the quintessence of what /r/news is.

When you come up with real evidence from real research that somehow disproves me on something then I will admit it. But you don't, and people prefer to downvote troll instead of find it.Time to waste being immature and a detriment to society that can't come up with any intelligent words or responses though.

You seem to be seeing yourself in the mirror but you keep trying to apply it to myself. Good bye.I can't see why not, seems fair. I've sent the check in the mail.*Scene cuts to mother looking on scene with binoculars*You missed my birthday then... :-/ I'm hurt.

Pick me up and let's go out for steak, cigars, and wine.If you eat with me there's many types of steaks not just one, unlimited in fact.It'll take some time but eventually they'll do it successfully. Same time tomorrow. Mother will get her bull coat soon...There is absolutely no truth other than slanted and distorted sound bites in attack ads. So yes they should be banned or at least indicated as entirely bias, skewed and distorted prior to playing.Ehhh you're really laying on the skewing.

First off actual investigations have shown that the vast immensity of targets were indeed used for terrorist activities. Let's stop the quoting of distorted news. Equally so, let's remember that Israel is a country and being attacked by an area consistently under the watch of the media for any sign of retaliation. There's a limit to what can be done. As for it being mostly civilians.. despite plainsclothes dressing of the terrorists themselves and the skewed and illogical death totals, you have to keep in mind that even at an early age the education in that area even on TV is just as anti Jew as possible, encouraging their deathsNo its fifty fifty split between both vocal minorities. Who knows what the anonymous vocal voter minority thinks and As for the majority.. they think whatever the media says.No, just great food.I'd like to report corporate controlled government.It should be a good read for the legal minded. I look forward to seeing the front page covered with corruption.TPP singlehandedly removes corruption of congress by requiring them to be employees and meet quotas.

Ninety five corporations are shut down, Microsoft offices now for sale.

IBM now rolling out computer tax, use of such devices has huge levy.

New trade agreement in secret talks supposedly.Actually NAFTA was devastating and costly. These agreements rarely are good.No. What you're reading is how lobbying works.You mean memorization and then forgetting what you learned? Yes.Your first statement is incorrect. It seems completely ignorant of how the formation actually happened or that the Palestinians haven't legally owned an inch of land at any point. You must consider the actual owner of the Palestine Mandate and other such factors. And then the many wars that they had to defend against are glossed over too.

Democratic? You seem to forget the pressure that was applied and the corruption during the votes.

Palestinians problems are perpetuated by the corruption and culture and likewise continue it themselves. They are marginalized by their own leaders. They could fix this all very quickly if it was truly wanted, but when a person dies in front of you and you do nothing.. there's a huge cultural brainwashing there.

Israel could make it disappear too, by actually committing a real war crime. It would be so simple. But they don't.Alright, enjoy jumping and ducking.No, those are my views and those of many others, and I indicated them in a way that applied. I would argue it wasn't sensational or generalized to begin with.

I'm also far beyond a teenager.Then it starts shooting fire.I must say I am surprised the entire match book was lit on fire.Not nice to talk that way about the woman, though yes she does need some serious civility training.I can't agree that the entirety of Witcher 3 is perfect, I just.. there is too many dull songs in there amidst the many great ones.I certainly hope he utilized his wealth to enjoy the finer things too... As downt o earth as I might be I still would want to experience high class, maybe not a rich as hell mansion but some fancy dinners and nice trips.

I would say though that I don't really think forcing public school was necessarily the best choice, it was hell for me.No, it just means they're overreliant and weak systems.That doesn't change the reality that the system is over-reliant and thus needs to be greatly revamped (as most of our entire government  needs to be) and likewise support for it made a priority.Okay, I'll do what no one else does.

- First this is reddit. On reddit the more you complain the more trolling you get. Explaining yourself or arguing for yourself usually gets down vote spam and trolling. On internet forums in general, people will say things in unsolicited ways because everyone shares their thoughts on the internet. That's the point.

- Vulgarity and immaturity is common, especially here, and the veil of anonymity makes people dickish, especially on specialty and specific subs such as these. The arrogance is extreme, yes, though your responses were honestly aggression issue level in terms of the mental issues associated. My father explodes like that too. We don't talk much.

- In terms of your PSU or power supply unit, the voltage or wattage basically indicates what it can take, the problem is that this isn't enough. We've found that certain brands aren't as high quality, don't last as long, or have particular models that are volatile. It is due to the way they are made and the actual owners of each unit. The brand itself isn't often enough. There could be a corsair PSU that is terrible to get because of the actual producer or specifications.

It seems at first they just wanted to help with that. Then the trolling occurred as people abuse down votes often and especially on these types of subs. That said, it's hard to tell who did what first. What I can tell is that you feel people are in your business when you didn't ask for it and you're not aware that the culture of the internet is universally in favor of that.

As for your graphics card, the issue is people think about what you'd need in general to be able to persistently play high quality setting games at max levels. The top comment seemed entirely based on that and while perhaps unwelcome, was entirely friendly.

So, compare your graphics cards memory and type to the rating sites by a Google search, and check your power supply so as to maintain its quality which is probably fine but just to be safe.

And that's that. Delete your comments that were downvote trolled so as to try again, or make a new account and just remember, never create a thread of replies of your own, it never ends well. Reddit loves to bully and circle jerk. You'll learn, if you care enough.

Have a pleasant night.It's not even pay to win, it's pay to not waste time.Actually it isn't. It makes things wet.Amazon's literal value and mission statement relates to their customer service. Quite honestly insulting it is nonsensical. Their only non breach point is matching price trends they don't do on their own automatic means. They won't lower things just because someone they don't match is lowering it.I've waited 2 months for a response that I had to fix myself.Well, the fact I'll only have one semester left ideally and either I'll have no plans or my plans will be very optimistic looking.

I'm also looking forward to finally finishing StarCraft.

As for beyond, I'm looking forward to the last semester being over.Actually you should modify your video, rather than do it "next time". That doesn't help anyone with the current router questions regarding this video.Gaming PCLol.. .... Minecraft?*Urine smell intensifies*Anything using Mr. T or a rapper or similar angry sounding guy.

Blizzard did it once and oh God I wanted to just.. quit.

Alt F4.Gaming ComputerThey knew they'd never see him again :-/Corruption.1So I'm fine with MMO's using subscriptions even if it is expensive, provided it has content and isn't like Destiny or some such. Doesn't mean I like that game but I'm fine with the model.

When TOR decided to try the market place but "be free" that was very irritating the way they continue to do it.

But Hearthstone, Heroes of the Storm, and games like that which are so focused on getting your money to get anything really new, or at least a MASSIVE amount of time to even catch up? That's just annoying.

But you don't win by paying, you just don't waste nearly as much time as you would otherwise.I already saw the damage NAFTA did, unless this reverses all that there's just no way it won't cause more problems and job losses.EULA isn't something that has ever held up in court.Water + Object = Wet
Water + No Object = WaterThere is actually a sleep apnea machine you can use which works extremely well and is mostly common. There are also other drugs than Alphrazolam.I desire to see your many dogs as a dog lover interacting with the kitty!Due to shifting corporate trends in the financial metric system we require our employees to seek further education opportunities within the next three years. Please see your human resources representative to work out a plan for a graduate degree.Your company has been purchased by Comcast incorporated.One still has to prove it, and that means a real link to it then you have to decide if you really can go up against Google.Perhaps you'll be made into slave labor.Can confirm, am dog.

We can't talk but we can type. I mean Arf Arf.Th... thi.. this is for mmm me? Wha?!We're not blaming the economic crisis on NAFTA, and NAFTA DID cause a large amount of jobs to be lost.

I'll do a bit more research on this later today when I'm not so busy.One of hte main things is job transfer to other countries. The outsourcing factor. That's a big issue that NAFTA made a lot simpler.You mean.. helping the community by doing what you should have done in the first place? How awful.It's less a password and more the program that will stop it, all of those usually use a type of IT software that reinstalls an img every time.If I recall properly, our motherboard has two batteries so most wouldn't notice why it didn't reset.So child porn is on your computer?I just couldn't stand it for some reason.New one this December.The massive amount of treats needed to make this was likely costly.

He lost his whip and he lost the bone, poor dog.Yes, this is dog.I'm waiting to see all your well researched citations and academic / scholarly articles to confirm your assertions.

I'm expecting hundreds of sources and a very long list of research papers. I can't wait, as clearly you wouldn't just take advantage through manipulation of a circle jerk potential on the internet about something you actually don't know anything about that holds solid, right...?

Please don't disappoint.It certainly plays a big part in their immaturity and propensity to demand immediate satisfaction.People on the internet rarely ever do research if at all, you're talking about people while on reddit, a site that quite literally advocates not even reading the article but going off comments and the title and misrepresentation and such. This does NOT fit your argument well.

To be completely honest, they continue to believe what they're told.. they simply trust random misleading or lying internet users such as you and myself more than those in the real world.The other father seems happy.The last time this was reported on we actually got some real facts being mentioned.. I'm really hoping this thread doesn't forget that it's not all what it appears to be. Also legally this can't be considered a war crime.The burden is on you, not me. I believe the actual facts, you're the one asserting something entirely different. And you're not phrasing that as an opinion, but as a fact, and not just a fact, but you're advocating it and persisting it as a fact and as others see it as some intelligent discourse on reddit, you are not mentioning to them that it's all just theory based on your uninformed assertions.

It seems you have no idea how human psychology or sociology works.Your theory is anecodtal without basis, you should know this if you did any psychology or sociology courses.

You've also conveniently tried to sidestep everything I said. That's enough of that. Nearly the entirety of Reddit knows not to take the comments or articles in the news subs seriously, but you can only mislead those already misled, and it hurts you and others to propagate that.

Your many sources and research please proving EXACTLY what you first asserted? Statistical basis too?

As a given, I'll throw you a bone. You're right that a prisoner could probably be taught better coping skills.. so could every person on this website.Poor Moon Moon has shrunk.Would you prefer a vicious bear cub?Pretty much the opposite of the dog, who just wants to help.This seems immensely more useful than things like that."This is my life now.""Good boy, who's a good boy? You are you good boy."

P.S. For some reason I only realized now that it wasn't just a floating camera following the dog but that it was the person there the whole time.Nah, the shedding is a bit bothersome but oh well. Everything else is great.The ice cream was for him apparently.I imagine he realized that he could get ice cream by bringing objects to the truck and eventually one of the objects worked. Now trying to chew the cage door off, eh?I always think of Stitch, his five movies, his TV series, and the new animated series that's really weird.The dogs paw is clearly past the threshold. So you lose.Well we know if won't, NAFTA had its own problems after all. Also we know the previous draft was a landmine of bullshit.

I would not agree with what you say the intent is. Honestly this was built by corporations, the intent is profit.I'll just say it then. This content should have been free or purchased in game. Justifying it or even applauding the idea of having content that's finished kept from you for even more money is not right by any means.

Like it or not for the fourty plus dollars this update costs it didn't add very much and not has the game suddenly been given the massive amount of content it needs and originally was promised to have at one single price of 60.

Worse, they've lobotomized the experience for non adapters by removing other difficulty modes, locking items beyond the new legendary marks and removing commendations and vanguard marks for lower level purchases, along with pretty much making all content for the high level and screwing over those that still wanted to play otherwise.

And in case anyone tries to point out the time they spent in the game, that has never been an indication of quality, and very well could be an indication instead of addiction. I still have hopes this game can turn around but each step forward brings fifty back.Never found this to be True in reality. People are generally selfish and immature on the internet.I was certain reports of them bringing it down to eight or nine in court were out last year or two.This assumes too much that I have an alt, thankfully I do not.

It's a good guide, sadly it paints into a clear picture that after this there is really nothing else to do unless you're just going to repetitively grind.I take issue with this. Some of the size in W3 was unnecessary or clearly padded when it could instead have had those assets used on the much needed polish and immersion and perhaps even the quests since many of them were bare in conversation potential and options.

Having even larger size of a game is not something I look forward to if these concerns aren't addressed, and being that the budget is for an admittedly unique title that a company can't really say what it will be worth.. it can be expected to have less of a budget than the witcher in most likely events.

This means even less polish and that's an issue for an rpg. I seriously hope they either get an injection of fourty million more or deal with their polish and immersion issues.People go where their friends are... And like it or not a massive chunk of gamers have friends on consoles and they play through together or against each other there while at college, home, or wherever.

The steam machine concept has pretty much died in the wind. People don't really talk about it anymore, the articles are rare, prices seem too heavily varied, and there's no quality exclusives or push to really drive people to the Jew product.

From a business standpoint it's not even out of concept stage if they don't even have this yet.The first question would be, "where are my friends at?". The answer would likely point back towards the consoles and so that plan fails.Well if you use this argument to their face it would just backfire, it also wouldn't be accurate. If you're going to insult console players, might as well learn what the machines actually do.Technically this would be inversed too. If you wanted to play with them, you'd of bought a console. Have to keep in mind sentences work in two ways.I took it to mean "length of the game" which to me means excessive padding and repetition ala DA:I.Which makes little sense when we know it will have bugs galore.The problem is that most preorders don't actually coat anything or at most a tiny portion of the full price which you can get refunded. As a bait it doesn't do anything different for places like Amazon or such.... Except that wouldn't be fair, that'd be minimal cost based on lobbying.

Further this completely forgets that barely anyone actually pays the thirty five. With deductions and deferrals it goes down heavily and GE specifically... Pays no taxes and rarely ever has.Yes I beat it in about fifty hours with near full completion. A lot of it was getting repetitive, characters had minimal dialog options and conversation choices, primary characters could barely be talked with and pivotal characters less so, at times the quests got a bit run of the mill and nearly no quest had any actual impact on the gameplay itself other than one with the tiniest scene that was then contradicted in gameplay.In short, more money is needed to make that happen. But yes. Don't expand until the polish and immersion is complete.

I'm beginning to get tired of the trolling and inability to discuss things objectively that has been ramping up in this sub but it just keeps getting worse.We get into a complex discussion here.

There are games with better immersion. There are games that really let you talk to people or at least try. There are games that implement your choices into the actual gameplay and world. But none do it all or perfectly these days. The problem is that this game advocated it would. It did not.

It was good sure, but it had clear issues.I can, but not one that had it all, granted it didn't say it would. For example, I believe Mass Effect 2 had far better character development for instance of close companions, not all npc though, but for the most part I could ask what I wanted. DA origins also implemented character dialog very well even if it wasn't voiced for your own.

There's far more than that as well. The issue is there was a clear promise to deliver and it did not.I'm well aware that MGS and Witcher 3 and to some extent DAI are mostly immune to criticism or objective thought in most areas. But that doesn't mean it doesn't have critical or objective problems that should be exposed and discussed.

You can never have them on the specialty subs sadly. And this sub has a lot of people on it that frequent those subs so... It carries over.

There is no actual quest that changes witcher 3 game world based on a choice. The biggest two options were the Baron but stick around and the dialog remains the same and no matter what you said the guards go raping and pillaging in the main city illogically.

Also the mages leaving which shows yes a consequence scene for like a second or two of elves except then it just forgets about that.

The epilogue is not the same thing because they didn't need to actually make any of that meld with actual gameplay, just write about it.

Honestly the character development was very minimal too. Good luck asking Phillipa nearly anything.Would you like me to tear apart that game? Because MGS deserves it far more. Repetitive AI that's stupid, barely any design on the actual environments, massive amounts of unnecessary walking, massive amounts of revisiting the same area over and over and the same literal mission area over and over.. illpgicpaly and immersion breaching at times even. A cut third chapter, a cut last mission, a console based mostly pointless base building area, and so much more.I'm surprised they're using the virgin angle. In terms of the word you're not a version when you have any type of sex, so oral counts. Some would say a sexual act such as a hand job would also count.

So it's really just a gimick sense of trying to label virginity as only meaning not penetrated.

Strange, that normally wouldn't fool many people.But that seems like a problem doesn't it? A game with so many problems and which gets repetitive quick is your best experience? Compared to KotOR, Modern Warfare, World of Warcraft, Deus Ex HR, Fallout, and so many other quality games?Most with issues with that version didn't even finish half the game, it bored them, myself included, with huge repetitive areas and bland and pointless combat. I paid full price even...There haven't been a lot of high-quality games outside of the new witcher, various telltale games, and other such things. So that should be telling of how bad these issues really are. I'm not going to point out BioShock infinite and its many issues or something either.The problem also extended to the story.It is not. The long times others have spent, even on games like Skyrim have never been accurate in my experience.Except Witcher 2 did dialog more thoroughly and more efficiently. You may not have had old BioWare style things going on, but you had more dialog.There were far too many times in my experience where questions that were obvious from Witcher 2 or were just obvious in the context of what you learned or experienced in W3... would not be possible. Phillippa wasn't the most extreme but it was a pivotal one you were denied any real discussion with. Your companions too, barely getting to know them.

Mass Effect and Dragon Age may have been bad at implementing your choice in the world, for the vast majority of the time, but there were games that could. The problem is, as indicated, that Witcher 3 was advertised, marketed, and even said by its developers to be all these things and it simply did not deliver.I can see your point, but in my case I didn't feel invested in anything other than finding Ciri and even then.. not that much. They didn't really do a good job of character or alter-character development. I wish they had as it'd probably make it easier for me to ignore other issues they had.Definitely the developers fault though, they did promise to deliver a great blend of those factors and they barely showed implementation, had average to arguably lower than average development of characters, and other issues. I'm not budging on that one.

Dark Souls not being enjoyed is a personal thing, unless there's some objective reality of the game that is in itself the issue.Well it's a different market to be honest, plus Apple has never been able to compete in the sheer extent that Microsoft has in terms of OS.I can't see a lot of opportunity for character development in this type of expansion versus the larger one coming later, but I do hope we get better chances to learn about characters this time around.The twist is probably that it's just a backwards isle and oh look it's a helicopter raid.I can't see how you can.. and by that I mean I can not feasibly fathom how you can disagree when it's a matter of they said something, they lied and that happened. It'd be like denying the graphic downgrade.

But, still. We've said our pieces.Maybe but these can clearly play some manner of games, the Macbooks have high limits with that.You're asking a sub of niche specialized gamers, you're basically asking for both bias and an overrepresentation. But that's fine, I'll participate.

I'd recommend trying /r/Gaming /r/Games and other such things, as well as a more general survey.Not just specs, but the fact it's a windows platform.It's a sign of the degradation of society, and it's not like the TV shows. You have the most vulgar and immature people, juvenile, and harassing people possible, other than possibly gamer freshmen at college or frat-candidate freshmen at college. You have little respect, and it just gets worse from there. Also very vulgar, heavy bullying, lack of common sense, and lack of discipline.Doesn't make much sense as an American either.Let's modify that.

Distortion, misrepresentation, exaggeration, bias view without the other side, picking and choosing, circlejerking, and just utter immaturity. Front page.

I thought I was on News when I first realized what this video was.

I have a friend who distorts everything you tell him and tons the good and expands the bad. This guy and him should go out.Criticism is fine, but he wasn't really even reviewing, he was just insulting things without really any analysis.

He did it in this video too. Like him or not for whatever reason, he doesn't.. do research.Okay. But I did. I beat Skyrim in pretty much the same time too. I'm sorry that you, my Lord, can not fathom it but it is True.It wasn't that I found dialog lackluster, it was that character development from an objective sense was minimal which was not what was promised.

It would be different if it was a lot and I was just demanding of more but that isn't the case here.

Nothing I've said has been subjective... I don't even type in subjectivity very often.Mac titles are getting more now but they are still very minimal.Not True. Perhaps they assumed their friends would come.... The reason people play WoW is for the social interaction and it is likewise the main pull of Destiny and similar games. Robbing them of their social networks and effectively isolating them from those they knew is NOT a valid option for the majority.Okay... In my case it would be.

*Walks you home*

I hope you enjoyed yourself and you're a very fun person to talk with. Why don't we try and do something again next week? 

Alright you have a great night!

*Walks home*

*Gets to know girl over two years*

*Gets married*

Finally sex!And then right when they were about to meet her, they think your thoughts and give up.

And that's how I DID NOT meet your mother.Right but, the issue is that very few actually do that, hence why you have people who own both or just consoles. Let me just call the pope over Herr.The problem is that people are taking him as a source of validity as often happens with uninformed opinions, even in this thread. The post I responded to even indicated them as valid.. despite their lack of being validated.First no one playing the games can be expected to have read the book. Second yes. He just regained his entire memory. We should have had development up the wazoo. Primarily of nd with other characters though yes.

The bloody baron may have seemed developed but based on actions when he leaves being completely ass backwards, they let it slide at the end, plus that leads to the poor implementation of gameplay changes thing.

You think Yen and Triss are defined in his new life and memory set? You barely get to ask them about anything other than the thing they just said to you. Sure some happens but it was very lacking for an epic trilogy ending.I never even had a red ring but did have a day one Xbox. I bought a new one because it was quieter.

It does seem that people don't want to realize this stuff isn't some valid criticism. They took a major financial loss for the repairs.The first slim sleek gloss 360 that was black was the Valhalla model. Whatever they are now is entirely different.You're going to die in the year 2044.

Sorry, just had a vision.Delayed.I wish that was my issue, having played nearly everything when it came out, there are so few good games each year and so few good games in general.So that's Deus Ex then.Near completion for me took 50 hours, with the expansions probably an additional 20.

Iw ish there was a high quality non repetitive game that lasted 900 hours. Other than an MMO I've never found even one.http://www.polygon.com/2015/6/18/8804273/halo-5-guardians-microtransactions-343-blog

Doesn't really seem bad.Retail will be around for quite a while left, don't go too far ahead of the group, it's time to come on back and keep pace.I must have been lucky, because I never had problems with it or Vista. Worked fine for everything. 50 hours for full completion of Skyrim, but it had barely any story other than the DLC and it was pretty repetitive. Can't enjoy Divinity: Original Sin, has a lot of navigation issues, gets disconnected in its plotline at significant points, and just builds up a repetitive sense, plus the older graphics were hard to take this far into the millenium. Fallout 3 when it came out and four times sense completely. New Vegas of course. Pillars, same issues Original Sin had, same issues for Shadowrun games as well. Total War was one type of thing that after Rome 2 I stopped looking into, but I'll do Warhammer Total War, Shadow Warrior sounds familiar so yes, Flashback never heard of, and Double Dragon Neon.. sounds like we're getting to indies suddenly and I have significant feelings towards those. Unity had a lot of issues at launch, might try Syndicate instead.Can't customize folder locations though, sadly. :-/You forgot someone was trampled on black Friday.I fit the definition of that person. Interesting.

But I find many say these things but don't really live that life, or if they do it's nowhere to the same extreme. Myself... Oh it's been literally every day for most of my life. I am a very lonely person. Psychologists often don't help and medicine doesn't remove the issue so much as hide it. Honestly only cultural change and decency and compassion can help that trend and.. well the internet hates that.

It took way beyond a decade to make my first real friend and that ended horribly in my face. I keep trying but... Sometimes it does feel like I'm the joke and people all know it but me. I would have given anything to have a real friend to spend time with a few times a week and probably still would. Someone real. I can relate to those that don't have that.

Sometimes people do but they need more. I wouldn't know.It seems difficult to get working when you want to add a third into the mix.We wouldn't be saying so many good things about that organization had the best man ran off for the nearby squirrel in the ceremony!I tried this but it's very distracting for me I find. 

A couple times a month in my case.The funny thing is that most people posting these games are actually addicted and that's lamentable and a problem.

But our True addiction is reddit, the useless and pointless site that it is.Amazon preorder costs no money.Will amazon price match this?I don't get what this is telling me to do?

Where is the microsoft code?It would by its players.*Bankruptcy genie appears*

Hello sir, I hear you want to declare bankruptcy.

I'm here to pick up your forms filled out and filed in triplicate, as well as to answer any questions about the process and legal proceedings. I will also need to speak to your accountant, lawyers, and other necessary parties.

Please keep in mind that if you do not have these resources available I'll have to come another time, but you won't be considered bankrupt until everything is confirmed and I can't come back until next May due to my schedule and the office proceedings.

So, do you have what is needed?Canceled.I liked the English but I couldn't watch Bleach after in English when I heard the same voice.Truth is that it was nice she sent someone to check on you. People often do crazy depressive things because of break ups.No.. because they might lend out non interest loans, but that doesn't mean Toyota or dealerships will give them cars with no loan interest unless that person too was Muslim.Well it's not just "inherit". If you have a millionaire family, then you likely can get an investment in your venture a lot easier than someone else, and other benefits and perks, even just having access to things normal people can't have... The habits influenced by the rich corporations?Well for starters, 700,000 - 1,700,000 more.

You're clearly here just to troll and argue, I'll direct you to researching the facts then.

Turns out entirely you're just a troll, your history is littered with it.To you, but this is the mentality of the majority that are in that situation. It's not a joke in truth.Well we do know NK has nuclear weapons. So it isn't that far of a stretch.How often people forget just what the independence and fight for revolution actually was built on.

We.. embellish just how unfair things were.Did you just mention Qatar? You don't happen to mean the same capital of terrorism do you?The advocated poor spending habits due to the middle class not existing and poverty being rampant? Due to mass advertisements, bombardment of False news, and a corporate controlled media? The corrupt congress that has a 0% factor of what the citizenry wants and votes for corporate factors? The many deductions and corruption elements that come to that person selling his product?

No, you can't blame him. Blame the one just fired due to profits diving.Oh the working conditions are shit.I'm sorry but it really isn't. I never understood how that hype appeared.Well the best stuff is probably from RPG games or Blizzard games, though I did like the Halo story and sometimes enjoy the Call of Duty modern stories.I recommend you take a marketing, advertising, and business psychology class some time. It is quite literally the point of commercials to influence you, and when you're bombarded with them from all sides it is even more so.

The fact you want to remain oblivious or see it as insane is strange.. since it's factual and well known. Also profit diving doesn't mean bankruptcy. It means a 1-4% down in global profit. Oh boy so horrible.

Bankruptcy is a way fo rcompanies to restructure and reassociate assets. It's not the same thing for us. The 4770k isn't enough?I do feel they're going to nickle and dime the community heavily from these expensive ship purchases and other such things... The equipment to properly play this game will already cost me nearly 100 or more so.. ugh.It's not overclocked but I could if I bought a new case I think.MSI crashes a lot of other games for me and my 970 crashes with this too. it crashed 62 times during the game play.That didn't fix it. The display driver crashes. That's nvidia being silly.I don't know much about the AMD processors but I'll assume that's the six core processor.Perhaps they'll add a program that makes sure you know what words mean when you type them. Could help you.

Anyway, thanks for being an ass.

Also, you seem to fail to understand where technology comes from.It was confirmed as nvidia. They fixed it with a patch and it fixed all issues. Then they broke it again a few patches later.Doesn't Purdue have some professors that might know such things or a law school?I meant joysticks and such.The loveliness of anecdotal experiences. We've had opposite ones. But they did acknowledge the issue and release an update.. and then broke that update later.They earned it on the backs of employees and production which were not paid or rewarded the same way. That's the whole concept I dislike from conservatives."GET THE HELL OFF MY SON!"Giving back is always the answer.

Though if rich people are being told they are "great" that doesn't necessarily seem like a surprise.Okay. Then I'm sure they have a lawyer.Well it will run Halo like that from what I've heard about five.I see... the card system, single gun factor, genetic vehicles, lack of differentiation, and the lack of feel of Star Wars really wore me out sadly. Perhaps it will get better but it seems just as lobotomized as a I had heard. Glad you have something to look forward to though.

As a side note, I'm amazed by your lack of technical issues in this thread, from what I've heard there were many that others experienced.

Yeah more gameplay issues when I played a bit more and clearly meant to monetize and repetitive require rank ups just to get basic gear. It doesn't feel like star wars or some epic game so much as just a combination of call of duty and battlefield. 

I recognize some like it and it'll probably sell well.. which sucks because this totally isn't battlefront.Google "Games in 2015 wikipedia"I wish I felt that way but so far none have kept me and only a few have even entertained me.Honestly nearly everyone on that list has from my experience or what I've heard.. had some serious problems or issues come up related to them. I definitely don't trust Angry Joe Show anymore either.. too much ignoring of criticism and faults and not being thorough.We aren't elitests here, or at least we aren't supposed to be. So that seems more than fine.We kill each other with things other than guns pretty commonly too, you just don't hear it publicized as much.I disagree, it would give a full perspective plus others. Also it does it simply.He who smelt it dealt it.Reddit relies on media attention picking up on their issues, as that's the only way to spread it to majority discussion.No it doesn't feel like a star wars game. Sadly. It feels like a mock up attempt of sorts.

I've watched the movies, the tv series, read every book of the legacy canon, and all the comics and games have also been finished.In the past we had them, perhaps the new visceral games will be Republic Commando 2. I could always return to the original battlegrounds or battlefronts or even Rebellion. KotOR was more a different type of older star wars but it still fit well.

This is just too gamified and streamlined. You get a power up to get a vehicle and then reappear somewhere else? What? And it gets so much worse.All the tell tale games from recent past!Honestly after playing more I don't think they got the gameplay feel right at all, and its all very discombobulated and heavily imbalanced and random. Reliance on weapons through rank is definitely the wrong idea as well. This is battlefield hardline feel honestly not battlefront.Likely ten years. That's what they've shown as the focus.The stuff you seemed to have liked it what started the trail of things that led to me being very disappointed. It's kind of boring, the focus on rank up and such is dismal and honestly it clearly has monetization as a focus. There's a lot of issues but it doesn't feel like star wars or battlefront to me. It feels like battlefield and call of duty mixed with EA.But then he vanishes and the guy can't kill you.I don't know how you did it, every time I spawned a vehicle or sniper would kill me. The huge imbalances and random chaos just seem poorly applied. Didn't get to play much and it really burnt me out.

And I'm a person that has done everything that has the word star wars in it. Very disappointing.Sadly I can't see myself playing it for more than a couple hours throughout a week. It just.. well it's not very interesting or good.Really?

Spawn, death. Spawn, death by vehicle crashing. Spawn, sniper in three seconds. Spawn, grenade. Spawn, something else. Honestly when I didn't die immediately after spawn it was usually not very fun.So just so I understand. With a mostly invulnerable weapon you got a lot of kills and then you unlocked hero randomly. How does that suddenly scream good game to you? I'm curious.... Honestly horde was immersion breaking.I was thinking Shadow of the Empire.Sadly I don't think I could deal with it for more than an hour or two every once in a while. It seems just too generic other than art which honestly isn't even that much.Ahh. We had very different experiences then. As a person that knows every single piece of legacy star wars lore and story, I can't believe how.. not fun and how generic this is to me.Unfortunately the life lasted about one or two seconds.That doesn't always help either but no I don't have a partner.I'm graduating with a bachelors, so I'm not pursuing the Masters in Accounting track, in fact the fear of having to pursue that is what really made me try to find where I really wanted to go and with my focus on people and technology I pursued Technology Advisory or IT Audit and that stuff through the consulting options.

I went to the career fairs and networked as best as I could but events came up and I had classes to prepare for and some family health issues... I find it hard to believe I'm not good enough, but I didn't get internships with them either when I tried the previous year. I tried though.

I'm not "worse though" in fact objectively I'm probably far more capable and intelligent in a lot of the business world aspects. But even when I was applying with corporate jobs like with Ford or General Motors and such.. I still didn't get any response back. I don't understand why.. everyone seemed to like me and be really impressed with me.

I'm almost willing to just deal with the additional debt from a Masters in Accounting because it's another chance to apply but had I known I'd do that then I would have pursued internships this year, not full time positions...I've mostly just been applying through the career website and at the career fairs we've had.. I've got a few hits from companies I've truly never heard of and none from those I really wanted to.

Our system uses "not invited", it's become a time where I see that word and I hate whatever company it is under.When I could network was mainly at career fairs so not with a lot but for a good period of time we talked. I explained my background and how I had a versatility and understanding of all parts of the business world and so I was focused on that and then just asked questions and tried to figure out more about working there and such things.

I'm.. I'm honestly really confused why all the firms didn't even offer me an interview.. they could have thrown me away after the first but I didn't even get that.

I don't know if a place not heavily recruiting here would take people into consulting nor do I really even know who to look for. The career site for our university is large and I've gotten to the point of applying to hundreds of positions now out of desperation.

What do you suggest?I really wish I could figure out why I got so little feedback and even interview offers...Well graduating next Spring has made me stop looking for internships and start looking for full time. I went to the accounting organization for mostly all the meetings and even tried to be a leader last semester but that didn't happen and unfortunately it doesn't seem to have really helped at all.

There's so many companies I'm not really sure where to start in terms of finding their websites fr the type of thing I'd like to do but I'll try and figure that stuff out.

I like to think I network well, at least I'm socializing and seem to engage people well.

Applying on the websites, writing up cover letters, and all that.. it definitely isn't five minutes.As always I find I disagree with you on quite literally everything you say and I'm actually surprised you act so dismissive towards others here as a moderator.

In any case, it's a PC gaming sub and the link has the pc gaming options. Having ADDITIONAL options when it's pretty clear that a lot of people here also have consoles.. is a benefit.You may not realize just how many postings are on this career server... granted they are for all types of majors and the filter options are poor.. but I'm no where even near the end. I've started applying for more general business things but.. I feel like I'll be locking myself away if I do that. Still.. I'm running out of options.

I never got any office tours or anything.. that would have been nice.He was told to let you escape because there's a tracking beacon.Honestly I can't see anything I did wrong.. but I must have if either every candidate was somehow better than me because of internships or GPA or whatever... I thought I was leveraging my history limited as it was well enough and I even broke out of introversion to be able to engage with others.. everyone I talked to seemed to like me... 

I guess honestly I just need someone to give me a chance. I've spent some time looking at other offers on the job boards and applied to that, but a lot require cover letters and I don't have those prepared as I never intended to apply to these places, further most have online applications and all sorts of things and so that's eating time I need to be using to study.

It's.. a problematic situation. It has definitely got me stressed though.

I did interview an oil company of sorts as you mention the interviews are like earlier.. I'm not sure I would want to work there based on what I learned but then again I may not have many choices.Yes I did, I have made so many online applications and they all use Taleo that I must have 99 different Taleo accounts by now.I'm not sure I can do that because I do need to find a job and the accounting positions mostly want CPA's which the whole point of graduating without pursuing the CPA or the MBA in accounting was so I could focus on advisory instead, plus it was the advisory concept of consulting and accounting that I really felt good about and was interested in, the general accounting for tax and audit (though internal audit would probably be okay for me) was something I learned wasn't of great interest to me and so again I didn't want to pursue mastery of that in particular.

So I'm not really sure there's any accounting positions that would really be applicable, and there is a side of me that isn't entirely sure I'd be able to do them to their utmost necessity or want to.

But I do need to make sacrifices it seems so I'll make sure to apply for what accounting positions do seem to exist. I've expanded to finance right now. The immediate goal is to secure a position for after graduation, ideally that I can start a career from.I'm not making excuses... I'm discussing things on my thread in a kind of stream-of-consciousness manner. And whether you're the one trolling with downvotes or not, I don't appreciate you trying to tell me how I can and can not discuss my own concerns or issues.How would I go to the events again if I'm at an entirely different company as an accountant and potentially a different state?

This has really got me down worse than I thought.. haven't studied all night since finding out. I really need to at least finish this chapter so I can cram the next two."I like food. Thanks"Being good to those that are unfortunate, poo, or even just aren't popular or have friendsAccording to Princeton your vote has 0% influence.

Honestly, look it up.Honestly it does seem there's no positives here. I'm surprised Obama was supporting thisAn example are those that say and do nothing or might give a few dollars and do nothing or might think it'd be nice to be nice to others or befriend those in need or those that are lonely but don't.

It's.. all just the minimal or.nothing.This is kind of more like selling your children.Someday I'm going to read news that instead of firing people, a chief position was removed and the money thrown out the window to the masses.Well all presidents are paid for by corporations or billionaires representing them, but this is still pretty extreme.The vehicles are great and its fun to be in them though I suck with the aircraft controls. But on the ground the fun really vanishes.So non stop pothole reports then?They don't need to fire.. they could take slightly less profits.Ten percent own 90% of the wealth, top 2% own the majority.First you don't need an economist to be able to notice wealth inequality, the corruption of congress and the 0% influence a common voter has. Economists are in truth more often a tool of the rich than anything else. Just barely keeping it from completely devastating us.Alright. You're right. It does and it can.

The problem is that perhaps even with you, your thoughts of Israeli doing things poorly comes from distorted, misrepresented media and likewise the Palestinians also have that against them.

All we can really say for sure is that civilians have been wounded in both areas, the conflict is tense and will persist, and that Hamas are terrorists that have influence due to corruptive elements. Likewise there is educational programs in Gaza and Hamas areas that encourage the harming of children and Jews in general.

Beyond that we can say nothing and have no verification of anything else.As an fyi, the number reports of who is and isn't injured in this conflict have ALWAYS been found to have serious issues and distortions or lies. So figuring even that out isn't possible for us.Let me be more clear.

Economists aren't going to be able to do anything to improve society. At best they advise important people how a policy might further improve something or decrease it, but generally they just analyze how certain financial or economic decisions might impact something.

Truthfully as they create nothing and report on everything, they are the equivalent of weathermen or reporters on weather.

Climatologists in terms of global warming or climate change are different yes. Though their statements and advise can again change nothing and at best advise others, but the difference is that their reports are not desired by the rich as they bring costs and perhaps even regulations if listened to, instead of information that can lead to more profits or maintain a status quo such as economists do.

That does not mean an economist is evil or terrible, just that honestly.. the whole profession makes little sense. Accountants and Financiers are truly tools of the rich.. actually no. They are tools of the tools of the rich who are themselves rich. They do the same thing.. often times better.Honestly I think Hawking is an asshole. But that isn't relevant. It's not about decrying capitalism.

Economists have a 9-5 or longer job like mostly everyone else and that job is to keep whatever duty they are assigned to, available and able to continue working.

The status quo.Feel free to call me naive but I find it unlikely Microsoft wants to destroy the internet. No I will posit a different thing.

These are the corporations and companies that were both invited and accepted the ability to be clued in on the negotiations of the deal and yes perhaps even give some type of influence or feedback, though the big money would be coming from whoever really wanted something done and in that means it would be those truly influencing it.

Sure there are companies that obviously have vested interests in screwing over the populace, but then there are others that make less sense.

Microsoft? I simply don't see that. Apple maybe but even to this extent it seems unlikely. But these are huge corporations and not being clued in on possible transitions would have been a major issue so they stuck around.What really needs to be looked into is the increasing prevalence of procrastination in far more severe and disease similar manners, adhd, add, attention span issues, and social inhibiting factors. The question is whether these truly are related to the increasing propensity of playing games or not.

Ideally the comparison of usage of internet and also the usage of particular sites should also be analyzed.

There have been major changes this generation and they aren't simply random or the fault of young adults and teens. There's something more going on.Well we do make the missiles mostly in Novi, MI.Those trickle down economics...Everything. Someone would take issue with something and another something else.Oh that's because when finished we are a partner and want to use it for our own purposes to. This tech is worth billions.These rules are worse than in my country of the free world trust me.Spacebar also does that.

I also clicked "subscribe" when it appeared, but it just paused the video. So ehh.Honestly, 3M with all those... pieces of tape.I suppose they've always used child labor excessively so.. never change.They were bought by LensCrafter and quality went down a while back.Ahh yes, strange that no one seems to even know of Luxottoca as the people I've talked to that worked there all mention LensCrafter as the purchaser. I wonder if they did it through them.Okay the life "hacked" shouts were.. cringe worthy.A quiet monopoly."OMG That's cat nip!"Here's an interesting fact though.. I bet barely anyone knows that 3M makes scotch tape. They just.. buy scotch tape.

IS there another type of tape? I've never seen any other than duct tape.Sticky notes too right?Right, but you WORKED at a 3M place. That likely said 3M somewhere. The average person buying tape doesn't say I need that 3M type. They say "SCOTCH". It's the quiet monopoly.. though not as quiet.https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/3o9fl1/which_company_or_brand_still_has_the_quality_they/cvvhlgo

I actually just said that! But.. that's pretty much the extent I know.If I recall, velcro was made by someone else.Well they were at least clued in on it. Any big corporations that thought it might affect them and that was invited to probably would have, that doesn't mean they got anything they wanted or didn't want to actually happen in it. My going to a sponsored event doesn't mean I'm sponsoring them.They are a company that can see the TPP and had the option of saying things. Who knows what they did. It's impossible to really tell outside of let's say Warner Bros or Disney or something like that, which obviously had one thing in mind. What would 3M really have to gain or lose?So over used.. and I'v enever heard of it?Aren't you a little short to be a storm trooper?I want to know why the "bad chocolate" is also an option.There's a university halloween party?... I feel like "a few cigars" would probably take many hours since one is usually an hour and a half to two.OH MY! Look at the cute peasant children!TRICK or treat. If you're not giving treats.. then you're getting a trick.Expected.Their lasagna wasn't bad.It was more in specific form. Clearly the internet stuff isn't really going to benefit them so I doubt they cared much about that. Patents.. sure probably patents, but beyond that?The real step would be providing honest, impartial, fact-checked sources for information about candidates and their voting histories that could be presented in a brochure kind of format. At least these summaries could show some truth.Davidoffs are really more the "oh we're celebrating or fancy" cigar, so that's probably going to normally be a larger vitola. But yeah 2 cigars. so 4 hours.Ahh, I only ever had cigars for camaraderie, and didn't over indulge or any of that, nor do I today. I avoided the whole smoking scene otherwise though.I've actually heard there's better and they're just marketed well.Yeah they're supposed to be wearing diapers as they speak!

... People don't realize that while filibustering for long periods at a time it was customary to wear an adult diaper.If they like me, more likely if we have commonality.Judging by all the responses, I would agree.... No. Gaming is just for funny images.

And your analogy is clearly distorted and skewed and doesn't work as a proper analogy.

It's analagous to people that own houses getting a colors magazine for their bathroom but also having other room colors because they might think about remodeling or first modeling other rooms as they likely have them

However, a department store contains both mens and women's clothing as well as children's. This is already the cross contamination you think is silly. In your actual view what you really want are separate stores for each.Milk is bad for you.BioWare.

Delude yourself or not but the doctors left and the EA taint is extensive.In the other thread about brands that maintained quality, someone mentioned Oakley. Unique two perspectives.

Maui Jim's all way.Steam actually has bugs in the program that have been there nine years.Their TV department doesn't even make profit from what I understand, the company also has sold nearly all their long term assets. They have fought against bankruptcy for some time now.How is the PS4 solid if they still have no real exclusive library of note?Only so far as it doesn't violate their sacred text or core beliefs, yes.No the new game is just generic and doesn't at all feel like battlefront or star wars. But I indicated that I knew the lore and series entirely so as to state how yes I had watched the movies and yes I knew what star wars was.

Honestly this game.. wasn't even very good.Yes this generation has serious issues in the exclusive department.

But in that regard it really means none of the consoles right now are very good, and with them barely jumping in specs they are really more media boxes than anything else it seems "Play? Hey wanna play? No...? Sigh... Sleep then. Zzz."It's a sleeping AT.AT. Pretty pooped out.Well for intimidation and also for easy manuevering through all types of environments.How.. how does his officer suit jacket stay on without moving...

In case anyone didn't notice.. It's open at the center in an amazing way that shouldn't... Stay on.

A lot of trolls in this thread though it seems.That's kind of weirder.Being honest and objectively pointing out its issues or forming a view towards it should be applauded, just accepting it because it is star wars should not.To be honest to ask any spending to be cut in half would be quite severe and scary to most. You could try ten percent perhaps or the freeze on some project but then you have to decide which. We've got two carriers being built but we can't just leave them alone for a year or stop building them. We can't get away from a lot of the expenses that are necessary.No I explained why and not everyone else. Also a lot of people have problems with it of a severe nature. You're just ignoring them.Well we are building the new carrier the Gerald R Ford. The next line past the Nimitz class. So in the sense of technological progression, it exists and its power capacity is higher which allows for greater advancements and technology.

That's why we're replacing all the carriers.. Think call of duty mixed with star wars but no tactics.There was a star wars game with two big red circles next to a joystick that all the arcades had. You played through three missions and it cost quite a bit. Ahh good memories.

Battlefront isn't even supposed to be a first person shooter..I do not understand how. So little content and so repetitive and generic.. or if you prefer a huge list of objective issues..

What possibly could you enjoy enough to ignore app that?Battlefront was a third person multiplayer team based game. They occasionally had vehicles and it was entirely focused on fun over anything else. Mostly objective based.Don't care what you do, just give me the AT-AT power up for the entire game! No duck you you took it!I couldn't agree with replay value. Honestly bsttlefeont two bored me after a while. Not a lot of differences.Honestly the maps are too small and too funneled as is.They DID have issues though. Mostly drowned out by fanboys.Look, I'm all for turning off the military r&amp;d and projects other than the budget for operations and emergencies, but all that free budget should go to repaying college loans and helping others get educations and empowering the poverty.Repetition mechanics are NOT subjective. And the content is obvious.. it's also clearly intended to be monetized.

No it's a very generic style, in fact it's pretty boring.

Objective issues ranging from lack of campaign, to the random chaotic feel with no structure, massive imbalances, the power up implementation, poor weapon design, the powerup system in itself, and so much more.

The game isn't AAA quality by any means.No the games aren't shit, but they weren't ten out of ten like the hype wanted them to be. Nor was TPP.Fine, the propensity of games made during and after the time when the prequels came out were pretty bad or just average.I wasn't new, but it had poor character development, necessary and obvious character or conversation dialog options were not present and many characters you had barely any real chance to get to know. Along with many other issues.1999:

Star Wars: Episode I \u2013 The Phantom Menace (1999) - Windows, PlayStation
Star Wars: Episode I (1999) - Pinball
X-Wing Alliance (1999) - Windows
Star Wars: Droid Works (1999) Windows, Mac

2000:

Star Wars: Episode I \u2013 Jedi Power Battles (2000/01) - PlayStation, Dreamcast, Game Boy Advance
Star Wars: Episode I \u2013 Battle for Naboo (2000/01) - Nintendo 64, Windows
Star Wars: Episode I \u2013 Obi-Wan's Adventures (2000) - Game Boy Color
Star Wars: Racer Arcade (2000) Arcade
Star Wars: Force Commander (2000) (Real-time strategy) Windows - set during the time of episodes IV through VI
Star Wars: Demolition (2000) (Vehicular Combat) PlayStation, Dreamcast \u2013 set during the time of episodes IV through VI

2001: 

Star Wars: Obi-Wan (2001) - Xbox
Star Wars Rogue Squadron II: Rogue Leader (2001) Nintendo GameCube
Star Wars: Starfighter (2001) Windows, PlayStation 2
Star Wars: Starfighter Special Edition (2001) Xbox
Star Wars: Super Bombad Racing (2001) PlayStation 2
Star Wars: Galactic Battlegrounds (2001) Windows, Mac

2002:

Star Wars: The Clone Wars (2002) (Action) PlayStation 2, Nintendo GameCube, Xbox
Star Wars: Episode II \u2013 Attack of the Clones (2002) - Game Boy Advance
Star Wars: The New Droid Army (2002) - Game Boy Advance
Star Wars: Jedi Starfighter (2002) Xbox, PlayStation 2
Star Wars Jedi Knight II: Jedi Outcast (2002) Windows, Mac, Xbox, Nintendo GameCube
Star Wars Racer Revenge (2002) PlayStation 2
Star Wars: Galactic Battlegrounds: Clone Campaigns (2002) Windows, Mac
Star Wars: Bounty Hunter (2002) (Third person action) GameCube, PlayStation 2

2003:

Star Wars Rogue Squadron III: Rebel Strike (2003) Nintendo GameCube
Star Wars: Starfighter (2003) Arcade[2]
Star Wars Jedi Knight: Jedi Academy (2003) Windows, Mac, Xbox
Star Wars: Knights of the Old Republic (2003) Windows, Xbox, Mac, iOS, Android
Star Wars Galaxies: An Empire Divided (2003) Windows
Star Wars: Flight of the Falcon (2003) (Action/Space simulation) Game Boy Advance \u2013 set during the time of episodes IV through VI.

2004:

Star Wars: Battlefront (2004) PlayStation 2, Windows, Xbox, Mac
Star Wars Galaxies: Jump to Lightspeed (2004) Windows
Star Wars Trilogy: Apprentice of the Force (2004) Game Boy Advance \u2013 set during the time of episodes IV through VI.

2005:

Star Wars: Episode III \u2013 Revenge of the Sith (2005) - PlayStation 2, Game Boy Advance, Xbox, Nintendo DS
Star Wars: Revenge of the Sith (2005) - Jakks Pacific TV Game
Star Wars: Battlefront II (2005) PlayStation 2, Windows, Xbox, PlayStation Portable
Star Wars: Knights of the Old Republic II: The Sith Lords (2005) Windows, Xbox, Mac
Star Wars Galaxies: Episode III Rage of the Wookiees (2005) Windows
Star Wars Galaxies: The Total Experience (2005) Windows
Star Wars Galaxies: Trials of Obi-Wan (2005) Windows
Star Wars Galaxies: Starter Kit (2005) Windows
Lego Star Wars: The Video Game (2005) Windows, PlayStation 2, Xbox, Nintendo GameCube, Game Boy Advance, Mac
Star Wars: Republic Commando (2005) (First person shooter) Xbox, Windows
Star Wars: Battlefront Mobile (2005)[4]
Star Wars: Battle For The Republic (2005)[5]
Star Wars: Grievous Getaway (2005)[6]
Star Wars Imperial Ace 3D
Star Wars: The Battle Above Coruscant (2005)[5]
Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith (2005)[7]
Star Wars: Republic Commando: Order 66 (2005)[8]
Star Wars: Lightsaber Combat (2005)[9]
Star Wars Trivia (2005)[10]
Star Wars: Ask Yoda (2005)[11]
Star Wars: Jedi Arena (2005)[12]
Star Wars: Puzzle Blaster (2005)[13]
Star Wars: Jedi Assassin (2005)
Star Wars: Lightsaber Battle Game (2005) Handheld TV game \u2013 set throughout the entire saga

2006:

Star Wars GameKey (expansion) (2006)
Star Wars Galaxies: The Complete Online Adventures (2006) Windows
Lego Star Wars II: The Original Trilogy (2006) Windows, PlayStation 2, PlayStation Portable, Xbox, Xbox 360, Nintendo GameCube, Nintendo DS, Game Boy Advance, Mac
Star Wars: The Best of PC (2006) (Compilation) Windows
Star Wars: Lethal Alliance (2006) (Action-adventure) PlayStation Portable, Nintendo DS \u2013 set between episodes III &amp; IV
Star Wars: Empire at War (2006) Windows, Mac OS X
Star Wars: Empire at War: Forces of Corruption (expansion) (2006) Windows

2007:

Star Wars Battlefront: Renegade Squadron (2007) PlayStation Portable
Lego Star Wars: The Complete Saga (2007) Windows, PlayStation 3, Xbox 360, Nintendo DS, Wii, Mac, iOS, Android
Star Wars: Empire at War: Gold Pack (game and expansion package) (2007) Windows
Star Wars: Original Trilogy (2007) Jakks Pacific TV Game

2008:

Star Wars: The Clone Wars \u2013 Lightsaber Duels (2008) - Wii
Star Wars: The Clone Wars \u2013 Jedi Alliance (2008) - Nintendo DS
Star Wars: The Force Unleashed (2008) Windows, Mac OS, Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, PlayStation 2, PlayStation Portable, Wii, Nintendo DS, iPhone OS
Star Wars: The Force Unleashed Mobile (2008)
Sharpshooter Clone Training (2008)
Live Fire (2008)
Star Wars: Jedi Math (2008) (Educational) Leapster
Star Wars: Jedi Reading (2008) (Educational) Leapster
Star Wars: The Clone Wars (2008) (Platform/Educational) Didj

2009:

Star Wars: Trench Run (2009) - iOS, Unity
Star Wars: The Clone Wars \u2013 Republic Heroes (2009) - Windows, PlayStation 2, Nintendo DS, PlayStation Portable/PlayStation Vita, Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, Wii
Star Wars Battlefront: Elite Squadron (2009) PlayStation Portable, Nintendo DS
Star Wars: The Force Unleashed - Ultimate Sith Edition (2009) Windows, Mac OS, Xbox 360, PlayStation 3
Lego Star Wars: The Quest for R2-D2 (2009) Unity[3]
Star Wars Battlefront: Mobile Squadrons (2009)[14]
Star Wars: Jedi Trials (2009) Didj
Star Wars: Republic Squadron (2009) Jakks Pacific TV Game

2010:

Star Wars Arcade: Falcon Gunner (2010) - iOS
Clone Wars Adventures (2010) - Windows, Mac
Star Wars: Knights of the Old Republic III (2010) Windows, Xbox (Cancelled)
Star Wars: The Force Unleashed II (2010) Windows, Wii, Nintendo DS, Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, iPhone OS
Star Wars Cantina (2010)[15]
Star Wars Battle of Hoth (2010)[16]
Star Wars Arcade: Falcon Gunner (2010)[17]

2011:

Star Wars: The Old Republic (2011) (MMORPG) Windows
Lego Star Wars III: The Clone Wars (2011) PlayStation 3, Xbox 360, Nintendo DS, Nintendo 3DS, Wii, PlayStation Portable, Windows, Mac
Star Wars: Imperial Academy (2011)

2012:

Kinect Star Wars (2012) (Kinect) Xbox 360
Angry Birds Star Wars (2012)

2013:

Star Wars Episode IV: A New Hope (2013) - multiplatform pinball video game
Star Wars Episode V: The Empire Strikes Back (2013) - multiplatform pinball video game [1]
Star Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi (2013) - multiplatform pinball video game [1]
Star Wars: The Clone Wars (2013) - Multi-platform pinball game[1]
Rise of the Hutt Cartel (expansion pack) (2013)
Lego Star Wars: The Yoda Chronicles (2013) Android, iOS
Star Wars Pinball (2013) Windows, Mac, Wii U, Xbox 360, 3DS, PSVita, PlayStation 3, PlayStation 4, Kindle Fire, Android, iOS

Star Wars Pinball: The Empire Strikes Back
Star Wars Pinball: The Clone Wars
Star Wars Pinball: Boba Fett
Star Wars Pinball: Balance of the Force (2013) Xbox 360, PSVita, PlayStation 3, PlayStation 4, Android, iOS
Star Wars Pinball: Return of the Jedi
Star Wars Pinball: Darth Vader
Star Wars Pinball: Starfighter Assault
Star Wars 1313 (2013) (Action-adventure) (Cancelled)
Star Wars: First Assault (2013) (First-person shooter) (Cancelled)
Angry Birds Star Wars II (2013)
Star Wars Knights Of The Old Republic (2013)
Lego Star Wars: The Complete Saga (2013)
Lego Star Wars: The Yoda Chronicles (2013)
Star Wars: Force Collection (2013)[18]
Star Wars: Tiny Death Star (2013)

2014:

Galactic Starfighter (expansion pack) (2014)
Galactic Strongholds (expansion pack) (2014)
Shadow of Revan (expansion pack) (2014)
Star Wars Pinball: Heroes of the Force (2014) Xbox 360, PSVita, PS3, PS4, Android, iOS
Star Wars Pinball: Masters of the Force
Star Wars Pinball: A New Hope
Star Wars Pinball: Droids
Star Wars Pinball: Han Solo
Star Wars: Attack Squadrons (2014) (Cancelled)
Star Wars: Assault Team (2014)[19]
Star Wars: Commander (0 BBY) - Android, iOS, Windows Phone (2014) [20]
Star Wars: Galactic Defense (32 BBY-4 ABY) - Android, iOS (2014). Spans the Rise of the Empire Era and the Rebellion Era.
Journeys: The Phantom Menace (32 BBY) - iOS (2014)
Journeys: Beginnings (32 BBY-19 BBY) - iOS (2014)
Star Wars Rebels: Ghost Raid (5 BBY) - StarWars.com, Disney.com (2014)
Star Wars Rebels: Rebel Strike (5 BBY) - Disney.com (2014)

2015:

Knights of the Fallen Empire (expansion pack) (2015)
Star Wars: Battle Pod (2015) (Rail shooter) Arcade \u2013 set during the time of episodes IV through VI
Disney Infinity 3.0 (2015) (Action-adventure, sandbox) Microsoft Windows, PlayStation 3, PlayStation 4, Xbox 360, Xbox One, Wii U, iOS, Android
Star Wars: Galaxy of Heroes (32 BBY-4 ABY) - Android, iOS (2015). Spans the Rise of the Empire Era, Rebellion Era, and the Era of the New Republic.
Star Wars: Uprising (Between 4 ABY and 34 ABY) - Android, iOS (2015)
Star Wars: Heroes Path (0 BBY) - iOS (2015)
Star Wars Rebels: Recon Missions (5 BBY) - Android, iOS, Windows Phone (2015)
Star Wars Battlefront (2015)

2016:

Untitled BioWare Star Wars Game
Untitled Visceral Games Star Wars Gamehttps://www.reddit.com/r/StarWars/comments/3oebzm/in_defense_of_the_star_wars_prequels_let_go_of/cvwknfgI saw a lot of tactical application on BF and a lot of voice chat team work. But part of the lack of structure was the fun, not just random arcade shooting.I never saw that on the PC version.I mean... they didn't really have an AAA budget for development, with one it may have been different.

It's my biggest concern about Cyberpunk 2077.Maybe you played the Xbox version?It had about 44 - 49 million in actual production of the game. That's also very low for a high-end RPG, look at the scales.I think it would, because it was extremely low for production of an actual RPG, even if that was just 100,000,000 development, basically 2x larger, If eel the game would have had the polish and design it really needed.Is this your signature? Doesn't look like it to me!Would you like to know more?The pod claim mode got repetitive real quick though sadly and had very little differentiation.You may need to go back to school, that's not "the first thing", that's more than one.Dogs aren't commodities. You don't kill one just to fit in another. You are a terrible person.It's listed as the sequel though if you dig into it.Booby trapping something would result in a nasty lawsuit and possibly criminal charges. I would not risk it.It is a pumpkin... Who in heavens honestly expects tetanus from a pumpkin?I actually used the word propensity until I saw massive vote trolls bent up on my comments. But no, however all the browser, phone, and majority of games were.On that site yes, but on Wikipedia it lists it as sequel and on other sites other things.Yeah no way should that happen. As a person studying accounting and having learned the tax code, that is insane. There are by far thousands of useless parts of the code that don't help anyone but corporations selfishly.To be honest people seem entirely unaware that when the tax law itself is actually created or modified that the people advising them are.. corporate lobbyists.That won't fly with an attorney.The Republic Commando series by Karen Traviss was definitely unique and fleshed out the clones and troopers and Mandalorians but that seems to have directly been retconned by the Clone Wars TV series. Order 66 likewise seems retconned.... That is more of a cheap insult than anything else.

Try scotch and cigars.We should be hating the government, instead we hate people who want the government to do something.. The whole conservative / pro-rich mindset needs to stop.Then the banker loses all the cookies.No, no don't even do that. Don't even skew or distort like that.

Corporations are the people influencing the lines. Lobbyists are in every facet of leadership influence. They even lobby the tax committees.No, that's news, they're also anti police, and anti logic.Never heard anyone say that about Call of Duty.. have heard a lot towards Counterstrike because of its unrealism and poor balance and community. Battlefield? Perhaps the older ones,t he newer ones require repetitive grinding.

Unreal Tournament wasn't that difficult to be honest.

I'd say casual just means that everything seems overly scripted during multiplayer, like background funneling.You realize that's 100% right?

And they also have influence over numerous policies and committees and even the tax code.Wait... recess is gone?Power rangers has been around for a while and is still current today as they have so many series.Peeing in a urinal.So it's not just me? :)Financial aid.No you really can't.You forget about endowments and the class divide.There are indeed benefits not related to being smart for going there.The job creation metrics are not nearly as.. valid as the proponents try to make it seem. A big company moving in does create jobs but there are costs."expansion packs"

I believe you meant map-pack / dlc.... .... .....

WHAT DOES THIS HAVE TO DO WITH MODERN BLACK OPS 3?

I actually wondered if we'd get a high-end modern zombies game but nope.

Ah well, here's my cash.Well you're supposed to use a wingsuit while skydiving so.. perhaps you need to jump higher.Orwell's world is real but Huxley keeps us from seeing it. There, both at the same time. Also we're Orwell to everyone else and Huxley to ourselves. We even recognize it.Just be sure you check his numbers before believing them. As always, things aren't what people say.Sarah Palin doesn't follow Christianity, she simply calls herself a Christian.

Evangelical: "of or according to the teaching of the gospel or the Christian religion."

I'm non-denominational, but we all focus on the gospel of Jesus.The bible determines that, and she's taken actions and shown no repentance towards them which make it clear she's not actively portraying herself as a Christian.

That's not uncommon. She's entirely bought and paid for.What you're doing is what politicians do--tell me what I'm apparently saying even though I'm the one saying it.

Corporations are not innocent, they are the ones corrupting the lines. Likewise, they're the ones taking advantage of it.

The people that let them do that? They too are to blame but it's impossible to know if anyone could truly resist all that for long.Perhaps /u/Stevemlutz is already at the bottom and so has no idea what could be beneath him.
... OR he is so rich that he can't fathom the poor.But now it's Judy's turn to cry Judy's turn to cry Judy's to cry......ii..y..... because.. Johnny's come back.. to ME!So where's your post trilogy?That's intentional. It's easy to have "good for nothing people that did nothing to get rich" and to hate them. It's a trap. Hate won't change them and it's the hate that makes people like them.But he'll be refuse the offer, then the next person will work a bit and then leave and then finally Abrams will come by. I get it.Just because it's impossible to know doesn't mean it's "okay". The lobbyists are specifically being paid to do such a job. The politicians are being paid to run the government and still allowing a conflict of interest. The majority of the "legal ways" are made legal due to lobbyists allowing them to be. Further the legal ways used to be illegal.

If you are the one defining the confines of the law and you are just a corporation or a group of corporations, then you are not following the law.Actually, certain wolves started not being aggressive due to food hunger and were rewarded with food or shelter or both, in time prior to any breeding occurred, the animals protected us from other wolves that did not get the shelter or food. In time we then bred these and they became many years later the first "dogs".

But without them we may never have lasted against all the wolves.Lol. That's not the banker that's a receptionist.. It's a phone call, and the banker claimed the cookies as collateral and then reinvested them.That was more regular zombie survival. No assault mechs versus zombies. Also the game had issues.There's only one guard? Ehh extraordinary circumstances. File a tax return deduction and deduct the cost of the new queen.WARNING: IMMEDIATE COLLISION DETECTED!

Analyzing wealth level of occupants:

Poor... Slave... Medium... High... RICH!

RICH OCCUPANTS DETECTED!
GLOBAL EMERGENCY!
PRIME MANDATE: IMPORTANT PEOPLE MUST BE PRESERVED AT ALL COSTS

- Running through possible options... FOUND

- Initiating Protocols...
...
...
...
...
- SOLUTION FOUND, CALLING FOR EMERGENCY GRAVITY TETHERS

*Sixteen [the entire counties worth of emergency vehicles mind you] gravity tether equipped vehicles arrive and reduce the craft to a coasting stop*That was never our situation in Michigan.Though we're too poor to give it.They don't know laws surrounding corporate tax either, there's a lot of... sneakiness.Title could be reworked to be honest, but he's very cute!The problem here is that your message should be heard, but you're on a vocal minority website. Honestly you'd need the whole of reddit to make a movement like that even get noticed by the majority offline.It might not be my thing but I'll admit it'd be a strange world if everyone wanted and agreed with me.. though it'd probably be better by quite a bit too..This is more something you ask r science and then read up on what you hear for a few days. This is not something you just take because you see it typed on a random sub.Well the same thing happens when police patrol streets or are on the beat. Statistically people commit less crimes and feel more secure. It's all the concept of someone watching.No. You were distorting, skewing, misrepresenting statements, and overall trying to cause a problem. It screams out from your words. A bit sickening.

There are issues. Whether it's the minority or the majority is impossible to tell with what limited info we have and you sure won't find the truth on this highly bias and misrepresenting sub called news, or in reddit at all unless it's something scientific in a particular sub.

You use the word murder for instance but we all know that officers have to take down criminals and that doesn't mean it's always a murder. You highlight terms just to antagonize and cause problems.

Right now we can't make any progress so long as you keep holding us back from a discourse reasonably.There are problems yes. But if we take your tone to the task and we distort and misrepresent and antagonize like you are, we will only push them further and further together and you will only be reinforcing that which you hate.

From now on, only state things in an unemotional context regarding this subject. Only refer to points or information that you've posted as a citation and has been properly vetted. Only mention research articles and valid criteria such as that, and of course.. divorce yourself of the antagonistic terms.
Misusing all those terms, skewing, distorting, sarcasm.

Is this your own personal sub? Because that's why everyone off this sub knows not to believe anything at face value posted in News. It's literally the laughing stock of reddit because.. well there's so little facts here. The majority of top posts are just as distorted as yours as are the comments and the information doesn't line up.

Let's say there are.. 30 million officers in the US and let's say 15% are corrupt. Actually let's say 33% because as humans we are horrible humans. Let's say a majority of those 33% have been at it for a while and so have cushy positions or officer positions because they stick together

While a good officer might want to do something if they even see anything wrong in the first place as they may not be around those people often or in different divisions.. so does a good civitzen want to remove corruption and evil from congress. A totally corrupted and bought out corporate congress. But no one does... You cannot tear apart one group and ignore your own lack of action on what really matters.

Congress probably has led to mass murders, corruption, evil, and all manner of skewed but broken laws. But it would be distortion to label them without the facts specifically and even then it wouldn't help.It does seem a bad game though. It's generic and simplistic and it feels entirely prepared for monetization.Well CD does focus on a high quality even if they have lower budgets. EA has higher budgets but lower quality and they force their developers to follow that mentality. Look at the degradation of bioware and visceral.I'm really more interested in another concept... Do people realize the president doesn't have supreme power and authority? Does Bernie even?It shouldn't be, but as always the internet is only good at complaining unless a meme or trend comes. There is no Bernie memes or trends to support him.

He's the best option even if he's not the ultimate fix, but no one really cares. We still hate downward as previously mentioned but we also still get into the problem of D vs R. Both sides are irrelevant, voting history and fixing corruption has to be the priority. There has to be actual drive to remove corruption and people talking about it, being activists about it, and potentially even forcing representatives to acknowledge it.

End game? So many changes one president couldn't do it.But even battlefield is better than this. The whole power up approach is just stupid.They do, but it's unfathomable to me. How can people look at this in any way and think it's good when it's very genetic and repetitive and has no real quality design or gameplay theorem anywhere in it? I can't comprehend this. I also can't comprehend the focus on masses of terrible Indies and saying that's quality nor can I even quantify the concept of prevalence of MOBA. All things with huge issues.But it is a reskin... Just with a few changes.Which incidentally is why I can't get into those. The graphics need an update and even the new shadow games are still using that old graphic style. I just can't do it.Vehicles were walked up to, weapons were prepared for you from the start, not power ups, sure the vehicle control system has always been shit but there were variable types including helicopters and craft and such that made it feel more real. Truly BF2 was a better implement of battlefield but three and four are still full of more features than this.It's come out... But the power is still in power.Regardless of what you think about her, had the US had a proper health care system we wouldn't need this lawsuit. She'd just get things checked out and dealt with.There's never enough money.Well Obama had a voting history contradicting him though, still he did try to do what he said. The resistance was rough.That is their hostile measure.A while back about five months after launch we saw that there wasn't any fulfillment of the promises given. Continual character and class story. Focus on flash points and implementation of high quality story and gameplay, and continual content of that sort... It was just not there. Bugs weren't being fixed either. So an exodus of hundreds of thousands of subscribers came pretty quickly. They adapted by focusing on the free to play market instead.

I hear this new expansion is a way to return to the old ways but it's too late for that. Their new style and focus is exactly what WoW focuses on in terms of raids and PvP. But it is done worse and there is less content in general.

The general chat and community is also equally as toxic as League style.The trend is voice. I enjoy it and the majority want it.What he wants could happen in a political revolution... If corporations sat still and just let it. We both know that won't happen and thus he may not have the clout to get it done. Bernie needs more media presence and to just talk about the hard stuff no one wants to mention. Expose the corruption. But the internet needs to support him in word and deed. That's unlikely.It honestly just feels like an arcade game honestly. Like a literal play this at GameWorks arcade game. That... Isn't what we expected. If they didn't want the fans from the previous games they'd of called it differently so it is confusing.Cigarettes and watching Sports.

Also being vulgar.If this is working hard... I'm a little baffled. But if they want them to flock to it but won't put in a quality game or content then surely they know we will leave.Well good story. But I can't play old games anymore. I'm used to more resolution, graphics, perspectives. A minimum must he met.My family is British or hails from there but I can relate.I played it in beta. I ... Can not fathom your response.If I recall, she was punished. The reform happened later.What if that was you, your child, your wife, and your best friend?...... ..... This is some serious misrepresentation and wild theory jumping you're making.Okay. TehRoot raped me, he molested me, my virginity was stolen and he told me he'd kill me if I ever told anyone. I fear for my life everyday, can't sleep soundly and have fallen into a deep depression. Please get this deviant off the streets please help me!

Any woman says that about you in Texas, you better be prepared. Btw, many cases of imprisonment or harm or even rape have been later proven False or entirely fraudulent.

Also, just in case you think that it doesn't qualify as a capital murder offense... You also killed my dog, the last vestige of my sanity and all that I loved in the world. *Points at dead dog*. I'm a very vindictive woman that really wants revenge against you. I can probably come up with some more points. Eventually it'll work.Just read the huge list of negatives about it and you'll pretty much see how I feel. I've read the list of "positives" from it but most are so subjective that there's no real objective factors.

Usually when people enjoy a game that is objective poorly designed or of low quality design or lacks content the answer is addiction, like Destiny, and you find out that they used psychologists to create addictive mechanics that interact with the brain, like with MOBAs and such. But I don't see this here.. it just seems.. honestly in the most simplistic terms it just seems like its a bad game. There's really no saving graces I can see in it.

I would normally say I'm glad you enjoyed it because that's polite but in this case I'm not. People enjoying... the sheer deprivation of any real sense of content or quality from this game is something that will continue this degradation. Perhaps it's time I put away games if this is what games are becoming.Well consider this. Are you so sure?

Clearly following the law needs to be the factor. Taking a stand can represent something sure and perhaps something should be changed, but up until then the law needs to be followed and punishments for not following the law are required as a means of justice. An injust law may nay need to be repealed but until then.. the law must be dealt with.

If you actively seek to subvert and not follow the law then that is your own choice and perhaps it's even commendable but if we start picking and choosing which laws we do and do not follow.. then we have serious problems.Negatives such as the powerups? Such as the random chaos due to no real game-theorem design principles being used? Negatives such as repetitive factors, poor controls, the fact Battlefront was never even a FPS to begin with? The lack of a campaign, the heavily monetized and apparent focus? I'm not sure exactly what negatives don't make sense.Snowden isn't a politician, he completely misread how people would react and John Oliver actually made him seem more relatable than he clearly was. ON TEXT sure he can make a few reddit posts or twitter posts properly.. but he needs PR badly.No no. Not every redditor ever. It's not that I can't comprehend you have an opinion or a different view. It's that from an objective sense they don't make any sense to me. It's as if you had an opinion that the sun was cold... as if your experience was somehow not seeing that it was in fact warm and nothing could change that.

I quite honestly see no saving grace in it in any sense. It is objectively full of poor design and lacks the basic tenets of game principles and theorem. I can not understand its popularity, but I can understand the hatred towards it. I recognize this is EA so this is what we have grown to expect, except this isn't even 1% what Battlefront was, much less Battlefront was never even an FPS game.They are a huge negative, one because they're not even randomized so you can still camp them and what not and it's really more towards who gets there first. Two there's no ability to deprive someone of something so tactics are removed. Three, they are randomized in terms of items or weapons and grenades to the point it makes little sense. The lack of customization is the justification for it but.. it still makes no sense. Vehicles occupying the same slot as a powerup also make no sense. Nothing makes any sense.No, I simply can not deal with certain older styles due to progression, higher quality expectations, and familiarity and preference. That's COMMON not minority. It's statistically very few that play old games over and it's very few that can deal with older graphic styles to, considering the larger population size of the gaming base.As an off handed statement not in that context. The only suspicious fact is that the article which isn't in a very reputable place, makes a remark of "interestingly" insinuating sinister factors or some such thing. That is just shifty journalism.Some are better, no need to make blanket statements.It's better than ES by far in my opinion...... Fine then. Every game in the past is better than any game now. Let me go start up Superman 64.Shouldn't all of them be loved though? If they're not then you may want to investigate. I mean in terms of the general form of all officers interacting with the community.I'm simply indicating that all officers need to get back into investing time in the community and seen as a beacon of justice and support.Obama... What. What are you doing?That's because the huge lists of issues have already been posted or quoted so many times. I simply express support towards them by statement. What I've said isn't really general though. That's all very substantive.

Game theory is a big part of game development, this game plays as if it lacks it.I added a dog death. That's very seriously taken in Texas. I also mentioned as a vindictive woman I'm willing to do more or enlist more in getting you charged. Because I hate you.

Also thread of murder if I speak is often considered in the same league as intent to commit murder.You should really pay more attention to what happens and has happened in Texas. In any case. I also said I'm willing to do more.Jango Fett skin twenty.The majority usually isn't wrong so much as simply not True. Because the majority has a variety of beliefs. But is a trend to change to voice acting and I like it. Worked well with Mass Effect 1 and 2 for instance.No, congress does. Good luck there.So... that's not exactly how it all works. There's a lot of levels of control and such. The president cannot simply say it and have it done. That's never been how any of our groups worked. Even for things that are controlled like the Marines, there's still congress based oversight outside of a small window.I actually delete most of my posts in very heated subs after a while, you've viewed very little of my content history here.

I said I expected due diligence, no one enters a debate unprepared.Bullets and bottle caps. I'm going to trade these for other things in the apocalypse.You have atrocious understanding of the word trolling and all my posts have been definitely accurate regardless of trolling done towards me by many.

I've been around for several years prior to this account on others. I've got a rich life on the internet. So no you know very little and even on this one my posts from prior get deleted when I don't want them to be trolled any longer.

I'll be sure to tag you as a troll thoughtYou still haven't done any due diligence either. And you've tried to label me as a troll clearly showing you don't know it means.. among other issues.It's the only thing he ever had of his own!I'm not going to lie, when I think of college I see loans and so when I read college I thought the SupCourt had killed student loans.. oh the joy I felt.You pay for that..How'd that work for Detroit?They still have the corrupt city council and government.Downtown and most suburbs are pretty good.I did say most.Not True.Of statistics are made up.Wait, not shot?So you'll actually give us a source? OP Might deliver partially then. Better than nothing.I read this while eating steak at Campus Martius restaurants.Yes the city council has been a huge factor.I could be privileged and black or brown, or perhaps I saved up some money. or just had a job and used money from said job?

I actually read this during Holiday Dinner.As an actual statistician I can tell you you're wrong, as 90% of statisticians know that 90% of statistics are made up because we do it on purpose.

And being the internet I have no reason to lie.Sometimes you REALLY wanted to kill that bitch and you're just glad you did.Being disabled does not mean you suffer from mental retardation a term that no one really even dares to use in the medical profession because people misused and abused it so extremely that it's lost all meaning.Traditionally there's a vocal majority which is a real-life vocal minority and a silent minority here that is the silent majority.

There is generally a trend and so it's more Reddit is two people.Generally because they can rile the large group.The problem is, being muslim, one has to consider exactly what it is they believe so that one actually understands what they think or agree or disagree with regarding the implementation of Shariah Law.I believe he's factoring in the number of people that expressed belief with the Muslim faith about shariah law being correct and such things.People were lying and distorting OBama care from day 1.. IN BOTH directions. It was impossible to learn what any facts would be.

A PROPER non corporate corrupted affordable care system paid by the state or a single-payer mechanism would have been perfect, damn the Republican incompetent naysayers, but sadly we got something very different.Congress is corrupt and controlled by corporations, let's not ignore how pathetic Congress is. Same with the judicial branch.And it would have, or more. But the ACA isn't what passed. The ACA that passed was a corrupt congress version of negotiations and riders.How do I get returns from credit?But corporations elected them... so they got what they wanted in truth.The moral of this thread: Corporations are corrupt and Congress is too.They don't start with Obama they start with congress. The people wanted a real medical insurance program that was reasonable, they WERE getting one, but then congress and their corporate backers got their hands on the bill and that led to another thing.You mean pedantic. But you're answering with a vague definition. Being disabled doesn't mean you're less advanced. It simply means there's something you either temporarily or permanently aren't able to do as well. There are a plethora of things you cannot do as well as others your age but that doesn't mean you're either disabled, handicapped or suffering from mental retardation.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Retardation

All it means is that there's a significant impairment somewhere, which makes things harder or requires some type of accommodation. An example would be an inability to take tests as quickly as others because of a focusing issue or some such, that's an example of something considered a handicap and it does not make you retarded or less advanced or less capable.

A more severe one might be someone who isn't as proficient as comprehending social cues and signs. This too would merit accommodations and special assistance to help thrive despite that but it has no bearing on how advanced or capable or smart or intelligent or physically fit someone is. Just like losing an arm might make you as handicapped as someone who didn't have one or the ability to use a particular arm of theirs for a variety of reasons.

Are they less capable? Arguably yes it'll be a deficiency that they'll have to do, hence the handicap, but they're not less advanced in any type of development.

While the word "retarded" which is referred to as in that context "mental retardation" is extremely abused, it does have actual meanings and it doesn't help anyone to constantly abuse that word as an insult or to use it all unless you don't know specifically what it stands for. To this day there has never been a single instance of my hearing anyone use the word from doctor, physician, therapy worker, counselor, psychologist, or anyone.. outside of the abuse by people who've no idea.

It is quite honestly just as bad as racist terms in my view as it has no value whatsoever in its abused state.

TL;DR: The word is so extremely abused that it is NO LONGER even a recognized clinical term.

Edit: It should be noted that more extreme versions of intellectual disability situations do exist and those do indeed provide extreme handicaps and may even result from poisoning, drug usage while in the womb and other such factors and these could lead to a deficient development because of outside factors, but those people rarely have a physical sign of show damage statistically and those that do usually just suffer from the same issues. Still, many of them can with assistance and reasonable accommodations, become proficient at life. Those that CANNOT are another matter entirely. Traditionally though, you just have developmental handicaps.As a piece of advice, if you're going to quote what someone says and mock it, you should at least provide the conflicting information reinforcing your point in the post. Common courtesy. Otherwise it's just mocking which should rightfully be downvoted.

Ahh it seems some downvote trolling hit here.. well it is News so I shouldn't be surprised. Civility, decency, truth in sources, and proper research have never really been the cornerstone here.Interesting assumption, but no one advocates it:

**"Unfortunately there's no agreement in medicine, philosophy or theology as to what stage of foetal development should be associated with the right to life.**

**That isn't surprising, because the idea that there is a precise moment when a foetus gets the right to live, which it didn't have a few moments earlier, feels very strange.**

**And when you look closely at each of the suggested dates, they do seem either arbitrary or not precise enough to decide whether the unborn should have the right to live.**

**Nonetheless, as a matter of practicality many abortion laws lay down a stage of pregnancy after which abortion is unlawful (because the foetus has a right to life), and the dates chosen are usually based on viability."**

Has nothing to do with being born, and even if it did so many people have different beliefs of what that word means, from conception, brain development, womb-development, and so on. Do not try to hand wave this into a simple discussion, it never was and it still isn't.

Edit: If you disagree, I advise you to actually do some research and try to present a counterpoint, otherwise doing any research just to know better would also be informative and better rather than having these ridiculous comments made with no real backing to them whatsoever.To be completely honest but not bias, in terms of any religious person, if God asked them to kill, they would. There's this whole believing that's he's a God thing. So in essence any truly faithful person would do anything for their God so long as it didn't violate their faith or was seen merely as a test of faith.

Saying that you'd "Kill for Allah", while perhaps extreme in this case, is pretty much just like saying "I'd kill to protect what's important to me" which for most would be their children and family and perhaps friends and for a religious person would extend to the greatest entity in existence to them.

This shouldn't be seen as odd. the acting out of it provided no indication of feeling asked directly by God to do so.. that's what is odd.

I say this as a person that does indeed believe in the Christian God from a non-denominational approach. If God directly commanded me to do anything and it wasn't in contradiction to his teachings.. I'd feel a pretty compelling reason to do it.Right but what is your income? If you're making 500,000 then honestly that isn't really a comparison.Your car.This doesn't help anyone though. If someone wants to know why you're arguing they can't, they just see you disagreeing and some random people upvoting or agreeing with you or making hurtful comments.

That doesn't help anyone and to most rational people it'll just paint you as an inconsiderate troll.

As for common sense:

https://www.psychologytoday.com/blog/the-power-prime/201107/common-sense-is-neither-common-nor-sense

You violate common sense every day, just like mostly everyone. I believe the proper thing would be to say "Source?""Soon" being a relative term.The emperor has invited you to Lake Laogai.Depends on if it was built to have a perimeter defense against MOAB's and missiles and such.Generally I destroyed them.Silly, all land is china.So you believe that it is a human meaning that it has the rights of a human, but not a person prior to growth of brain synapses. Okay. Many would disagree, including a vast immensity of the medical field. Hence why I said the debate is extensive.It's more the principle of the matter. I personally think humanity is fine without recreational drugs. I do my best to live that even if I fail at times. A place that has decided to be more open and accepting of such things is naturally not something I'd be too keen on especially if it attracted increased tourism prospects for people that were interested in such a thing.

As for this discussion board.. it might be the intent but the reality is sadly that honesty and being amiable are not common if even infrequent on this website.But you've identified it as a human, it simply needs to develop brain synapses as a human to be a person. So unless you're saying you made a mistake in your terminology then you contradict yourself.

Regardless, the point remains that the medical, scientific, and psychological profession disagree with you in part, as many believe otherwise. In truth there is no definitive medical confirmation of just when someone starts becoming a person. Any type of development whatsoever is enough for some doctors.I espouse that we are able to become the best of ourselves without any limitation or impedance by recreational drugs and such similar things.

Upon which reliance is all but a given and a significant detriment.Incorrect, in fact I gave no indication of what did and didn't qualify. I'll repeat what I said to counter your attempt to distort and hand-wave immaturely.

The medical, scientific, and psychological profession is divisive on what identifies someone as sufficiently developed to be protected.

Some believe it is development in the womb which means the MOMENT you begin to develop within the womb. Some believe it is the moment you reach cognitive capability. Some believe it is the moment you exit the body. Still others believe that it is based on a variety of other factors.Only EA has a license for Star Wars now, and BioWare and Visceral Games already both have an untitled Star Wars game.

Obsidian hasn't worked on AAA for a while anyway and their focus on Indie has likely soured that relationship.I've stopped watching any of those, their reviews no longer seem to be objective, they miss or intentionally avoid discussing significant factors and their reviews have serious favoritism or bias.

Instead I just watch non-commentary style let's plays or segments of a game.

I use AngryLlama (a bit vulgar in his comments admittedly) and xLetalis to get this type, but if I need it for some other game they don't go through quick enough for me then I use someone else.I love how it makes people sound more manly. :-)In many ways, one you're not just using natural grown marijuana right from its origination state. Two, the drug term usually refers to something that puts you in a drugged state or has an impact on your mind in a significant way through brain-chemistry changes either through brute force or subtle manipulations.

Nothing you've said changes those or other realities.

I can assure you I do far too much research as it is. The term "drug" has nothing to do with stigmatization so much as how it interacts with the body and brain. What a native tribe does matters not, they did something similar with tobacco.Addiction to social dynamics and whatever mechanic Reddit forces me to keep checking over time is why I'm on Reddit. I'm aware of the addiction and much like if I were found to be addicted to something else, I am putting forth as much effort as I can to reduce it and return it to a safe state or eliminate it entirely.

As for the internet? It's a tool, nothing more. It simply has various uses of that tool.Which has no relation to Angi.Really just use crafting to make infinite lightning bolt armor.It doesn't matter. You're indicating something they said as if it's wrong with no context or sourcing or reasoning of why. It's obviously not common sense as the factor as that was just proven to yo to be a farce, one which you like everyone fails every day. So why is it so hard for you to counter? Is it because honestly you have no idea how to counter? Do you need help? It's okay to ask for help or to just say that it sounds silly, rather than defend yourself with these lies and poor understanding of information and immature insults and terms you don't know how to use properly.

Oh you're the one who needs the google search, believe me.My minding my own body or doing my best to doesn't in any way give you authority to tell me what I can care about or say things about and likewise doesn't preclude or prevent me from desiring the advancement of the human civilization as a whole.

The answer to the majority of your questions is no, the supplemental answer is that none are over indulged and nothing is used to a point it can cause any significant influence or state of being drugged.I personally don't see why that one is more impressive it's too far away to really tell the quality of the explosion in my personal opinion.You uh didn't address all her points or at least explain why some of the things she experienced were hers. You'd be a terrible teacher and also a terrible person at truly getting anyone to think a different way.

Btw, you didn't prove me stupid.. in truth you only proved me correct by finally doing a little research. That being said, it would obviously be better if your sources came from scholarly archives or papers but we can use this as a growing venture.

I'd also recommend better attention paid to your usage of words, as your attempts to insult me have all been with improper terminology that you clearly do not understand the definitions of and have spawned as a result of being confronted and forced to.. provide some measure of reinforcement.

You also misused imbecile but obviously if you're misusing all the other terms in some vain attempt to insult me immaturely.. well it was an established precedent and so a trend was likely.The reply was entirely truthful, factual, and rational. Your aversion comes from what?I asked you to essentially provide explanations, you didn't really, you did provide links which is improvement but it'd be better if you saw her assertions and responded like a scientist with, first addressing the issue,w y it might be wrong, and why she may have experienced what she did due to other factors.

Your immaturity continues. You seem to be unable to understand the definition of the word, stupid, imbecile, lazy, etc. Likewise even if you did research their definitions it is quite clear you would misuse them and misrepresent situations to your advantage.

You exhibit all the hallmarks of a troll, a very uneducated one.

Edit: Obviously after you failed at trying to insult me with any degree of significance, like most bullies and trolls you gave up and used some hand-wave comment to run off.

It is not a boon to this world that people such as yourself can see how they act and what they do and be okay with it.I don't typically like condiments. But no that isn't how I come across at all, your perception is noted but it seems entirely skewed and distorted by intention.

Even if it WERE not that it is, everything I said is something that's good, to be proud of, and that we need more of, not less if we want society to improve.

I enjoy skydiving though.I personally feel that when the third party titles are excluded that the Xbox One on its own isn't in a very healthy state in terms of exclusives. With the next highly lauded one (as Tomb Raider is extremely temporary) coming with Quantum Break and it not being a for sure great title.. well this doesn't hold well.

Primarily it's been a little disappointing so I use it mostly as a streaming and content box.We went through a cloud which isn't good, I was nervous when we were first doing the tandem dive and I had been anticipating this for a while. I didn't know when to really expect it but I had to make the first move. I was constantly going over in my head what the movement was so I got it right and I'm not sure I did one hundred percent. But I "fell" rather jumped as we are told to do and the other pushed off from the opening as the light turned green.

It was strange. You aren't incorrect that I'm not entirely as emotional as others might be, things don't generally impact me much and at first it was just really falling but it was hard to really take any specific notice of what was going on and while I had my goggles on and could see things, that didn't last quickly as I ran through a checklist of where the emergency cord would be if we needed it.

As we continued to fall which seemed to last much longer than it really was, we went directly through a cloud which made us wet but more so it made our goggles foggy, he was able to do something with his but I was unable to with mine. Having lost the clarity of sight and the feeling of ground beneath me I for once had  what I'd call anxiety and I felt a stomach ache take place which really robbed me of my enjoyment of the first jump.

We eventually landed about thirty seconds to a few past later and almost immediately upon landing and then taking my goggles off my stomach ache subsided and I was able to remark that I had completed the first jump, unintentionally redirected as it was.

I don't desire to have the feeling of lack of control again but I do enjoy the sky diving experience.Ehh no doesn't even relate, this is called forcing people to realize they can't just go insulting people and need to actually represent their points.

But you DO belong in the sub, you are correct.

Blocked and reported as is typical of trolls. Enjoy your idiocy, you do a great disservice to that name.Wrong on both counts, but I suspect you're not unfamiliar to being egregiously wrong.Am I the only one that just wanted to build a successful park?Kind of...It wasn't that simple in my opinion.I feel the repetition of that would just be really immersion breaking for me so I just scavenge.You cretin you killed Manta ManLegendary Epic Assault BotThe same thing happens toa nyone not giving the game a 10 at launch.When the USA channel was creating great content like Royal Pains, White Collar, Suits and such I was happy. But USA doesn't really seem to make anything anymore and has squelched most of their productions. It is about time I cut the cord but my parents need sports.. which I've never cared about. 

Funny thing is the Verizon Exec is wealthy and doesn't need to cut the cord to be more economical.Addiction to procrastination is a viable research subject that has a lot of traction at the moment.According to their IP they have an untitled star wars game being developed.Psh you're literally guided to one early in the game if it was truly so desirable. You were not acting like a hero, but a villain. Wait until your trusty sidekick hears about this.According to the recent integrity analysis that every state pretty much did poor in, the main issue for Florida is their entire structure.No, I already recognize the corporate corruption, degradation of society, False representation of others, antagonization, harassment, trolling, insults, and aggression given towards others of the same species, the destruction of integrity and other issues.

A drug would only be able to cloud my perceptions not open them up.

But effectively you just fell into your own problem. You're trying to tell me what I can and can't do, specifically without drugs.- http://metro.co.uk/2015/02/10/bioware-cancel-shadow-realms-working-on-star-wars-and-new-ip-instead-5056356/

- http://www.hardcoregamer.com/2015/10/06/the-force-awakens-to-usher-in-new-era-of-star-wars-games/169948/

- http://www.rpgwatch.com/forums/showthread.php?t=26486

- http://boards.theforce.net/threads/bioware-star-wars-game.50030270/

- http://www.pcgamer.com/jade-raymonds-new-ea-studio-is-working-on-viscerals-star-wars-game/

- http://www.playstationlifestyle.net/2015/11/24/amy-hennig-star-wars-visceral-games/

And so on."Harmless" is a patent lie and you know it, or else you haven't done research and don't know it.We've decided to avoid doing anything major and instead enable the governor to get richer. All in favor? AYE. The Aye's have it.Not sure you're a hero at all.

No not that sidekick. Your real sidekick. Sigh have you forgotten what it's like to be a superheroWhile David Gaider should probably never be allowed to work on any games in general, the links I gave were a handful of many that do paint a picture of something being in development it was also on wikipedia and other places and pretty much confirmed when EA made their initial Star WArs license announcement.&gt; y tripping on shrooms or acid, is by tripping alone, because if you do it alone, inexperienced, then you could potentially harm yourself. But ita not like you take it and have your reality replaced by aliens and weird colors, things move around and your sensations open up. But the main thing is how it makes you think. It makes you feel as if we are all one. What is wrong with that? Isn't that the ultimate goal of humanity? Unity?

This is not True and you're encouraging extremely risky and potentially dangerous tendencies from some anecdotal experience of your own that is bias and flies in the face of science and I won't entertain a non-science based and non-research based discussion.It's more like a deep root of corruption entirely through it. It's an interesting read to look at all the failures. Look it up.Rhett Reinhart and his butler Jarvey Blake! What type of Shroud are you? You forget your own sidekick.That would be called ANECDOTAL which is about as far from statistically and academically reliable as you can get.He had a good run in the beginning sure.. more recently? He's definitely not nice to the fans he believes are entitled which is anyone disagreeing with him, he was a horror on the old BioWare forums, he wrote DA2's shitstorm and from there it didn't get much better.Well he's entirely wrong, and the game development company is the only one to ever try to insult their customers as entitled for expecting their product to maintain the quality standards and promises given. So anyone even using that word as a rallying point against customers is entirely being stupid and should have no place in a business leadership or role of leadership.

BioWare's forums were made a wretched hive because the moderators and developers did not take care of their fans, did not deliver, frequently lied, banned naysayers and dissenters, and had the QA department moderate the entirety of the forum which caused serious conflicts of interest.

You're entitled to like DA2, the quality of its content, writing, and other such factors are empirical faults.

DA:I earns the rare ranking of a game that could actually bore me enough to never be able to return, which is not something only I experienced and while it improved things it did so at the cost of damaging many other factors.

BioWare died as an RPG maker of instant buy quality to a lot of people already. Bethesda seems to be taking that approach as well.You are aware the guy who gave you the costume...Makes you think creatively, which enables further creativity down the line.*Gotta gotta get your head in the game, get ya get ya get ya getcha head in the game!*He's your faithful Reinhart...You shouldn't have been downvoted like that, the majority of people here are just as lazy.What would a day just one day where the news told the truth and the citizenry educated themselves and intelligence and maturity ruled the day... what would it look like?Sarah Palin becomes President out of nowhere You did your duty and showed a moment of True patriotism and your country corrupt as it is exploited you. Not your fault and if not you than another. Your intent is what matters, use this experience to strengthen your resolve and become a better person more aware of the inner workings of how life and this country works.It's honest and expresses a response to someone that responded to them. Absolutely on topic.You speak Mandarin yet?

I'm not sure I could even learn it these days.Not being cited doesn't mean made up. Learn your MLA and APA.

Plus the reply I responded to had no sources.But obsidian has lost its rapport and being they own bioware it wouldn't make much sense to.hand it off.Well first your last comment is stupid. Second my statement is the standard belief,citations and sources are to disprove it. It would be his responsibility to source his outragious claims yours too.Beliefs? There is no confirmed scientific decision on it. so you have theories from all scientists and arguments to support them.

Stop distorting and trolling.

I'm far smarter than you'll ever be kid.I learned that at age 8.Oh look at me I'm from Canada I know what it is to be cold.. ooooohhhh bask in my frigid glow you cretins.11/10 with rice.And he's still secretly a terrorist so this is great news for his cover.I prefer "flappy black bird"So that's why Bieber and Pewdiepie have so many views.. now I feel mores ane.Perhaps you'll become one though and so he was right in the end. In the end Jon Snow will be the only one that really knew anything,.I personally subscribe to the point there is a mixed bag. Some may indeed be that, others that I have met, read the thoughts or have overseen interactions with have been anything but. There are terroristic elements and their influence do have far reaching impact throughout the middle-east domain and this too impacts those that would call themselves Palestinians. And of course then there's the Hamas factor.It's been the reverse for me. So we each have anecdotal experiences.... And then there's the angry posters WHO DO BUY IT who are still angry.. because of the degradation of quality and some lies.Don't forget the DLC!I find it hillarious that the "bay" is calling torrents a "sample".There's far too many bad mods clouding the good so it's near impossible for me to even navigate through them anymore.. so I tend to just avoid the mods other than a graphic update.It might be fun but the fun aspect diminishes when I see all the issues, all the lies, the degradation of quality from previous iterations and numerous other faults. Oh andw henever you convince someone with charisma? YEAH THAT KILLS IT IMMEDIATELY.

You: You should really listen to me.
Them: WOW I NEVER THOUGHT OF IT THAT WAY

WTF BETHESDA?!It's more that back when Diablo 2 came out there were a lot less things to judge it by. When Diablo 3 came out there were far more genre examples to judge it by. Fallout 4 SHOULD be judged by its previous Bethesda iterations, similar genre games of high quality, and the current years expectations of development.Except the story and content was the main issue with FO4 so I feel it would be the same issue with the new Elder Scrolls.. especially given Skyrim.It is very much a fact. I position you to read a book. Any book will do.There are more than Skyrim for story games... so your example makes no sense.

Let's try Witcher 3, Witcher 2 and Knights of the Old Republic.Is it? Let me go look at my frame-rate...Huge implementation issues of all new features, basically if you were to rank implementation of new features from 0 - 10 you'd likely need to give it below a 6 but higher than a 4.

A degradation of quality from already currently established features.TO ADD things, other than at the start it really had nor eal issues and most were Nvidia related.The problem is choices isn't what I meant. Games i've already played are more examples rather than choices. Most gamers don't revisit old games all that often.

For me each year has releases and those are my choices. the past is their competition.Okay if you're saying that then you tolerate hypocritical hateful ethnically and religiously corrupt shitbags that don't even understand history.

Why can't we just agree people are different?

You've basically stated one group should be respected but the other couldn't feasibly ever have any difference than the hatred given them and stereotypes or biases or distortions.

That's just as had .I need a video compilation but I remember some fo4 lies.It's kind of like an itch.It was a cover, he is a terrorist and he's trying to fool you. Don't let him go home unless you're following him!Objectively the components of the writing, dialog, literature, and story are poor.I'm pretty sure that if the game had been tested by its actual lead developers and QA that they could have seen all the issues in it and been like "You know this game isn't very good".You're referring to hours played as some indication of quality or good story and writing but that's not the same thing.

I gave you several examples that's not all there is. Those examples too are highly intense story games with extreme quality. There are many more.

Modding the game doesn't suddenly change the writing to be better unless you literally change the writing which wouldn't be canon so.. I'm not sure what modding has to do with the game being quality on its own.

Not everything, and he really skewed the implementation and "quality" of what he was talking about, that's for sure.I've talked with those that do.. it's usually not nearly this caring about employees and a lot more about exploiting them and using really awful corporate politics.Hello, I'm your friendly neighborhood IRS Auditor. *Knock knock*They don't need to close down though, they can afford not to, they just choose to.The majority?I'm not sure many, but some. As for all being in Seattle or some place, I think you overestimate the average skill level of most redditors.How's that corruption in congress, the government, the electorate, the candidates, and the council members working?Poverty level but the poverty line has been raising over the years and the money we've been getting has been lowering. The recession really hurt a lot of families too and they never got new jobs and never were given good retirement plans or 401k options.That's what my father makes after being let go during the recession and living on unemployment and social security and his 401k. We can kind of manage but we c an't do much.Democracy and Republican beliefs haven't truly existed for 65 years and we need to stop using these words. Two sides of the same coin just with slightly different ways of getting to the exact point. We can not continually enable corporate corruption and the degradation of society. I can not deal with it anymore... WHY ARE PEOPLE ON HERE SO IGNORANT?And how's the development of your 401k, your investment portfolio aside from that, your cars livelihood and life, your education funds for your kids, your rainy day fund, your emergency fund, your savings, your expenses, bills, options,r ecreational expenses, ability to travel.. so on and so forth.

Do not ACCEPT your poorness as okay.Nice places in Detroit are expensive.... as a person with a family living in unemployment, social security, and etc I can tell you the 22 -24,000 is not poverty because we already paid off the home but had we not the amounts would be nearly unbearable. There's no opportunity for future investment, paying off college, going on trips, doing recreational activities and further it just gets worse.

It's not for lack of trying or success either.But you shouldn't need to.Surprised millenials don't just want to send a 100,000 drones.You're right. I'm almost glad I didn't join the air force and press triggers to blow up brown people as a fighter pilot.Yes but Elder Scrolls is more about lore and exploring and open world-ness not story or writing or immersion. It's a 7 of 10 game to be honest. Just like the new Fallout even though it tried a little.I liked her. But grandma-ma was the best!She liked being called Khaleesie too..Because if you TRY to have a story you should be judged for it.Hmm, have you thought about additional fans to keep it cool and quiet?You'll want to know a few tips. First, the bounding points you'll install on the tower will sometimes.. not work out well, be sure you're doing so safely. A HUGE issue is putting the points on getting the MB and then realizing the points won't match up and struggling for an hour to get it too. Often the I/O shield is basically what you need to push the pins closer to the shield for so that you can fit things well.

The USB 3.0 cable in a case is notorious for bending the horizontal facing plugs. Make you plug in the plugs to the motherboard first when it's pretty easy to access then you route them through cable management and then you push them to the power supply.

To ground yourself plug in the power supply and touch it occasionally.I would advise we start with something simple, so a couple Air Quiet Corsair Duo fans.I'm not sure I understand the excitement for this, it was very offputting on console..It was definitely overwhelming in terms of lack of direction and poor instructions and tutorial, but it was underwhelming in terms of the combat experience and that first boss was just... ugh.Alright, so with your 24k you got all that and you're not in extreme debt? I'm calling bull shit unless you're hiding finances or some more info about past finances., otherwise your financials need an audit.For the dog.That's a bit far out of reach...Majority of Reddit are statistically 18-29.Because people made others suicidal, threatened and raged against the wrong individuals, and made others fear for their lives.Many more recent ones exist...Because you can stop a threat without killing them.Restricted though.In general your goal is to protect yourself which does not mean your goal is to kill them. Obviously you can shoot in places that matter, bullets have to hit a target or it causes problems elsewhere, but that doesn't mean you should wish their deaths nor have an intent to kill.

That said, sometimes adrenaline causes problems.You use two words that a court would have w field day with.

Neither is True. The gun isn't to harm or kill, the gun is meant to defend and protect yourself. That is why going just a bit beyond is a nightmare 

Like with the many posts about homeowners wanting to immediately turn to the use of weaponry against home invasions or even theoretical burglars which are often not intending any harm towards a person's life. Not just wanting to use it but.. being certain they want them dead.

The only time a gun should be used with the intent to kill or even harm is when you're at war or an officer.Literature analysis has really never been subjective when focusing on. Mechanicsa and fundamental components.You seem to overlook that if you include any form of it that you can justifiably be judged by it, especially when it's the key of the genre.

You make too many excuses for companies that have just gotten bad at making quality because of mandates and other such factors.Well first most home invasions are in daylight when you're not there and when the house has been cased.

But you overlook exactly what I said.

Ultimately let me rephrase for you. Whatever happens ultimately only your intent matters. If your intent was "I'm going to kill this person" you've got the mindset of a murderer. The intent should always be to protect yourself and nothing more. That way if someone does do harm against you, you aren't looked at as vindictive.

If a burglary wakes you up at night then sure you should protect yourself but you can do that without having premeditated thoughts that you'd kill the label most often identified as scum. Your intent is what matters. What's going on in your brain now or during such a thing is what shows exactly what you intended.That's fine. You said you'd shoot them. You didn't say you would harm or kill them. Your intent is to at first glance remove a threat to protect yourself.

Had you responded you're going to kill them, then you'd justifiably have a heavy court case against you, especially when you went overboard.True, but the issue I'm trying to highlight is when the desire and implemented choice is one meant to kill them rather than the focus just being on protecting yourself until you can flee or call the police.Why didn't I get told this so I could sue?It's had literature though. It also has had methods of implementing thematic design.

Whatever you put in a game should be judged and compared to those that did it better. Otherwise don't put it in.Actually they made open world rpg's while the action rpg genre has been dominated by bioware.

But they had a main quest, thematic design fundamentals, side quests, lore, writing, plot, main and side characters, gameplay, combat systems, exploration, graphics, voice acting, and numerous other features.

Many of which define the rpg genre. Justifiably they should be rated on all of these but not what they didn't include, unless what they didn't was a key rpg mechanic that was necessary.Every game has literature in it if it has a story.Buying five tb during a sale was 180 that isn't what I define s dirt cheap.I really had having to uninstall games and then reinstall them via discs. So it all stays.Perhaps most do love it immensely but we don't.Imagine if American billionaires just disappeared...The country is Christian like it or not, seeing Christian things is expected. The country is not atheist and seeing those isn't considered a part of culture like it or not.

Hence the upset people.Bew-shuuuuuuuumBuzz droids...You don't legally own digital licenses and so I have never particularly liked them, I think I could deal with digital despite the caps but eh... I have a small steam library but that's it.I use cracks to cut that out. I bought it and so it is mine. Sometimes the service is too intrinsically linked though you're right and the trend of only putting some or nothing on the disc is irritating.Just so long as your goal isn't to kill or harm them but to protect yourself.I don't ever meet anyone other than online in these niche sites that has anything much bad to say about prequels. The original trilogy though.. people have many comments.It's not all gumdrops and rainbows being blown up your ads though, there are also some issues too.

- CD Projekt Red glass door reviews show an immensity of problems and let's not forget the graphic downgrade, bland free pr dlc that was minimal and touted as epic, and some of their other issues.You say that now, but they believe they are.NO one said they didn't like something, they had comments.I didn't say that, but you said "stuff works down here", but clearly it doesn't.. and if you're comparing yourself to other states saying "well they have that too" then you're just being a hypocrite and trying to argue to argue. Every state is rife with corruption and barely works.A physical disc counts as property which I can bequeath to others if I so choose. A digital license does not have such ability unless I forfeit right of it entirely. I can also make a back-up of my physical disc for archival purposes but a digital copy has specific DRM intended to prevent this. There are a variety of things that legitimate digital copies can't do. Now if we make these into IMGs with cracks and such sure, at that point they really don't have any restrictions but also at that point you're breaking your usage rights.One has to admit the level of arrogance necessary to indicate that something beyond your understanding can't be "reasonable" or possible and should be omitted.First, liberals and every other viewpoint also agree at times that it's a Christian nation and in terms of the content it is a Christian nation now. It just isn't a particularly faithful one.You're on the Pope's list now.Well it doesn't include an open ear to sinners and madmen since the bible specifically addresses being influenced by that. But the holy spirit inspiring the creation of the Word is essentially the main conflict that leads to you're either a Christian or you're not. The faithfulness factor is whether you start actively living like a Christian rather than just believing the bare minimum requirement with all your heart.

It stands to reason that if you truly believed the bible's main point that you might seek to understand and live for Him a bit more, even if just a sign of respect.Careful now, you're quoting without context.Does anyone actually notice how big an asshole.. wait no asshole would be if you pulled down their pants.. how big of a senseless psychopath they are when doing this to the innocent NPC's?

Poor nPC's.A financial advisor can be costly, is often really more for those that can afford the consistent investments they will receive as advice, and many times is more trouble than it is worth.We should help others that's fine.W e should not be satisfied only one was helped.A company on this TV show is not operating at a loss.Oh no he had a gun!A company telling you a PR reason for removal doesn't suddenly mean they're telling the truth. Come now, think rationally.

Now if you want to look into their analysis and their financial sheets and see just how many loopholes and payments towards lobbyists and benefits from corruption there are and then settle the real results, we can go from there and see if there company is being real or not.

Also with Schlum, a company that specifically indicates people as part of the pillars, their own employees indicate it isn't so and thus that's even more reason to believe it has nothing to do with being unnecessary. They are getting rid of their consulting practice for mission statement reasons and shareholder pressure. That's it. Nothing else.

I'm failing to see how you plan to have an objective and fully informed view or analysis on these events if you're not even willing to do research and figure out the real facts.

The True reality is that corporate corruption is far too prevalent and earnings far too irrational. You shouldn't shed a single tear for any corporation.

The corporate corruption has everything to do with things when mentioning profit or revenues.The reverse is True to your views.Whenever someone tries to insult or demean someone. You can picture bullies and trolls and young idiots just standing around having to wait quietly prior to being wastes of humanity.You just stopped most accidents.No one greets so...Oh wow.Unless they always had unrealistic and irrational profit motives built by corruption. Then the obvious thing to do instead of firing would be to fix those.You are telling me something and it can be also told to you.I more referring to what Galle_ said, in that people not liking doesn't make it a bad movie either. I already know the "objective" reasons people refer to and I feel they can be debated.For some reason I can clearly see this is a human with makeup on.. can anyone else easily see it?Oh? It just looks very human.Star Wars was always considered to be religious fantasy and there's not a lot of that style around to adapt things to.

Traditional fantasy didn't get a boost I'd say so much as just seemed to.Honestly I saw nothing wrong with the movie and really enjoyed the polar bears.Everywhere actually. 4.5 billion for the Abrahamic faith and only roughly three hundred million or so non believers by choice.Aren't you more referring to history fantasy or adaptations? That's not really in the same line.You have to keep in mind some of the penis is still inside the body, perhaps that was taken into account and some of it stuffed in the body.... I'm positive this already was posted the other day or two ago but basically Dark Knight Bat man Sonar.This seems like a low judgment hand out. I'd expect more money but I'm sure it'll be appealed and the funds slowly delayed.Uh those are so extreme that quite honestly you'd never have a chance in hell of that happening. Plus that's common workplace skewing in all professions. Many people on reddit would have been fired or worse if your rules were rational.

The first step would be making it so that these things are discussed rationally and not in skewed way. Nearly everything posted on this sub for instance is so entirely skewed or misrepresented or positioned as saying one thing when it doesn't. This leads to huge information problems and it gets worse when the comments are circle jerk hate fests that expand and exaggerate and remove rationality.

How can we have a civil discourse or have logical movements if we can't even discuss things rationally

This sub has an abysmal reputation around reddit and its quite frankly depressing as it reflects the common way distortion occurs in our regular media too.

As for making steps to this.. how people can look at a corrupt congress and then insist the police should never have been allowed to defend themselves with subtlety... I mean you enabled a congress to entirely devastate the legal system and be dominated by corporations and lobbyists... There's no real easy path to undo things and it may not be possible.Most people can't pay their college loan debts in any reasonable time. The rates have gone up independently of inflation.You're never going to make any headway there. But you might be able to make headway in something else.Yeah that's not enough for me. Has to be seventy two or five. The goal in life isn't to be miserable everywhere plus my house.Still don't...... I don't invest in people just to throw them away. Waste of memories and my time.Well you need consistencyWhat's normal depends on culture and beliefs. If you were religious like the majority in the world are, you'd definitlry not consider that normal. If you were not, then you might be instead influenced or comparing to what happened in society. Generally 16 would be considered normal to start having such thoughts and urges.Yeah it's the hardest thing I've ever done in my life. That whole stupid tendency for our generation to get serious procrastination diseases and such has been a major inability.Depends if you have to talk to people.That's how religion works for 4.5 billion people though.Perhaps you created spiritual connections which really damaged you and when you did God will be upset at you.It's too much of an irrational thought. Too extreme. You need something more relatable. The goal is to curtail and behavior not punish relentlessly.Societal feelings though are a factor.Much cute!"You are yet? No? Okay I wait... You awake yet?"I pledge allegiance to the flag of the united states of America, and to the republic for which it stands, one nation under god, indivisible with justice and liberty for all.How you treat the lowest of you is a reflection of you forever.Regardless of what you want to believe the vast immensity of the entire world subscribes to one religion or another, 4.5 billion are of the Abrahamic faiths and a myriad of other religions take the place of the other numbers. Only slightly more than 300 million actively by choice lacking in religion as Atheists, Agnostics, or Irreligious. Anyone that hasn't made a choice yet is also in a very small pool of numbers.

You're also.. distorting what I was saying.There's more than the Abrahamic faith.You seem to forget that there are more than just the Abrahamic faiths. No unlike you I do research and double check and you're not really thinking too deeply about this.

I'm simply responding specifically to the point I initially replied to, nothing else.I use the information to do research but I never believe any comment or the title or anything posited here until thorough research has been done. It's more like a "this is something that could potentially in some form of comprehension have some relation to something".No it doesn't, but that was a pretty pathetic retort. In any case, blocked for trolling of course. I've learned that you get one exception to trolling and then after it's just not worth it. This is the second strike so...... The political process is already entirely corrupt and run by money and lobbyists and their backers. Blaming religion doesn't fix anything.

Religion is also, especially for Christianity and Catholicism, not about living and let live, its about spreading the Word at all costs.Making friends despite all my attempts is hard and the more failures or False successes you have the more draining it is until you give up.They aren't supposed to be tolerant they are just supposed to be loving. So if they were.. it could call into question the veracity of their faith.They more profit by limiting the actual value of your product, adding intrusive factors to it and all around releasing poor content that people pay full price for, as well as unnecessary DLC's.To love one must love themselves, then one can share that care and compassion to others. Your parents love you most likely, but they may disagree with everything you're doing or have done. Worse, they may not like you. But they still care and have compassion.

That's what the Christian bible calls others to do. To not spread the word actively is tantamount to not loving them for they leave alone those that have in their eyes forsaken their souls.Nah, there was a cute puppy and it did puppy things and in response people pet it.Run it through again just to be sure.You might be raped or shot by your allies too...It will be when you can spell Seppuku.Missile lock detected.Upvote for spelling camaraderie properly.Wasn't it also based on the rank of the coins?Depends on how many have it I guess.How can you show love for others if you can not show it to yourself? Think about it. If you don't comprehend it how can you show it or understand what others need?

The bible's old testament, in terms of those who believe as Christians, was fulfilled by Jesus. Constantly referring to old testament references of the distance from God and the imperfection of humanity isn't really applicable. If you must understand what love was, then to a Christian source it would be the whole creating you and dying for your sins part.Well to be completely honest.. a person with low self-esteem doesn't necessarily have 0 self-esteem. Whatever self-satisfaction and care towards themselves be it small or large is a measure of love for them, so long as it isn't self-loathing. If they had no real love for themselves they would have likely killed themselves already.

If they did have none and had yet to kill themselves, it would be almost impossible for them to truly have compassion for others because they can't really understand what compassion is.

One cannot do something that one cannot fathom the means of doing.

This isn't bigotry.. this is psychology and the reality of how the mind works and how emotional context works too. And even then that wouldn't even apply to the word bigot nor would prissy.I do know "shit", and no it's not a number but it is a level.

I'm not sure why you want to troll but this will end that.Fate demanded you receive an upvote from a year back. Here is where it landed. Do good unto others.It's indeed how I see it. Jewelry that a man can wear.. but it's personal too. A guy buying another guy a watch usually is a brother or brotherly.

Anyway, you were owed an upvote from last year... So here it is. Be good to others.It was a story game but after the class stories there was sadly nothing left, hence why the majority of us all left and they required a free to play focus.

Interesting though this new expansion. Obviously no class story and so far the episodes are limited and their release schedule is grating, but it's at least a nice diversion on YouTube and perhaps I'll pay the fee when it all comes out. I hear talk of a season two, that's great too. The Alliance removal of voice dialog though was a bad idea that was disjarring and lazy.

Anyway you made a post in this sub a year ago. This is fates way of giving you an upvote you deserved a while back. Be good to others.The class story didn't come back either sadly. Msjoeky disappointed.

Anyway you were owed an upvote from a year ago. This is fate cycling it back to you. Be good to others.I know people don't like to hear it but you're looking more at decriminalization and medical usage not recreational legalization across the board. And when it finally is across all the state's medically it will be mass produced through industrial process which will definitely strain out the high and focus on the medical factors. That's how the pharmaceutical system works.

Also I would warn against misunderstanding the correlation. It is not that crime went down or such things it is that the removal of minor drug usage as a penalized crime has changed thoroughly, but the regular rates that existed for violence and theft and such are still there, people aren't suddenly nicer and better people.It is these pointless arguments that keep skewing the facts. The corruption of congress and the influence by lobbyists and corporations has always been the unregulated problem. Any discussion of anything else can not and will not ever have an impact past that.That's a rational view, the prison system is too corrupt to be used for rehabilitating so expecting it to do so isn't going to work for anyone and will just cost things.Effectively this means crime has not decreased. But the fact the rates of arrest hasn't increased is a little concerning. If one isn't constanting arresting for drug usage one would think there'd be more time to focus on real crimes..So long as you don't drink and drive or do so in public.Only if you can prove that with documentation. Not just by saying "it is True".No one should be voting for someone bought by corporations.Yes, the health care should have been from the government and single payer, not whatever corrupt thing came out after being vivisected in corrupt congress.Well careful, a global health care is a good idea. You do that right and this country gets a little bit better in the face of the major corruption.Lady Gaga and rappers.No literally the ability to oust people from the government and impeach is a right the people have. They could assemble and demand it in mass and it should happen. What is Reddit if not a place to tell you about problems and then distract you from them a moment later?I have to walk fifteen to twenty minutes to classes each day back and forth...The candidates are generally always corrupt. It doesn't matter which you do or don't vote for. But when that corruption is seen it should be near immediate that the people oust the person from power and insist on bills to rewritten.

The voting of the president generally follows the same issues. Other than Bernie and possibly not even completely there, we've always had mass corruption from lobbyists and corporate influence for the past sixty five years.Hah.. down vote because I disagree with your way of doing things! /sYou must not live in America.I'd have a cigar with you, not sure about a beer though. 

Depends how bad your attack ads are.

Still if people assemble in truly massive numbers all around the country, there shouldn't be any way for people to downplay it.Yes, people not from Harvard, not from political families, not from wealth, and not politicians.

It is less imagining who would take the place and more actually exercising the ability to remove corrupt individuals. You do that enough and people will fall in line and stop making a muck of things. It's the fact we don't that makes them not care about us.Except they couldn't if it was a numbers thing as it is. When the people demand removal in mass they are able to get it. The mass is the problem.

Primaries reflect heavy amounts of influence from corrupt elements and super political action groups. It's corrupt there too.

Honestly the fact anyone decides to vote for someone that calls themselves a politician is still something amazing to me.Remove them if they show signs of corruption. It's the fact people do it that will keep the leaders in line. The problem is we don't.When you fail a class you try it again... You don't just give up.But we're not talking about rioting. The government has it written that individuals can be ousted and impeached. Use that power by demanding it in mass.

Also the second a government truly turns the military illegally on its citizens is when it can't hide things anymore. The numbers should swoon at that point and likewise you wouldn't be able to ignore it. But you would think the people making up the military would realize they're being asked to kill people just for being upset.Wait does she? Which one?- Has been killed...... Not sure if serious.

The answer to corruption isn't generally to elect the people responsible for the corruption.I am a good dog!

Anyway, more seriously I think we all know the federal reserve is a private bank. The government representatives not being ousted though is I believe a matter of concern for something else entirely.But when you start removing corruption others get scared and fall in line. The issue isn't perfection, its actually making others take responsibility.Political jobs don't require people to know the job, just the schmoozing. We see it in committees all the time, but barely anyone in power knows anything about what they're doing.The other party? Both parties are entirely corrupt and controlled by the same factors. Liking one over the other is just PR, they both plan to screw you entirely.Well we're not overthrowing the government, we are talking about removing corrupt leaders. This simply happens to be a lot of them.Was thinking more like.. within a week.Well if you want to share then you should, it shouldn't matter what the stick cost or whether you want to share it or not. The issue is only whether you'd like to maybe make a new friend or enjoy the experience with others.

But beyond that, when getting cigars for others to try the success of getting them interested depends entirely on whether you chose the cigar specifically for them or whether it was just something you liked and heard others might enjoy.

I recommend the Oliva O for anyone that enjoys coffee and the Oliva Connecticut, Ashton, and Davidoff Millennium for those that don't enjoy coffee. I have never found those to not work. Expanding off those is the journey.Right but if people see that once corruption is exposed or revealed or people are voting on bills that are not in the interest of the people, that those people are themselves removed from office.. You get really a fear of being removed regardless of curtailing to blackmail because the people actually exercise their rights.The plan isn't a revolution. The plan is to exercise the legal right to remove elected people from power. Less a plan more a discussion.Okay tomorrow then.

I hope yours ready to remove four hundred plus people.Lack of corruption?Ultimately halting things would prevent more corrupt bills and legislation from passing, as such it would be worse not to Halt it.

You'd remove things rapidly of course. Politicians would be the start and the highest of the executive branch at the same time. You'd halt bills and rules and orders and diplomacy and you'd look inward. You'd sever all influence from corporations in politics and you'd ban lobbyists from ever setting foot in a government building.

To start.

You would replace them with prepared members of the movement and you'd remove them if they showed corruption.Because you can't remove corruption until you remove the corruptive elements. The way media reports, the corruption of corporate and lobbyist influence, and numerous other factors.

We were likely never a real democracy but we certainly aren't now.

No non corrupt element can just get elected. Sadly people aren't that capable.Unlikely. Instead no bills would be passed during the removal period and until people had gotten replaced and corrupt influences removed. Then, the bills would be reviewed as issues came up, as well as nearly all bills revisited or superseded.Well I'm much older than that, so that was pretty juvenile of you. You have to show a willingness to remove corruption and go through with it before you can expect the representatives to avoid corruption.That doesn't matter.. and we lack many things other countries worse or equal to us have. No you seem to misunderstand. You oust the corrupt, you remove the corrupt mechanism of lobbyist influence and corporate control, you then enforce the lack of corruption by removing anyone trying to make it come back.

We don't choose the president, that's never been the case for at least sixty years. We are given a handful of choices that needed billionaires to actually support them to run. that's conflict of interest and corruption.Just an FYI, but when you just insult or argue rather than contribute to the discussion, you classify yourself as a troll.See... No contribution to discussion.. just trolling. Even an uninformed attack on age which isn't even accurate. Not even on topic either.You are not even on topic.. The prospect of removing corruption doesn't factor what other countries think. They're corrupt too.We aren't uprising.. just removing the corrupt.I never had before but I see it all the time, so yes. it didn't work.

Still what I typed is the initial response to the person I replied to that others would actually have and do have on reddit.It's not resigning, it's removing them. This isn't some saving face thing this is a "you did a shit job, here's an example that corruption won't be tolerated".I mean people like you are part of the problem, so finding you at least enables me to avoid you.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4SmzMFIXjfI

THE DOG PARADE! I almost forgot :-OThis has nothing to do with removing corruption...

Downvotes? How can electing people when the system wants you to, and when the media and all the elements of corruption and influence are out in full play work to remove corruption? Are those that are corrupt removed? No, so then you can not remove it by electing a few different people. You must actively purge the elements and links to corruption before you can ever actively remove it or expect new representatives to avoid it.The problem is very few represent their interests because the system is corrupt. You have to remove that element entirely first... No it isn't. We are not a democracy.. and to be a representative you need the backing from corporations and funders in the millions due to corruption. To be the president you need billions, which is a conflict of interest.

Again, you are part of the problem and come across as a government shill.Oh the call would be for far more than that.. you'd have the desire to oust the near-entirety of Congress and the Executive Branch and to seek replacement with the non corrupt and you'd have the banning of lobbyism and other factors that lead to the corruption.And then you'll look at the puppy parade and get distracted?That's lovely, the country would fall apart if 200,000,000 people were arrested.You can as people demand removal. You just need a massive voice. That's really all it takes. You sit there and you make them at that moment fix the issues.. by removing the corrupt elements.Because we can't. Because of media corruption, influence corruption, money being the factor, misrepresentation, distortion, attack ads, corporate influence, and numerous other factors. And why would you say "we get the chance"?

You do it NOW you don't wait until some pointless election.Actually the majority of lobbying is illegal, it becomes legal through loopholes created by lobbying so that bribes can officially happen through superpacs and other financial instruments. Among other factors.

But if you'd like a definition for corruption that the commoners would agree with: "that which influences or impairs the government and its focus on providing, enabling, and supporting the common citizenry it represents".We're talking the majority, not a few.

All those taking money from lobbyists, voting on bills that impair the citizenry, any that favor corporations over people, any that enable lobbyists to have any influence on civil, tax, or government procedure and numerous other factors.

The citizens of a country are its people, not the companies within it.

Also the executive branch for so many reasons that rather than holding an inquiry it's best to just remove them.No, someone that doesn't exhibit elements of corruption after the institutional corruption has been purged.Well you're certainly not helping.You were already ignored so I must assume you've trolled before but:

What do we want to change? The influence of corruption, obviously and all elements of that. It's not a child's idea.

All governments are corrupt? Then oversee them and remove any that exhibit corruption. Remove the people that are corrupt and have the,m afraid of the people not making others afraid of themselves. Politicians are people that have given way to corrupt influences and accepted them, lest they wouldn't be in power anymore if they hadn't. That's the removal you make.

Running for local office won't remove corporate or lobbyist corruption. Charities are largely corrupt by majority and the few that aren't won't change corporate or lobbyist corruption.

We're not talking about overthrowing, we are talking about removing corruption.

You didn't even address the topic.

Waiting.. doesn't work. The longer you wait the more corruption that exists. You can't just keep encouraging others to do tiny things that are negated by the corrupt. You need to remove them all at once and stop the flow of it.Because of corruption being rooted. You can't remove corruption within the institutional ways of election. You need to remove it immediately. You can't use the system when the system intentionally works to continue the corruption. You need to move when the system is not intending to influence you to more corruption.

You can't for say get someone good in when you still have 99% bad in. You need to remove the bad first and then get the good in, but to get people that are good you must show you can remove the bad.Or to make lobbyists unable to fund, influence unfairly, or control congress. But it's not just congress, the executive branch's current members came from that corrupt circle too, you have to purge it all and then replace it, but you can't enforce against corruption if you can't show that you're  able to do it in the first place.I'm not necessarily sure Trump has as much money as he wants people to believe.. and a billionaire isn't who you let in.. he has already profited from the corruption.You will leave the world a worse place for your children tomorrow if you do nothing today.They don't actually.

At the primaries people are lined up with their billionaire supporters. You've already got corruption there, plus influence through media and other forms to actually choice the people in the primaries that go on and the people that even get there. Then the negative influence of even trying against all that.

That's so much corruption at the start..

Then by the time you get to the actual campaign trail you've got media corruption working against you, useless and pathetic debates that help no one due to their incompetence at being dealt with and their favoritism. Misleading information and misrepresented facts and attack ads too. Corruption is there too.

It just.. you can't just say "vote" because it doesn't work that way.

Then the lack of easy information about what people represent and the facts about attack ads and the facts about candidates.. then the party corruption just influencing people to vote one way or the other.. and while this is going on corrupt bills are flying through left and right and you have to fight against them too.Anything that places favor against the citizenry of the country and instead favors the government, corporations, and factors that are not citizens of the government itself.

Anything that impairs, taints, or damages the process of voting, bill-writing and design, and so on.

Undue influence from outside means that would themselves be illegal if found for anyone else.

Enabling or utilizing privileges that others do not have simply through your own standing or station.Let's run a program.

A. Program A please list in a statistical probability the likelihood that my candidate accepted corporate funding, corporate bribes, corporate job offers, or otherwise was influenced through corporate or other lobbyists for means of corrupting or damaging the governments focus on its citizens.

Program A...

Compiling..
Rendering answer...
Presenting...

99%.

Fired.The right of the 1st amendment is towards people. Not corporations. An agent that represents a corporation is not a person but an agent.

I don't care what the Supreme Court said, it was corruption that influenced that and thus their ruling would have been thrown out or they would have ruled against it had corruption not existed. It made absolutely no sense.I am well aware of how it works, that doesn't mean it does work.You're skewing and distorting rather than addressing the points.

Even your retorts or responses "vote for someone else" has nothing to do with removing corruption. Voting for someone else independently will not fix the issue. As such you're not even on topic or addressing the issue and you're just trying to troll.

I used to feed trolls a lot by arguing but now you only get fed once and then you get blocked.We haven't been a democracy for a long long time.. if we ever were.The corruption is widespread and in total control of what does and doesn't happen. That isn't dandruff.

No lobbyists don't have that right. Do you know why? Because legally an agent of a corporation is representing the corporation or entity. Only people have that right not agents.

There were certainly presidents chosen sixty five years or so ago.. corruption was far far far less in terms of lobbyist influence.

It's not that it wouldn't require massive cash, it's that it can't come from corrupt influences.That's rioting or rebelling, not ousting or impeaching.Well your website isn't available.It's not a conspiracy to recognize that we lost control of our government a long time ago. The earliest reports show that sixty five years ago bills that enabled more corporate and lobbyist control existed. Then more recently we had citizens united.

Voting for the other person doesn't fix the issue until they see that corruption is removed. You need to make the government afraid of the people not the people afraid of the government.Then we simply look at that which is actively impairing the citizenry and remove them as they exhibit corruption.A group of people can select one person, they are all still people. Corporations and businesses and even governments have AGENTS and they are not considered people unless acting outside of their capacity as an agent.

Your example of corruption is merely another reason to rail against it.

It made no sense because campaign donations are not speech, corporations do not qualify as people and their agents do not qualify as people when in the capacity of an agent.

You need corruption removed first to get any amendments done.

You seem to fail to understand that your solutions are fine WHEN THE CORRUPTION IS PURGED.Extensively.You remove corruption so that you can vote in new representatives that are themselves afraid of exhibiting corruption due to knowing they'll be removed.

The system works fine.. when the people are feared rather than when the government is feared. If you never remove corruption then you never have a reason to not act corrupt.It doesn't remove corruption, so it has literally nothing to do with removing it. You can't elect people and expect them to represent the people properly unless they have seen or have knowledge of the fact that people that are corrupt have and will continue to be purged.

In truth, people that are corrupt and actively impairing the government and citizens should be incarcerated as well but well that's another thing altogether.Impairing citizens is simple.

Does your action favor the citizens of the country and its prosperity or does it favor:

- Corporations
- Rich billionaires
- Businesses at the cost of citizens
- Government influences at the cost of citizens
- Government instead of citizens
- Citizens at the cost of existence of the country.


What do you mean one of the two sides? This isn't party based. The parties have never mattered their voting histories have and they are often just PR. The vast immensity of congress and the executive branch needs to be purged and replaced with people that have seen that corruption is going to be purged.Well Trump may say he doesn't need supporters but he actively engages with corporations that sponsor so.... that doesn't help his goal. But Sanders is just from unions if I recall?How can you overcome a corrupt system if you must work within that system rather than purge it of corruption prior?

If people see that corruption is prevalent and they act in that manner and no one is punished for corruption then any new representative will have to deal with these current situations. You must instead purge corruption so that you can thus act in a way outside of corruption.

You must not allow corruption to impair or taint the results of reality.The status of an agent actually has legal consequences, all the actions of a person acting in agent capacity are the responsibility of the company or group they're an agent for. That's simply how the law works.

They do not qualify as people under the bill of rights or constitution.

I am entirely and thoroughly informed about the electoral process as well as other aspects that the corruption touches.

I have not mentioned once about the desire for insurrection, I have mentioned the complete ousting of corrupt elements and impeaching.

Unfortunately you may be uninformed about what lobbyists do and do not do and what exactly they have influence in. Because they do indeed effect far more than you think.

You can't "work to do something" the only chance is to remove corruption at its source publicly so that new representatives recognize that they will be purged.I'm sorry but you're skewing now. There's no alleging or such things..  it was about removing corruption. Every other method has already been tried, incase you aren't caught up with current events. There really is only this here and yes.. what I've said is corruption. If you would argue it isn't then.. honestly I'm not sure how to even speak to you as that's just nonsensical.

Campaign donations being speech due to corruption simply means they need to be re-evaluated and reclassified.

Workers are people, but when they act in representation of the company they work for they are agents of the corporation or company or group. That is literally the law.

Look, it is clear there are trolls and people that just want to argue rather than to discuss the issue and some people who are completely oblivious to how things work, believing you can just vote and things will be fixed. As such rather than consistently feeding you guys and being trolled and receiving downvotes from people abusing them because they disagree.. I'll just move on.The majority of the subscribers left, so yes we were. We were the real fans of what they promised numerous and numerous times over. Most likely we were also the beta testers, I know I was.The problem is we aren't a democracy and that isn't how our government truly works. That's because of the corruption.You don't want to see what it would be like if we removed all the power of the government or made it so weak.. companies would run rampant without the limited enforcement and regulations we have. If you don't believe that then just look at other countries where are companies are actually running rampant.

Banning lobbying would solve the issue, removing the corrupt individuals as well. When people see that the corrupt individuals must face punishment for their actions, then they will actively seek to be punished less by being less corrupt.I have. Removal of the entities, the structure, and the links leading to it.The government would have to interfere otherwise you'd get things like in other countries where companies run rampant and have sweatshop workers all over the place.Sigh, you forget people listen to attack ads, corrupt news sources, aren't informed, vote for the person whose name they even recognize and also just vote for their party.

None of that is based on who is good or not or who is likedI have done so much research before I ever even discussed this topic in my first debate trust me. But as I said skewing and distortion and honestly reddit was probably not a place able to discuss this rationally sadly.The problem is that it is the hardest thing to actually read them for very long.. The style and content of the writing is... Draining.I did vote actually.

I did months and months of research and fact checking. Then I voted for every position.

You keep distorting what I say. Stop replying to what you infer.

But more voting can't really happen when the media acts like this.I'll give a disclaimer. This game has a lot of problems. A lot was cut and it really isn't nearly as good as the scores would insinuate. Be sure to really think about if you want this game.Wait.. what about the release of gases coming from the ice? Still doomed, bummer.Being technically correct is the best kind of correct.What if it is an Apple computer?Nope.

You've outed yourself as a troll now. Why? Notice how you took what I said, inferred what I meant and then distorted the actual reality and response? You simply spent time lying. That's all. No more lying okay?

Blocked and reported.Health care.Everything on the test.Why does he have a twitch shirt? I need to know this.I do like story, so I'll be playing it, how I do that is yet to be determined. Might play a friends.. might not.&gt; 1

So it does partially go down! Hah they told us it worked! Our fult for not being at that third level.Aren't cock rings more metal bands that you wonder how they got on there?Why should a fine be something you can easily recover from within the same year, rather than in a basis that would be a significant burden that would not be readily explainable to shareholders?

The truth of the matter is that there should never be a point in your life where defending a corporation seems like a good idea or logical. They would never do it for you."How is my driving?" 

Call ###-###-####

EPIC LEVEL!Where are the elves...Rebel Fleet meet:

https://starwarsforce.files.wordpress.com/2014/02/1469877_719288914765698_349683271_n.jpg

The Imperial Fleet.

You lose.The consensus seems to be that he was a pretty bad Governor though..."Who is biting my tail... oh it's just my son/daughter. Carry on."*Nibble*

Well already got that happening... What else don't you want?Where?Defective "kong" product.. has no peanutbutter in it, dog is confused.Did yo ureally need to show me a pic of a penis?

I'm sure your penis appreciates the LEDs... but why in heavens would you get this or that ring.. none of this makes any sense. Just like putting it in chastity doesn't make sense. Ugh.But if the concept of everyone being able to go to space is a thing then clearly you don't really need "the math". You need "the money".

:-/I'm still trying to figure out why strands keep tearing after putting it in the laundry...Oh Hai, is this Seaworld?I think it might be a bit nuts.It seemed like everyone was dressed as Jar Jar this halloween. I wonder if that means the kids want him in the seventh movie?Did you see him in the trailer? I was very impressed with the costume design.You know when the match occurs his image looks 10x more handsome like.. I'm not exactly sure what happens, I think the circle cutting off a tiny bit of his head really accents his smile and face?But LucasFilm is an American Company.Disney Infinity 5.0: James Bond.Pig is super jealous... Cow gets irritated after being ignored.So the dogs name is Tiger and the other dog is dressed as a tiger? I understand it right?I feel like it's what would be in my attempt to be enticing astronomy book.That's for when I'm rich and have a room just for stargazing.I'm not kinky or like that so.. ehh. Maybe I'll accept oral but that's about as far as that's going.Millions.Quite honestly I think that every year....I feel like she'd then say "on second thought, sure" and so the lady would pull out a second.My Golden just got through cancer and had a part of her ear removed... I haven't seen her since and she's 15 and a half now. I feel for you... I'm worried how long she'll have and I.. I couldn't put her down.He could not have chosen a worse color.Wait.. so.. I'm guessing the disc wouldn't work after this since it's not just data being removed but the possibility of putting data on it?PCMR.. I don't remember but I do know it was due to moderator abuse.

Also should I buy this, I defended myself from an attack once.Honestly all of them in my eyes.. I don't really feel the vulgarities are necessary.Playing video games, there's a massive number of math factors in there.

My damage is 450.. but if I use this buff it's + 60.Naked Halo :-/Doesn't work for me.. also don't have any insurance because while I was depressed I wasn't able to send forms back quick enough and was kicked out.Yes but people don't seem to realize just how bad corporations would be without the little regulations that government does actually enforce.I started having fine cigars and various types of alcohol for camaraderie purposes with friends, or in attempts to get to know people better to become better friends.

So there's that.The primary reason is corporate corruption and lobbyism corruption of congress. That's really the answer for mostly everything to do with government to be honest.. at least in the US. And it seems in the UK.Since bullets will barely do anything to a walking zombie... I feel this is how you die.March of the Penguins.My 15 year old Golden just survived cancer but they had to remove part of her eat for it.. and she'll develop more soon.. when she leaves.. I don't.. I don't know what I'll really have to live for.. life isn't going the way I planned.I do. Nearly 30!Have some Tie Defenders.No that was the difference. We came for it as a story focused mmo. It dropped that focus very quickly and so we left too."If you're happy... Clap along"Well more accurately the content at launch was. They haven't done much of anything with it sense until now and even now that's very limited.

Hence why the fans that bought it for that point mostly left and they were instead left with the need to go free to play and focus more on a mmo general market.

The gameplay though hasn't had any evolutions either sadly. Usually people recommend going through the story once or twice for free but I don't see suggestions for subscription or stayijgn with it anymore.

Oh. You're trolling and abusing down votes. Nvm, blocked.That's lovely but I'm still very disappointed in the actual title. Why would I care that it sold a lot, all that means is they don't feel a consequence of releasing a very effort missing product.People go on Reddit all the time at work so...I don't think that's right. They're paying for college, you aren't paying them.I mean there's really no excuse for the graphic situation from what we are seeing. Making excuses for a company is the job of PR not the players.It's not the issue of the top of the line. It's the issue that it looks very low effort and not even current gen.

It isn't an and or situation, they expect both to be of quality.Not just primary, more just that it's a very important part of the product. There should not be any excuse acceptable for not having current gen graphics in a big budget game. That doesn't make any sense.With my dollar I expect high quality in ALL aspects. You guys need to stop seeing it as one or the other. All parts of a game matter.Mods are not the developers though. The developers don't get credit for what mods bring. So you judge it based on what it is at presentation.

I can stand not having top gen. but this isn't even current gen. That's the low effort problem that annoys me.You can easily have both when you have a large budget. Also you're comparing two different types of games, of course they don't work the same way.

Also the way specs work to get high quality is you design for the pc and then you scale down. You don't scale up.It's like the fun and joy was ripped out.Uh... I don't understand how anyone likes any of those. I don't understand why Gravity Falls was popular either. Whatever fun I comprehend isn't in there.

Note to self: never have an opinion.Adderal is also heavily abused by students not prescribed it or who have unnecessary prescriptions. Fun fact but adderal abuse can actually less you up to have problems that would need adderal, such as ADD and such.

Adderal also isn't just straight up meth.That's depressing.Well I didn't see much of an experience or story in skyrim but I did enjoy witcher, I just hope they don't have the same problems witcher did with this new title that's coming.The problem with RL and games like it is the repetition. I don't spend my time on things to feel like I just did the same thing over and over.Pretty much everything is designed for monopolies not consumers. Honestly most of them. The problem is top posts and comments are most often False, misrepresentation, or distorted. *Turns on dog with a blog*

Yes.It's dumb for people to abuse it and be disrespectful, it isn't dumb to have integrity and not contribute to the degradation of civil discussion.... Oh where's that continual lass story expansion promised 3 years back? They've focused on operations, flashpoints, and useless stuff. And the first expansion was originally supposed to be free but it was shit and the second? Not much better.

The joke is you, trying to defend a company that screwed over its original player base and still hasn't been able to get them to return.*Notices you didn't respond to anything I said*

You're just a kid and a troll. BLocked and reported.

They only got a very tiny little of it, we left quickly. Let me know when you get that expanded class story from 3 years back.I've had plenty of games that have both and run at 60FPS or higher depending on hardware. Again the big difference is you build for PC and then you scale down. It doesn't work if you scale up.

Obviously consoles can't handle it all but even they deserve better than these graphics, especially due to the fact they have games with better graphics and gameplay and sets already.

Fallout 4 deserved a high quality release thoroughly."Fixer. Get on that turret!"Sadly a lot of Star Wars fans hate Karen for "having a hard-on for Mandos". :-/"Thats no fair! I can't get up there.. *Pout*"You mean the hood?Well Witcher 3 for one.

And no you're not saying they scaled up.. it's clear they did though. They went for consoles first which is a major issue. Look, the game doesn't need to have next gen graphics, but this isn't even current gen. It's not appealing to look at and there are so many texture and rendering issues that can be seen just at first glance, it also reflects in the poorly populated and accessible areas and scenery.

I do hope the game turns out better than the leaks show but.. I'm not holding my breath. I'll still play it, but perhaps I'll wait for the ultimate edition or DLC edition before I decide to buy it.Except that Lucas was perfectly fine with it all until the clone wars writers wanted to change it.

And honestly for a cult of warriors from a planet that mostly become bounty hunters or such things? What she wrote made sense. Some of the forced homosexuality dialog more evident in her legacy of the force books were a little offputting but even then it made some degree of sense.

It made perfect sense that each group or faction or planet would have real cultures and multiple ways of thinking.That's last gen.

Once next gen comes out it isn't called next gen anymore.But it does have a high quality story, writing, massive scenery, and numerous other factors AFTER having gone through a graphic downgrade scandal. Let's not also forget that for an AAA game the budget for development was also quite low. We saw the same thing when Dragon Age 2 and DAI were competing against W3. Massive low effort issues.

Looking at Fallout 4 it just seems obvious that either the budget was low or they didn't try when it comes to presentation. I'm not the type to use mods either so this will impact me more than it might otherwise. It helps that the levels and graphics are current or complimentary when you're trying to play a game based on immersion.

But its out soon and so in a week or so I'll look in on it then.If I recall there were some older books about Boba and a graphic novel about Jango that solidified the mandalorian culture. Plus the knights of the old republic series really solidified the mandalorian culture as did the graphic novels and comics and those further cemented where she was getting her lore from. The Jedi defeated the Mandalorians and the culture respected them but it stands to reason that Jango the then leader of a group that comes when beckoned or at least highly respects him, would possibly have a thing against the Jedi. Plus, Tyranus likely sung words of honey to convince him especially since according to the graphic comics, Jango had competed against a large number in an arena game which brought attention from Tyrqnus.So to be fair this isn't the sub you'd go to for the non bias answer but let me try.

The PS4 has Uncharted coming out early next year and the PSPlus service still gives a good series of licensed games for its purchase price over the year. There will be other exclusives coming too.

As of now, if by selling the platform and controllers alone you can get four hundred then I'd do it but if we're including games then that really depends on whether you liked those games and what they'd cost today.

You could always buy another PS4 if more games come out that you'd want to play and it'll be cheaper though games Amy or may not be cheaper than they are now.

The mere fact of having a gaming computer doesn't solve all issues either, especially if you wanted to split screen or had friends specifically playing that or another console or had online friends doing the same.The streaming from chromecast is for videos online right? Not videos you actually own or downloaded.I stream plex to just the media server of the Xbox One. 9/10 it works even with subtitles.They pay for your salary....

Don't assume I get tickets btw.It was in one of the Legacy of the Force books when Mara was meeting some people that she was living with while staying on Mandalore.. the two men were.. well lovers of a sort."I pay your salary" is the epitome of "actually a factual basis to discuss".

As in the tuition from the students specifically for your class is paying the salary and I'm paying it, not you.

Also the word "entitled" is one of the most overused and misused words on the internet these days.

As for the rest...

According to the time value of money and simple accounting I have already incurred a liability for the money I've taken out, this means it is my money. That's how accounting and finance works.

I might also have had money of my own that either was given to me, invested for me, that I invested, or that I worked for and I might use that too.

In terms of parents if they did pay for college then they are entrusting me to learn the way I need to and to also live like a college student would and as they did, so long as things are taken care of properly.

Scholarships aren't lost for missing classes if grades are high. Some people just don't get much from the class and instead learn from the book. Perhaps you're a boring or poor teacher in general and you just don't realize that students keep falling asleep because of that in your class and they'd rather not fall asleep in your class or forget everything.

You aren't paying anything to the college, so stop that. The students all act in the way they desire and the consequences or benefits are theirs and theirs alone. You use the term "Entitled" but the truth is you're acting incredibly entitled.

Also leaving class, or not coming to class is not "disrupting the experience for everyone" people leave all the time. Further "nice" teachers doesn't mean spineless. And it isn't your job at all to label people as troublemakers because you assume how others think it, when they likely do not care. You stopping to be an asshole is you disrupting the class.The Disney EU Reset isn't relevant since we're talking about what was established way prior to Disney even buying Star Wars.

I'm pretty sure the Jaster Mereel and Mandalorian KOTOR comics and graphic novels had a huge influence on Karen as did the Jango Fett graphic novel. It sounds like you're kind of assuming that Karen did all these things on her own when instead she just adopted what was there and made it better.Same place all the rum went.They would smell the sniper while blocking the bullet!Except the canon for the Mandalorians was more aptly designed during the prequel days not before them.I don't use Plex Pass, though I should have bought a life time back when it was half price.

I just use the Plex SErver and the Media Server recognizes it.Reading the article was strange.. it was full of buzz words and lack of specificity on what was actually going to be happening.. :-/A company telling you a PR reason for removal doesn't suddenly mean they're telling the truth. Come now, think rationally.

Now if you want to look into their analysis and their financial sheets and see just how many loopholes and payments towards lobbyists and benefits from corruption there are and then settle the real results, we can go from there and see if there company is being real or not.

Also with Schlum, a company that specifically indicates people as part of the pillars, their own employees indicate it isn't so and thus that's even more reason to believe it has nothing to do with being unnecessary. They are getting rid of their consulting practice for mission statement reasons and shareholder pressure. That's it. Nothing else.

I'm failing to see how you plan to have an objective and fully informed view or analysis on these events if you're not even willing to do research and figure out the real facts.

The True reality is that corporate corruption is far too prevalent and earnings far too irrational. You shouldn't shed a single tear for any corporation.

The corporate corruption has everything to do with things when mentioning profit or revenues.The reverse is True to your views.Whenever someone tries to insult or demean someone. You can picture bullies and trolls and young idiots just standing around having to wait quietly prior to being wastes of humanity.You just stopped most accidents.No one greets so...Oh wow.Unless they always had unrealistic and irrational profit motives built by corruption. Then the obvious thing to do instead of firing would be to fix those.You are telling me something and it can be also told to you.I more referring to what Galle_ said, in that people not liking doesn't make it a bad movie either. I already know the "objective" reasons people refer to and I feel they can be debated.For some reason I can clearly see this is a human with makeup on.. can anyone else easily see it?Oh? It just looks very human.Star Wars was always considered to be religious fantasy and there's not a lot of that style around to adapt things to.

Traditional fantasy didn't get a boost I'd say so much as just seemed to.Honestly I saw nothing wrong with the movie and really enjoyed the polar bears.Everywhere actually. 4.5 billion for the Abrahamic faith and only roughly three hundred million or so non believers by choice.Aren't you more referring to history fantasy or adaptations? That's not really in the same line.You have to keep in mind some of the penis is still inside the body, perhaps that was taken into account and some of it stuffed in the body.... I'm positive this already was posted the other day or two ago but basically Dark Knight Bat man Sonar.This seems like a low judgment hand out. I'd expect more money but I'm sure it'll be appealed and the funds slowly delayed.Uh those are so extreme that quite honestly you'd never have a chance in hell of that happening. Plus that's common workplace skewing in all professions. Many people on reddit would have been fired or worse if your rules were rational.

The first step would be making it so that these things are discussed rationally and not in skewed way. Nearly everything posted on this sub for instance is so entirely skewed or misrepresented or positioned as saying one thing when it doesn't. This leads to huge information problems and it gets worse when the comments are circle jerk hate fests that expand and exaggerate and remove rationality.

How can we have a civil discourse or have logical movements if we can't even discuss things rationally

This sub has an abysmal reputation around reddit and its quite frankly depressing as it reflects the common way distortion occurs in our regular media too.

As for making steps to this.. how people can look at a corrupt congress and then insist the police should never have been allowed to defend themselves with subtlety... I mean you enabled a congress to entirely devastate the legal system and be dominated by corporations and lobbyists... There's no real easy path to undo things and it may not be possible.Most people can't pay their college loan debts in any reasonable time. The rates have gone up independently of inflation.You're never going to make any headway there. But you might be able to make headway in something else.Yeah that's not enough for me. Has to be seventy two or five. The goal in life isn't to be miserable everywhere plus my house.Still don't...... I don't invest in people just to throw them away. Waste of memories and my time.Well you need consistencyWhat's normal depends on culture and beliefs. If you were religious like the majority in the world are, you'd definitlry not consider that normal. If you were not, then you might be instead influenced or comparing to what happened in society. Generally 16 would be considered normal to start having such thoughts and urges.Yeah it's the hardest thing I've ever done in my life. That whole stupid tendency for our generation to get serious procrastination diseases and such has been a major inability.Depends if you have to talk to people.That's how religion works for 4.5 billion people though.Perhaps you created spiritual connections which really damaged you and when you did God will be upset at you.It's too much of an irrational thought. Too extreme. You need something more relatable. The goal is to curtail and behavior not punish relentlessly.Societal feelings though are a factor.Much cute!"You are yet? No? Okay I wait... You awake yet?"I pledge allegiance to the flag of the united states of America, and to the republic for which it stands, one nation under god, indivisible with justice and liberty for all.How you treat the lowest of you is a reflection of you forever.Regardless of what you want to believe the vast immensity of the entire world subscribes to one religion or another, 4.5 billion are of the Abrahamic faiths and a myriad of other religions take the place of the other numbers. Only slightly more than 300 million actively by choice lacking in religion as Atheists, Agnostics, or Irreligious. Anyone that hasn't made a choice yet is also in a very small pool of numbers.

You're also.. distorting what I was saying.There's more than the Abrahamic faith.You seem to forget that there are more than just the Abrahamic faiths. No unlike you I do research and double check and you're not really thinking too deeply about this.

I'm simply responding specifically to the point I initially replied to, nothing else.I use the information to do research but I never believe any comment or the title or anything posited here until thorough research has been done. It's more like a "this is something that could potentially in some form of comprehension have some relation to something".No it doesn't, but that was a pretty pathetic retort. In any case, blocked for trolling of course. I've learned that you get one exception to trolling and then after it's just not worth it. This is the second strike so...... The political process is already entirely corrupt and run by money and lobbyists and their backers. Blaming religion doesn't fix anything.

Religion is also, especially for Christianity and Catholicism, not about living and let live, its about spreading the Word at all costs.Making friends despite all my attempts is hard and the more failures or False successes you have the more draining it is until you give up.They aren't supposed to be tolerant they are just supposed to be loving. So if they were.. it could call into question the veracity of their faith.They more profit by limiting the actual value of your product, adding intrusive factors to it and all around releasing poor content that people pay full price for, as well as unnecessary DLC's.To love one must love themselves, then one can share that care and compassion to others. Your parents love you most likely, but they may disagree with everything you're doing or have done. Worse, they may not like you. But they still care and have compassion.

That's what the Christian bible calls others to do. To not spread the word actively is tantamount to not loving them for they leave alone those that have in their eyes forsaken their souls.Nah, there was a cute puppy and it did puppy things and in response people pet it.Run it through again just to be sure.You might be raped or shot by your allies too...It will be when you can spell Seppuku.Missile lock detected.Upvote for spelling camaraderie properly.Wasn't it also based on the rank of the coins?Depends on how many have it I guess.How can you show love for others if you can not show it to yourself? Think about it. If you don't comprehend it how can you show it or understand what others need?

The bible's old testament, in terms of those who believe as Christians, was fulfilled by Jesus. Constantly referring to old testament references of the distance from God and the imperfection of humanity isn't really applicable. If you must understand what love was, then to a Christian source it would be the whole creating you and dying for your sins part.Well to be completely honest.. a person with low self-esteem doesn't necessarily have 0 self-esteem. Whatever self-satisfaction and care towards themselves be it small or large is a measure of love for them, so long as it isn't self-loathing. If they had no real love for themselves they would have likely killed themselves already.

If they did have none and had yet to kill themselves, it would be almost impossible for them to truly have compassion for others because they can't really understand what compassion is.

One cannot do something that one cannot fathom the means of doing.

This isn't bigotry.. this is psychology and the reality of how the mind works and how emotional context works too. And even then that wouldn't even apply to the word bigot nor would prissy.I do know "shit", and no it's not a number but it is a level.

I'm not sure why you want to troll but this will end that.Fate demanded you receive an upvote from a year back. Here is where it landed. Do good unto others.It's indeed how I see it. Jewelry that a man can wear.. but it's personal too. A guy buying another guy a watch usually is a brother or brotherly.

Anyway, you were owed an upvote from last year... So here it is. Be good to others.It was a story game but after the class stories there was sadly nothing left, hence why the majority of us all left and they required a free to play focus.

Interesting though this new expansion. Obviously no class story and so far the episodes are limited and their release schedule is grating, but it's at least a nice diversion on YouTube and perhaps I'll pay the fee when it all comes out. I hear talk of a season two, that's great too. The Alliance removal of voice dialog though was a bad idea that was disjarring and lazy.

Anyway you made a post in this sub a year ago. This is fates way of giving you an upvote you deserved a while back. Be good to others.The class story didn't come back either sadly. Msjoeky disappointed.

Anyway you were owed an upvote from a year ago. This is fate cycling it back to you. Be good to others.I know people don't like to hear it but you're looking more at decriminalization and medical usage not recreational legalization across the board. And when it finally is across all the state's medically it will be mass produced through industrial process which will definitely strain out the high and focus on the medical factors. That's how the pharmaceutical system works.

Also I would warn against misunderstanding the correlation. It is not that crime went down or such things it is that the removal of minor drug usage as a penalized crime has changed thoroughly, but the regular rates that existed for violence and theft and such are still there, people aren't suddenly nicer and better people.It is these pointless arguments that keep skewing the facts. The corruption of congress and the influence by lobbyists and corporations has always been the unregulated problem. Any discussion of anything else can not and will not ever have an impact past that.That's a rational view, the prison system is too corrupt to be used for rehabilitating so expecting it to do so isn't going to work for anyone and will just cost things.Effectively this means crime has not decreased. But the fact the rates of arrest hasn't increased is a little concerning. If one isn't constanting arresting for drug usage one would think there'd be more time to focus on real crimes..So long as you don't drink and drive or do so in public.Only if you can prove that with documentation. Not just by saying "it is True".No one should be voting for someone bought by corporations.Yes, the health care should have been from the government and single payer, not whatever corrupt thing came out after being vivisected in corrupt congress.Well careful, a global health care is a good idea. You do that right and this country gets a little bit better in the face of the major corruption.Lady Gaga and rappers.No literally the ability to oust people from the government and impeach is a right the people have. They could assemble and demand it in mass and it should happen. What is Reddit if not a place to tell you about problems and then distract you from them a moment later?I have to walk fifteen to twenty minutes to classes each day back and forth...The candidates are generally always corrupt. It doesn't matter which you do or don't vote for. But when that corruption is seen it should be near immediate that the people oust the person from power and insist on bills to rewritten.

The voting of the president generally follows the same issues. Other than Bernie and possibly not even completely there, we've always had mass corruption from lobbyists and corporate influence for the past sixty five years.Hah.. down vote because I disagree with your way of doing things! /sYou must not live in America.I'd have a cigar with you, not sure about a beer though. 

Depends how bad your attack ads are.

Still if people assemble in truly massive numbers all around the country, there shouldn't be any way for people to downplay it.Yes, people not from Harvard, not from political families, not from wealth, and not politicians.

It is less imagining who would take the place and more actually exercising the ability to remove corrupt individuals. You do that enough and people will fall in line and stop making a muck of things. It's the fact we don't that makes them not care about us.Except they couldn't if it was a numbers thing as it is. When the people demand removal in mass they are able to get it. The mass is the problem.

Primaries reflect heavy amounts of influence from corrupt elements and super political action groups. It's corrupt there too.

Honestly the fact anyone decides to vote for someone that calls themselves a politician is still something amazing to me.Remove them if they show signs of corruption. It's the fact people do it that will keep the leaders in line. The problem is we don't.When you fail a class you try it again... You don't just give up.But we're not talking about rioting. The government has it written that individuals can be ousted and impeached. Use that power by demanding it in mass.

Also the second a government truly turns the military illegally on its citizens is when it can't hide things anymore. The numbers should swoon at that point and likewise you wouldn't be able to ignore it. But you would think the people making up the military would realize they're being asked to kill people just for being upset.Wait does she? Which one?- Has been killed...... Not sure if serious.

The answer to corruption isn't generally to elect the people responsible for the corruption.I am a good dog!

Anyway, more seriously I think we all know the federal reserve is a private bank. The government representatives not being ousted though is I believe a matter of concern for something else entirely.But when you start removing corruption others get scared and fall in line. The issue isn't perfection, its actually making others take responsibility.Political jobs don't require people to know the job, just the schmoozing. We see it in committees all the time, but barely anyone in power knows anything about what they're doing.The other party? Both parties are entirely corrupt and controlled by the same factors. Liking one over the other is just PR, they both plan to screw you entirely.Well we're not overthrowing the government, we are talking about removing corrupt leaders. This simply happens to be a lot of them.Was thinking more like.. within a week.Well if you want to share then you should, it shouldn't matter what the stick cost or whether you want to share it or not. The issue is only whether you'd like to maybe make a new friend or enjoy the experience with others.

But beyond that, when getting cigars for others to try the success of getting them interested depends entirely on whether you chose the cigar specifically for them or whether it was just something you liked and heard others might enjoy.

I recommend the Oliva O for anyone that enjoys coffee and the Oliva Connecticut, Ashton, and Davidoff Millennium for those that don't enjoy coffee. I have never found those to not work. Expanding off those is the journey.Right but if people see that once corruption is exposed or revealed or people are voting on bills that are not in the interest of the people, that those people are themselves removed from office.. You get really a fear of being removed regardless of curtailing to blackmail because the people actually exercise their rights.The plan isn't a revolution. The plan is to exercise the legal right to remove elected people from power. Less a plan more a discussion.Okay tomorrow then.

I hope yours ready to remove four hundred plus people.Lack of corruption?Ultimately halting things would prevent more corrupt bills and legislation from passing, as such it would be worse not to Halt it.

You'd remove things rapidly of course. Politicians would be the start and the highest of the executive branch at the same time. You'd halt bills and rules and orders and diplomacy and you'd look inward. You'd sever all influence from corporations in politics and you'd ban lobbyists from ever setting foot in a government building.

To start.

You would replace them with prepared members of the movement and you'd remove them if they showed corruption.Because you can't remove corruption until you remove the corruptive elements. The way media reports, the corruption of corporate and lobbyist influence, and numerous other factors.

We were likely never a real democracy but we certainly aren't now.

No non corrupt element can just get elected. Sadly people aren't that capable.Unlikely. Instead no bills would be passed during the removal period and until people had gotten replaced and corrupt influences removed. Then, the bills would be reviewed as issues came up, as well as nearly all bills revisited or superseded.Well I'm much older than that, so that was pretty juvenile of you. You have to show a willingness to remove corruption and go through with it before you can expect the representatives to avoid corruption.That doesn't matter.. and we lack many things other countries worse or equal to us have. No you seem to misunderstand. You oust the corrupt, you remove the corrupt mechanism of lobbyist influence and corporate control, you then enforce the lack of corruption by removing anyone trying to make it come back.

We don't choose the president, that's never been the case for at least sixty years. We are given a handful of choices that needed billionaires to actually support them to run. that's conflict of interest and corruption.Just an FYI, but when you just insult or argue rather than contribute to the discussion, you classify yourself as a troll.See... No contribution to discussion.. just trolling. Even an uninformed attack on age which isn't even accurate. Not even on topic either.You are not even on topic.. The prospect of removing corruption doesn't factor what other countries think. They're corrupt too.We aren't uprising.. just removing the corrupt.I never had before but I see it all the time, so yes. it didn't work.

Still what I typed is the initial response to the person I replied to that others would actually have and do have on reddit.It's not resigning, it's removing them. This isn't some saving face thing this is a "you did a shit job, here's an example that corruption won't be tolerated".I mean people like you are part of the problem, so finding you at least enables me to avoid you.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4SmzMFIXjfI

THE DOG PARADE! I almost forgot :-OThis has nothing to do with removing corruption...

Downvotes? How can electing people when the system wants you to, and when the media and all the elements of corruption and influence are out in full play work to remove corruption? Are those that are corrupt removed? No, so then you can not remove it by electing a few different people. You must actively purge the elements and links to corruption before you can ever actively remove it or expect new representatives to avoid it.The problem is very few represent their interests because the system is corrupt. You have to remove that element entirely first... No it isn't. We are not a democracy.. and to be a representative you need the backing from corporations and funders in the millions due to corruption. To be the president you need billions, which is a conflict of interest.

Again, you are part of the problem and come across as a government shill.Oh the call would be for far more than that.. you'd have the desire to oust the near-entirety of Congress and the Executive Branch and to seek replacement with the non corrupt and you'd have the banning of lobbyism and other factors that lead to the corruption.And then you'll look at the puppy parade and get distracted?That's lovely, the country would fall apart if 200,000,000 people were arrested.You can as people demand removal. You just need a massive voice. That's really all it takes. You sit there and you make them at that moment fix the issues.. by removing the corrupt elements.Because we can't. Because of media corruption, influence corruption, money being the factor, misrepresentation, distortion, attack ads, corporate influence, and numerous other factors. And why would you say "we get the chance"?

You do it NOW you don't wait until some pointless election.Actually the majority of lobbying is illegal, it becomes legal through loopholes created by lobbying so that bribes can officially happen through superpacs and other financial instruments. Among other factors.

But if you'd like a definition for corruption that the commoners would agree with: "that which influences or impairs the government and its focus on providing, enabling, and supporting the common citizenry it represents".We're talking the majority, not a few.

All those taking money from lobbyists, voting on bills that impair the citizenry, any that favor corporations over people, any that enable lobbyists to have any influence on civil, tax, or government procedure and numerous other factors.

The citizens of a country are its people, not the companies within it.

Also the executive branch for so many reasons that rather than holding an inquiry it's best to just remove them.No, someone that doesn't exhibit elements of corruption after the institutional corruption has been purged.Well you're certainly not helping.You were already ignored so I must assume you've trolled before but:

What do we want to change? The influence of corruption, obviously and all elements of that. It's not a child's idea.

All governments are corrupt? Then oversee them and remove any that exhibit corruption. Remove the people that are corrupt and have the,m afraid of the people not making others afraid of themselves. Politicians are people that have given way to corrupt influences and accepted them, lest they wouldn't be in power anymore if they hadn't. That's the removal you make.

Running for local office won't remove corporate or lobbyist corruption. Charities are largely corrupt by majority and the few that aren't won't change corporate or lobbyist corruption.

We're not talking about overthrowing, we are talking about removing corruption.

You didn't even address the topic.

Waiting.. doesn't work. The longer you wait the more corruption that exists. You can't just keep encouraging others to do tiny things that are negated by the corrupt. You need to remove them all at once and stop the flow of it.Because of corruption being rooted. You can't remove corruption within the institutional ways of election. You need to remove it immediately. You can't use the system when the system intentionally works to continue the corruption. You need to move when the system is not intending to influence you to more corruption.

You can't for say get someone good in when you still have 99% bad in. You need to remove the bad first and then get the good in, but to get people that are good you must show you can remove the bad.Or to make lobbyists unable to fund, influence unfairly, or control congress. But it's not just congress, the executive branch's current members came from that corrupt circle too, you have to purge it all and then replace it, but you can't enforce against corruption if you can't show that you're  able to do it in the first place.I'm not necessarily sure Trump has as much money as he wants people to believe.. and a billionaire isn't who you let in.. he has already profited from the corruption.You will leave the world a worse place for your children tomorrow if you do nothing today.They don't actually.

At the primaries people are lined up with their billionaire supporters. You've already got corruption there, plus influence through media and other forms to actually choice the people in the primaries that go on and the people that even get there. Then the negative influence of even trying against all that.

That's so much corruption at the start..

Then by the time you get to the actual campaign trail you've got media corruption working against you, useless and pathetic debates that help no one due to their incompetence at being dealt with and their favoritism. Misleading information and misrepresented facts and attack ads too. Corruption is there too.

It just.. you can't just say "vote" because it doesn't work that way.

Then the lack of easy information about what people represent and the facts about attack ads and the facts about candidates.. then the party corruption just influencing people to vote one way or the other.. and while this is going on corrupt bills are flying through left and right and you have to fight against them too.Anything that places favor against the citizenry of the country and instead favors the government, corporations, and factors that are not citizens of the government itself.

Anything that impairs, taints, or damages the process of voting, bill-writing and design, and so on.

Undue influence from outside means that would themselves be illegal if found for anyone else.

Enabling or utilizing privileges that others do not have simply through your own standing or station.Let's run a program.

A. Program A please list in a statistical probability the likelihood that my candidate accepted corporate funding, corporate bribes, corporate job offers, or otherwise was influenced through corporate or other lobbyists for means of corrupting or damaging the governments focus on its citizens.

Program A...

Compiling..
Rendering answer...
Presenting...

99%.

Fired.The right of the 1st amendment is towards people. Not corporations. An agent that represents a corporation is not a person but an agent.

I don't care what the Supreme Court said, it was corruption that influenced that and thus their ruling would have been thrown out or they would have ruled against it had corruption not existed. It made absolutely no sense.I am well aware of how it works, that doesn't mean it does work.You're skewing and distorting rather than addressing the points.

Even your retorts or responses "vote for someone else" has nothing to do with removing corruption. Voting for someone else independently will not fix the issue. As such you're not even on topic or addressing the issue and you're just trying to troll.

I used to feed trolls a lot by arguing but now you only get fed once and then you get blocked.We haven't been a democracy for a long long time.. if we ever were.The corruption is widespread and in total control of what does and doesn't happen. That isn't dandruff.

No lobbyists don't have that right. Do you know why? Because legally an agent of a corporation is representing the corporation or entity. Only people have that right not agents.

There were certainly presidents chosen sixty five years or so ago.. corruption was far far far less in terms of lobbyist influence.

It's not that it wouldn't require massive cash, it's that it can't come from corrupt influences.That's rioting or rebelling, not ousting or impeaching.Well your website isn't available.It's not a conspiracy to recognize that we lost control of our government a long time ago. The earliest reports show that sixty five years ago bills that enabled more corporate and lobbyist control existed. Then more recently we had citizens united.

Voting for the other person doesn't fix the issue until they see that corruption is removed. You need to make the government afraid of the people not the people afraid of the government.Then we simply look at that which is actively impairing the citizenry and remove them as they exhibit corruption.A group of people can select one person, they are all still people. Corporations and businesses and even governments have AGENTS and they are not considered people unless acting outside of their capacity as an agent.

Your example of corruption is merely another reason to rail against it.

It made no sense because campaign donations are not speech, corporations do not qualify as people and their agents do not qualify as people when in the capacity of an agent.

You need corruption removed first to get any amendments done.

You seem to fail to understand that your solutions are fine WHEN THE CORRUPTION IS PURGED.Extensively.You remove corruption so that you can vote in new representatives that are themselves afraid of exhibiting corruption due to knowing they'll be removed.

The system works fine.. when the people are feared rather than when the government is feared. If you never remove corruption then you never have a reason to not act corrupt.It doesn't remove corruption, so it has literally nothing to do with removing it. You can't elect people and expect them to represent the people properly unless they have seen or have knowledge of the fact that people that are corrupt have and will continue to be purged.

In truth, people that are corrupt and actively impairing the government and citizens should be incarcerated as well but well that's another thing altogether.Impairing citizens is simple.

Does your action favor the citizens of the country and its prosperity or does it favor:

- Corporations
- Rich billionaires
- Businesses at the cost of citizens
- Government influences at the cost of citizens
- Government instead of citizens
- Citizens at the cost of existence of the country.


What do you mean one of the two sides? This isn't party based. The parties have never mattered their voting histories have and they are often just PR. The vast immensity of congress and the executive branch needs to be purged and replaced with people that have seen that corruption is going to be purged.Well Trump may say he doesn't need supporters but he actively engages with corporations that sponsor so.... that doesn't help his goal. But Sanders is just from unions if I recall?How can you overcome a corrupt system if you must work within that system rather than purge it of corruption prior?

If people see that corruption is prevalent and they act in that manner and no one is punished for corruption then any new representative will have to deal with these current situations. You must instead purge corruption so that you can thus act in a way outside of corruption.

You must not allow corruption to impair or taint the results of reality.The status of an agent actually has legal consequences, all the actions of a person acting in agent capacity are the responsibility of the company or group they're an agent for. That's simply how the law works.

They do not qualify as people under the bill of rights or constitution.

I am entirely and thoroughly informed about the electoral process as well as other aspects that the corruption touches.

I have not mentioned once about the desire for insurrection, I have mentioned the complete ousting of corrupt elements and impeaching.

Unfortunately you may be uninformed about what lobbyists do and do not do and what exactly they have influence in. Because they do indeed effect far more than you think.

You can't "work to do something" the only chance is to remove corruption at its source publicly so that new representatives recognize that they will be purged.I'm sorry but you're skewing now. There's no alleging or such things..  it was about removing corruption. Every other method has already been tried, incase you aren't caught up with current events. There really is only this here and yes.. what I've said is corruption. If you would argue it isn't then.. honestly I'm not sure how to even speak to you as that's just nonsensical.

Campaign donations being speech due to corruption simply means they need to be re-evaluated and reclassified.

Workers are people, but when they act in representation of the company they work for they are agents of the corporation or company or group. That is literally the law.

Look, it is clear there are trolls and people that just want to argue rather than to discuss the issue and some people who are completely oblivious to how things work, believing you can just vote and things will be fixed. As such rather than consistently feeding you guys and being trolled and receiving downvotes from people abusing them because they disagree.. I'll just move on.The majority of the subscribers left, so yes we were. We were the real fans of what they promised numerous and numerous times over. Most likely we were also the beta testers, I know I was.The problem is we aren't a democracy and that isn't how our government truly works. That's because of the corruption.You don't want to see what it would be like if we removed all the power of the government or made it so weak.. companies would run rampant without the limited enforcement and regulations we have. If you don't believe that then just look at other countries where are companies are actually running rampant.

Banning lobbying would solve the issue, removing the corrupt individuals as well. When people see that the corrupt individuals must face punishment for their actions, then they will actively seek to be punished less by being less corrupt.I have. Removal of the entities, the structure, and the links leading to it.The government would have to interfere otherwise you'd get things like in other countries where companies run rampant and have sweatshop workers all over the place.Sigh, you forget people listen to attack ads, corrupt news sources, aren't informed, vote for the person whose name they even recognize and also just vote for their party.

None of that is based on who is good or not or who is likedI have done so much research before I ever even discussed this topic in my first debate trust me. But as I said skewing and distortion and honestly reddit was probably not a place able to discuss this rationally sadly.The problem is that it is the hardest thing to actually read them for very long.. The style and content of the writing is... Draining.I did vote actually.

I did months and months of research and fact checking. Then I voted for every position.

You keep distorting what I say. Stop replying to what you infer.

But more voting can't really happen when the media acts like this.I'll give a disclaimer. This game has a lot of problems. A lot was cut and it really isn't nearly as good as the scores would insinuate. Be sure to really think about if you want this game.Wait.. what about the release of gases coming from the ice? Still doomed, bummer.Being technically correct is the best kind of correct.What if it is an Apple computer?Nope.

You've outed yourself as a troll now. Why? Notice how you took what I said, inferred what I meant and then distorted the actual reality and response? You simply spent time lying. That's all. No more lying okay?

Blocked and reported.Health care.Everything on the test.Why does he have a twitch shirt? I need to know this.I do like story, so I'll be playing it, how I do that is yet to be determined. Might play a friends.. might not.&gt; 1

So it does partially go down! Hah they told us it worked! Our fult for not being at that third level.Aren't cock rings more metal bands that you wonder how they got on there?Why should a fine be something you can easily recover from within the same year, rather than in a basis that would be a significant burden that would not be readily explainable to shareholders?

The truth of the matter is that there should never be a point in your life where defending a corporation seems like a good idea or logical. They would never do it for you."How is my driving?" 

Call ###-###-####

EPIC LEVEL!Where are the elves...Rebel Fleet meet:

https://starwarsforce.files.wordpress.com/2014/02/1469877_719288914765698_349683271_n.jpg

The Imperial Fleet.

You lose.The consensus seems to be that he was a pretty bad Governor though..."Who is biting my tail... oh it's just my son/daughter. Carry on."*Nibble*

Well already got that happening... What else don't you want?Where?Defective "kong" product.. has no peanutbutter in it, dog is confused.Did yo ureally need to show me a pic of a penis?

I'm sure your penis appreciates the LEDs... but why in heavens would you get this or that ring.. none of this makes any sense. Just like putting it in chastity doesn't make sense. Ugh.But if the concept of everyone being able to go to space is a thing then clearly you don't really need "the math". You need "the money".

:-/I'm still trying to figure out why strands keep tearing after putting it in the laundry...Oh Hai, is this Seaworld?I think it might be a bit nuts.It seemed like everyone was dressed as Jar Jar this halloween. I wonder if that means the kids want him in the seventh movie?Did you see him in the trailer? I was very impressed with the costume design.You know when the match occurs his image looks 10x more handsome like.. I'm not exactly sure what happens, I think the circle cutting off a tiny bit of his head really accents his smile and face?But LucasFilm is an American Company.Disney Infinity 5.0: James Bond.Pig is super jealous... Cow gets irritated after being ignored.So the dogs name is Tiger and the other dog is dressed as a tiger? I understand it right?I feel like it's what would be in my attempt to be enticing astronomy book.That's for when I'm rich and have a room just for stargazing.I'm not kinky or like that so.. ehh. Maybe I'll accept oral but that's about as far as that's going.Millions.Quite honestly I think that every year....I feel like she'd then say "on second thought, sure" and so the lady would pull out a second.My Golden just got through cancer and had a part of her ear removed... I haven't seen her since and she's 15 and a half now. I feel for you... I'm worried how long she'll have and I.. I couldn't put her down.He could not have chosen a worse color.Wait.. so.. I'm guessing the disc wouldn't work after this since it's not just data being removed but the possibility of putting data on it?PCMR.. I don't remember but I do know it was due to moderator abuse.

Also should I buy this, I defended myself from an attack once.Honestly all of them in my eyes.. I don't really feel the vulgarities are necessary.Playing video games, there's a massive number of math factors in there.

My damage is 450.. but if I use this buff it's + 60.Naked Halo :-/Doesn't work for me.. also don't have any insurance because while I was depressed I wasn't able to send forms back quick enough and was kicked out.Yes but people don't seem to realize just how bad corporations would be without the little regulations that government does actually enforce.I started having fine cigars and various types of alcohol for camaraderie purposes with friends, or in attempts to get to know people better to become better friends.

So there's that.The primary reason is corporate corruption and lobbyism corruption of congress. That's really the answer for mostly everything to do with government to be honest.. at least in the US. And it seems in the UK.Since bullets will barely do anything to a walking zombie... I feel this is how you die.March of the Penguins.My 15 year old Golden just survived cancer but they had to remove part of her eat for it.. and she'll develop more soon.. when she leaves.. I don't.. I don't know what I'll really have to live for.. life isn't going the way I planned.I do. Nearly 30!Have some Tie Defenders.No that was the difference. We came for it as a story focused mmo. It dropped that focus very quickly and so we left too."If you're happy... Clap along"Well more accurately the content at launch was. They haven't done much of anything with it sense until now and even now that's very limited.

Hence why the fans that bought it for that point mostly left and they were instead left with the need to go free to play and focus more on a mmo general market.

The gameplay though hasn't had any evolutions either sadly. Usually people recommend going through the story once or twice for free but I don't see suggestions for subscription or stayijgn with it anymore.

Oh. You're trolling and abusing down votes. Nvm, blocked.That's lovely but I'm still very disappointed in the actual title. Why would I care that it sold a lot, all that means is they don't feel a consequence of releasing a very effort missing product.People go on Reddit all the time at work so...I don't think that's right. They're paying for college, you aren't paying them.I mean there's really no excuse for the graphic situation from what we are seeing. Making excuses for a company is the job of PR not the players.It's not the issue of the top of the line. It's the issue that it looks very low effort and not even current gen.

It isn't an and or situation, they expect both to be of quality.Not just primary, more just that it's a very important part of the product. There should not be any excuse acceptable for not having current gen graphics in a big budget game. That doesn't make any sense.With my dollar I expect high quality in ALL aspects. You guys need to stop seeing it as one or the other. All parts of a game matter.Mods are not the developers though. The developers don't get credit for what mods bring. So you judge it based on what it is at presentation.

I can stand not having top gen. but this isn't even current gen. That's the low effort problem that annoys me.You can easily have both when you have a large budget. Also you're comparing two different types of games, of course they don't work the same way.

Also the way specs work to get high quality is you design for the pc and then you scale down. You don't scale up.It's like the fun and joy was ripped out.Uh... I don't understand how anyone likes any of those. I don't understand why Gravity Falls was popular either. Whatever fun I comprehend isn't in there.

Note to self: never have an opinion.Adderal is also heavily abused by students not prescribed it or who have unnecessary prescriptions. Fun fact but adderal abuse can actually less you up to have problems that would need adderal, such as ADD and such.

Adderal also isn't just straight up meth.That's depressing.Well I didn't see much of an experience or story in skyrim but I did enjoy witcher, I just hope they don't have the same problems witcher did with this new title that's coming.The problem with RL and games like it is the repetition. I don't spend my time on things to feel like I just did the same thing over and over.Pretty much everything is designed for monopolies not consumers. Honestly most of them. The problem is top posts and comments are most often False, misrepresentation, or distorted. *Turns on dog with a blog*

Yes.It's dumb for people to abuse it and be disrespectful, it isn't dumb to have integrity and not contribute to the degradation of civil discussion.... Oh where's that continual lass story expansion promised 3 years back? They've focused on operations, flashpoints, and useless stuff. And the first expansion was originally supposed to be free but it was shit and the second? Not much better.

The joke is you, trying to defend a company that screwed over its original player base and still hasn't been able to get them to return.*Notices you didn't respond to anything I said*

You're just a kid and a troll. BLocked and reported.

They only got a very tiny little of it, we left quickly. Let me know when you get that expanded class story from 3 years back.I've had plenty of games that have both and run at 60FPS or higher depending on hardware. Again the big difference is you build for PC and then you scale down. It doesn't work if you scale up.

Obviously consoles can't handle it all but even they deserve better than these graphics, especially due to the fact they have games with better graphics and gameplay and sets already.

Fallout 4 deserved a high quality release thoroughly."Fixer. Get on that turret!"Sadly a lot of Star Wars fans hate Karen for "having a hard-on for Mandos". :-/"Thats no fair! I can't get up there.. *Pout*"You mean the hood?Well Witcher 3 for one.

And no you're not saying they scaled up.. it's clear they did though. They went for consoles first which is a major issue. Look, the game doesn't need to have next gen graphics, but this isn't even current gen. It's not appealing to look at and there are so many texture and rendering issues that can be seen just at first glance, it also reflects in the poorly populated and accessible areas and scenery.

I do hope the game turns out better than the leaks show but.. I'm not holding my breath. I'll still play it, but perhaps I'll wait for the ultimate edition or DLC edition before I decide to buy it.Except that Lucas was perfectly fine with it all until the clone wars writers wanted to change it.

And honestly for a cult of warriors from a planet that mostly become bounty hunters or such things? What she wrote made sense. Some of the forced homosexuality dialog more evident in her legacy of the force books were a little offputting but even then it made some degree of sense.

It made perfect sense that each group or faction or planet would have real cultures and multiple ways of thinking.That's last gen.

Once next gen comes out it isn't called next gen anymore.But it does have a high quality story, writing, massive scenery, and numerous other factors AFTER having gone through a graphic downgrade scandal. Let's not also forget that for an AAA game the budget for development was also quite low. We saw the same thing when Dragon Age 2 and DAI were competing against W3. Massive low effort issues.

Looking at Fallout 4 it just seems obvious that either the budget was low or they didn't try when it comes to presentation. I'm not the type to use mods either so this will impact me more than it might otherwise. It helps that the levels and graphics are current or complimentary when you're trying to play a game based on immersion.

But its out soon and so in a week or so I'll look in on it then.If I recall there were some older books about Boba and a graphic novel about Jango that solidified the mandalorian culture. Plus the knights of the old republic series really solidified the mandalorian culture as did the graphic novels and comics and those further cemented where she was getting her lore from. The Jedi defeated the Mandalorians and the culture respected them but it stands to reason that Jango the then leader of a group that comes when beckoned or at least highly respects him, would possibly have a thing against the Jedi. Plus, Tyranus likely sung words of honey to convince him especially since according to the graphic comics, Jango had competed against a large number in an arena game which brought attention from Tyrqnus.So to be fair this isn't the sub you'd go to for the non bias answer but let me try.

The PS4 has Uncharted coming out early next year and the PSPlus service still gives a good series of licensed games for its purchase price over the year. There will be other exclusives coming too.

As of now, if by selling the platform and controllers alone you can get four hundred then I'd do it but if we're including games then that really depends on whether you liked those games and what they'd cost today.

You could always buy another PS4 if more games come out that you'd want to play and it'll be cheaper though games Amy or may not be cheaper than they are now.

The mere fact of having a gaming computer doesn't solve all issues either, especially if you wanted to split screen or had friends specifically playing that or another console or had online friends doing the same.The streaming from chromecast is for videos online right? Not videos you actually own or downloaded.I stream plex to just the media server of the Xbox One. 9/10 it works even with subtitles.They pay for your salary....

Don't assume I get tickets btw.It was in one of the Legacy of the Force books when Mara was meeting some people that she was living with while staying on Mandalore.. the two men were.. well lovers of a sort."I pay your salary" is the epitome of "actually a factual basis to discuss".

As in the tuition from the students specifically for your class is paying the salary and I'm paying it, not you.

Also the word "entitled" is one of the most overused and misused words on the internet these days.

As for the rest...

According to the time value of money and simple accounting I have already incurred a liability for the money I've taken out, this means it is my money. That's how accounting and finance works.

I might also have had money of my own that either was given to me, invested for me, that I invested, or that I worked for and I might use that too.

In terms of parents if they did pay for college then they are entrusting me to learn the way I need to and to also live like a college student would and as they did, so long as things are taken care of properly.

Scholarships aren't lost for missing classes if grades are high. Some people just don't get much from the class and instead learn from the book. Perhaps you're a boring or poor teacher in general and you just don't realize that students keep falling asleep because of that in your class and they'd rather not fall asleep in your class or forget everything.

You aren't paying anything to the college, so stop that. The students all act in the way they desire and the consequences or benefits are theirs and theirs alone. You use the term "Entitled" but the truth is you're acting incredibly entitled.

Also leaving class, or not coming to class is not "disrupting the experience for everyone" people leave all the time. Further "nice" teachers doesn't mean spineless. And it isn't your job at all to label people as troublemakers because you assume how others think it, when they likely do not care. You stopping to be an asshole is you disrupting the class.The Disney EU Reset isn't relevant since we're talking about what was established way prior to Disney even buying Star Wars.

I'm pretty sure the Jaster Mereel and Mandalorian KOTOR comics and graphic novels had a huge influence on Karen as did the Jango Fett graphic novel. It sounds like you're kind of assuming that Karen did all these things on her own when instead she just adopted what was there and made it better.Same place all the rum went.They would smell the sniper while blocking the bullet!Except the canon for the Mandalorians was more aptly designed during the prequel days not before them.I don't use Plex Pass, though I should have bought a life time back when it was half price.

I just use the Plex SErver and the Media Server recognizes it.Reading the article was strange.. it was full of buzz words and lack of specificity on what was actually going to be happening.. :-/I like plex because it has a really graphic interface. But if yours really pulls embedded subtitles from different languages out for things like anime and such that's great. Often I have to fool the system into finding them and sometimes I've had to use Serviio for really annoyingly embedded ones rather than plex.Have some more holiday editionsBut they aren't even an RTs. The Aeon of Strife genre came back blizzard custom maps and was far better twelve years ago than it is today...The problem is its a slow burn because they see easier and greater financial benefits from free to play market exploitation with Heroes and Hearth and likely Overwatch.

Like it or not but as long as people are willing to pay out the ass for these free to play systems that have very little content to begin with, they will always be seen as more profitable.AoS is the real genre name. The games back then competing with the shitty repetitive DotA All stars were by far better. Eve of the Apocalypse, Age of Myths, Advent of the Zenith, Tides of Blood, Keys of Sealing.

They were legitimately fun. Now MOBA entirely relies on addicting people.The Aeon of Strife genre or AoS was used for over seven years as the name. it makes absolute sense I'd say.

I think you would call Counter strike a doom style game but I don't know if it ever was like Doom.

You do realize DotA All stars was only popular because it spammed everyone and used mass auto refreshing so you could only ever see it being hosted. It was more like a hostile takeover of the game joining list. Sure the original Defense of the Ancients from Eul and BOTO and BOLO were solid in their own right, but once Guinsoo and IceFrog hacked the map to steal it and then brutally dominate the market with it, the game had changed to just be item spam for the most part.

Eve, Tides, and AoM were the primary things people played to get away from DotA's hostility. As for today, the new DotA is again just mostly item spam and forgets the magic that the game even had. Further it primarily succeeds through addictive mechanics though obviously League does better because they literally hired psychologists to make it addictive.

The reality of games these days is that depth starts to decay and quality does too in return for a higher focus on monetary capture potential. Such as with DLC and microtransactions. We see it in Heroes and Hearth and other games... The big thing is doing the minimum to get the most. Quality isn't as much of a concern anymore.

I'd go back in an instant to the games in AoS that had character.The company doesn't look very good. Initial valuation is it isn't worth acquiring.That's because the point of Fox is to make you think that. So.. hate on Fox aside, people still get fooled into it.The problem is that coming from Fox I'm not likely to believe the reporter had a good point at all.I would sue it if you did though. Stop using my patent.Hopefully the story gets you to reach out to those that clearly aren't as social or sociaosble.I was always the person that if I sat at a table during lunch or stuff.. people got up and left. After 16 years of that happening I stopped sitting near others and always sit by myself years later because it's become an expectation.

I can relate to the birthday thing as I've only ever had one birthday party in my life. I can relate to going to movies alone but buying two tickets to randomly give to someone if they'll spend some time with you. I can relate to all the more lonely things.

But to this day I still don't know what it'd be like to sit with people who actually want you there during lunch or at the cafeteria. That doesn't mean I don't have some degree of friendships, it's just different.

Actually in retrospect, pretty much everything I do in my life is the greatest lonely thing I've ever done lol. People can... Just be shitty.I'm not sure I understand.I begrudgingly agree, but I'm setting my own schedule and working from a cigar lounge.So I guess the internet will have to go back to being upset at how bland Halo is or how awful Destiny still is, since we can't insult Fallout now.

Wait! we can start insulting Anno 2205!If they could call it something else, I'd be far less confused. I've been conditioned to reject anything on Fox because of corporate corruption of news. Now I'm being told to watch a different Fox? This is very stressful.Couldn't they just call the parents?I hear the systems are repetitive and you are still expected to build in giant box squares boringly if you want to do well. There's also a lot of feature degradation from previous titles.

That's more than enough to rant and rage at it like the end of days I'd say right?

What other games can we insult?PDa's are deadly!I heard 100% of drunk driving happens in automobiles! Ban those.The new tomb raider probably sucks and I'm sure they messed up StarCraft 2 expansion some how. Probably not enough cutscenes.Does the local news still get marching orders from corporateHonestly most redditors talk like they'd just ignore an officer so.. I'm not sure if that alone is a good indication.

Being in foster care makes me more sympathetic.We still use oil for plastics and mostly everything else. War redecpared.Shhhh.... the anti-circle jerk circle jerk is trending right now. Come back tomorrow for the contrarian circle jerk.I was answering initially more like "the graphical feature set" had been released or updated suddenly. And I was replying to that being unlikely.

But yes it is a bunch of pretty pictures and words, but we can hope. This is a change to leave the circle jerk, or join the circle jerk of "hand-waving fuck you".The underneath of your clothes now has hair.. all over it :-PWhen the value we get from school is how to draw dotted lines by our mastery of chalk...Photoshoot has improved heavily.. willing to valuate at 50% higher rate.TW3 had poor implementation of your choices in the actual game overlay or overworld too, I didn't like that. Lacking of skill sets and customization options and often times meaningless quests.Mass Effect did it pretty well in the 1st and 2nd I'd say.My father saw youtube videos of people believing that the world was flat and that the Moon was never landed on. So he believed them, because there were videos. It was honestly that simple. A video with pictures and someone talking.. more than enough. Just like the news is more than enough to get people to believe it.To be fair those are far less extreme and a lot of religious people believe that in one way or another, or simply just don't know.Can someone reverse the gif to show what it looks like when you're at the Vet but the dog convinces you to leave?Only a Sith deals in absolutes.Thermometers in your behind and needles in your legs! Oh and a cone of shame!

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=R58kSuIhURITagged forever as "Worst person in the world".If they would just cut half the door size down so the dog didn't feel locked in a room with no windows or openness, I'm sure the situation would be resolved better.Literally evil.Your Golden is planning on dropping you off to get spayed tomorrow btw. See how you like it. I took out the rusty scissors in preparation.That's the contrarian circle jerk tomorrow, once we learn Fallout 4 is making people literally fail their exams because of eye cancer. Or more accurately, because one pixel is slightly more red than others.The one invitation to play footsies that you may not come back from.:-|Traditionally there's a stay at home parent so.. probably 20 - 25 minutes?Depends what parallel reality you're coming from.Honestly I love story and books and whatever else but... NV  bored me heavily and the third didn't.:-( Sad life.Happy dog makes me happy and forget this trauma.Ban them too! No walking either. Filthy Jays.I really hate excel, why is it so boring looking and why does it haunt my life? Also why am I master certified But can't remember anything?Please bring back Borders fruitkula smoothies...

Down votes? I would visit Amazon books I'd they had Borders delicious smoothies.
Are the Spartans now cigar loving manly men?No. Look up the history of the word jaywalker.Tummy rub time!Down below with rusty scissors yes. Bark.I believe with Halsey it was basically a " The ends justify the means but Mendez grows attached to a few of them. Though Hunt the Truth showed Mendez as an ON I stooge.

But the Halo 5 story was a mess. Wouldn't be surprised if she wrote it as well.You're distorting the Mandalorian thing. She was giving the perspective of what the Jedi were like to the way of life of Mandalorians. Several Jedi characters were sympathized with as well and the Mandos respected them. Plus, the Mandos from the comics more defined the war against the Jedi. Jango was depicted as being bitter.Wasn't she simply told to+No motivations for anything. Random decisions. no character development, no real build up. Disjunction.. and so much more. Worst I've played.I am a bit worried about his AI looking so poor in the leak videos. That gives me an impression he is useless.This is a site where people downvote or troll or abuse others just for having different views or opinions. It happens in this sub, in every sub, and specifically in large amounts in this particular thread. People even downvote others just to move their comment up if they can.

To be surprised that people would be against some common-thread of thought or interest and do anything they can to remove you? That doesn't seem like it should be a surprise.It'd be worth more though to the majority.

I'm not sure what graphic mods that will or will not be paid for you expect to come out. There were never any improvements to Fallout 3's graphics through mods that stayed True to the canon or anything, just things that changed things utterly by replacing textures rather than improving and changing the skylines rather than improving. I don't see "improve" as "replace" and that's why mods like that annoy me. A high quality "improvement" mod would be of value to anyone.What I would like is the equivalent of an HD remaster in terms of mod capability.Not what I was saying. The textures are not improvements they are replacements. Things that vary, different colors, different style, different depth or whatever. They're not simply improvements like a remaster, it's literally a change in things.

One of the biggest things is how roads are changed with the Fallout texture mod "updates".How does he get the cat to do all those things?The thing is.. not everyone WAS against it. There's a key opportunity for exploitation there. It will come back.I don't think I can run 4K but are those legitimate texture improvements or just replacements?Ahh for Skyrim, that's probably why I never heard of it. It doesn't look too different from the style so that might be an exception. The remaster style has always been my preference.

Sadly this thread is not very welcoming of discussion so I'm bowing out of it. The sub has had a lot of bad press recently and I'm beginning to see why.

Hopefully Fallout 3 and NV get a real texture improvement of sorts.Because quality expectations are dropping sadly.Icewine is delicious beyond belief. I'm okay with them protecting it.I certainly hope no one abused that drug...It seems the constant need to insult the prequels which sold well and are still extremely popular with many millions is a way just to compensate for small penis size or some such.

Prequels are likewise the only reason you got the new tv series and the new movie and many great games. Many also would argue against the attacks on them.What is it with the constant advocating of abusing an extremely addictive and damaging drug? I do not understand it.I mean NAFTA was really bad for us... And there's already a lot of BAd in this. That's enough to classify it as bad.Economic safety is always at the cost of the country, people, and economy when focused on a corporation which only thinks of itself.I feel that since this was clearly not made for the common citizen but for corporate and business interests, that any complaint against it not being able to easily be understood is a valid one. You present things for your audience.Sorry but we went way behind  sustaining and rewarding itself and all at the cost of customers and regular employees.

I'm done defending corporations. Never again. Maybe a small business.
Israel is attacked and told that all its citizens should WaPo into the sea. That's a bit of a different thing.Willing to bet a disproportionate amount ends up with company executives.No you need to seriously subsidize college here and it costs more like 30000 a year.The AoS degradation that is MOBA is not in the same genre of an RTS. Why would anyone relate the two?Explain this to me. What do you define as replay? The story doesn't change, gameplay doesn't really change, and repetitive factors don't change. How does Skyrim have any non mod based replay value?

You're comparing the series that created custom maps which define replay value to a game that takes sixty five to seventy hours to fully complete and has no real satisfying content experience so much as just people fooling around.I'm not sure that's value so much as brand recognition.Yes but I was disappointed with Swarm Even when it is, I'm not sure who can still be trusted if anyone.. everyone seems Fo have scandals or just not be objective in reviewing..

I just watch the game online now and then decide.I actually didn't consider anything a spoiler really until you told me they were major spoilers.There are DEFINITELY changes to us law all throughout this and other sections.Hopefully it's not that simple of a story nor that straight forward.I already factored them and AJ and everyone in.

Bias doesn't = objective. Definitely not Yahtzee.No it's public. You've no idea what publics can cost.A lot of the Technology based parts of the TPP are specifically intended to circumvent legal ruling in the courts that already existed. It's pretty clear, but obviously we need real professionals to read this stuff and translate it properly for all o fus.I'qm buying an rpg!Typical trends of information seems to show a lot of aversion towards it due to poor graphics (indicating low effort) so far. I'm hoping that's not True but it is Bethesda..I'm sure the fact a child book resulted in cursing and hatred and overexaggeration is the worst gift for the writer.Other than spelling "available" wrong on the door. I'm confused why you would buy for a test threatening your life.I'm sorry but I've had issues with them all and Angry Joe lost his ability to be objective in my eyes when he became popular.I would disagree. Analyzing the components that make up the game, recognizing each has a part to play in the score, and fairly applying these, among other factors is key to it.Damn you making it so I can't sleep!Ideally, but I don't think that really exists anymore.I might play CO Op."Get back in the hole!"Oopsies I meant DO3 and I really meant Fallout 4=I'm more concerned about the downgraded graphics we've been seeing. I don't need next gen but these days I do kind of need current gen or I get bored.Well we've seen a lot of downgraded textures in the leaks so I'm just concerned if they're real or not.I can tell you that NAFTA had far more of an effect than that.So long as consoles make up the majority of most games sale numbers... You'll be seeing them for a long time, especially with rising costs of game design and the lack of desire to focus on quality.Except even if it was only downgraded for consoles (and not because it was extremely high end graphics on PC) you're still forgetting they could have kept that and given it to PC instead. They did not.

From what we've learned, the presentation was simply too much for the majority of consumers PC's.http://www.dsogaming.com/news/the-witcher-3-out-of-its-4-million-sold-copies-1-3-million-were-from-the-pc-version/

It's a simple matter of focusing on profit.A new one.You're talking more about a game not held back by publishers desiring to hit large sale numbers but entirely reliant on peoples willingness to donate, fund, and buy something that doesn't yet exist. There are very few PC games that can exist without the console market primarily because of the profit potential. It's simply a fact that consoles generally make up the majority portion of sale numbers for most games.

Instead of acting like its the consoles themselves holding things back, be upset that the consoles simply aren't upgraded as much as they used to be.The PC market also has heavy marketing just like consoles. The consoles themselves can use word of mouth to sell too that isn't some singular thing. It woul dbe an interesting experiment to remove most marketing for a game other than a launch trailer or two and see what happened if that money was put in development. Compare sale numbers of similar games with more marketing.You basically want this from Heavy Rain:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SsQT3mbvVWYSecond to last seemed like Denver the guilty dog.There are also many reasons not involving consoles. You're too narrow minded and fixated on one possibility.That isn't relevant to what I said. There are also other reasons and you're too fixated on the console explanations rather than the budget issues they had not to mention how marketing took up too much.Reasonable people can't look the wrong way all the time or every time though.Stop resisting! Embrace the cuteness.I never saw those graphics to be stable, I saw a limited tech demo with a ridiculously high end computer attached to it.

The budget for this game was always very low compared to an AAA experience I'm not surprised they ran into troubles.

I admit there was a downgrade but this sub blames consoles for far too much as it is and I argue there are other reasons for the departure.His TPP agreement will effect climate concerns as well.If the machine says you win, then you should win. It's pretty much that smple. If you try to argue it can say you won but you really didn't.. then you'll lose the people that will even come to play.Obviously insurance.Memes, replacing insults with "Autism and Retard", trolling, corruption and corporate lobbying power, and of course free to play.This raises the price of buying Windows.If Steam Machines are aimed at casual audiences then the prices have to go way down for the higher end stuff, otherwise they would be better suited getting a console as they'd have access to the Nintendo, Microsoft, or Sony exclusives they want to play.To be fair, if you consider the price of windows, and likely a peripheral plus a computer and your budget is to spend the same you would on a console.. you're not going to get very far.

If you're buying a retail computer with windows then you're not going to get very far either in terms of something as cheap as a console and let's be honest, most people buy retail computers.

Like it or not the price point is in favor of the consoles at that price range. If you want to price it up 200 dollars then fine but at that point the console user may stop looking at you, or if they do, they want to see the CURRENT exclusive titles and for the most part other than a wide range of indies, that's usually just an RTS here and there (a dying genre) and an MMO (a specific market genre) and sometimes MOBAS (a very specific market genre).

I can also tell you that consoles generally don't die until their life span is dead and if they do replacements are usually under warranty or arrangements can be made.. computers.. every 3 years I have to replace some 200+ dollars in my computer.This requires them to want to play a particular steam game. Perhaps they want to play Halo? Then you end up buying a console because you're not going to shaft your friend.

You become okay with it, Tada.

It works both ways, the problem is that for a Steam Machine you're inevitably going to have to install Windows on it.. that ups the price.The problem is that as of now there isn't any attraction to the steam machines for what it offers or its current exclusive line.I honestly don't like the idea of paying for a mod... Also Carbot was very advocating of microtransactions of all types good and bad by Blizzard in one of his more current videos. I don't really want to deal with him other than watch his funny videos..... well if the campaign content is the DLC then I would very much be buying it for story.So long as the story is good.. but not if the price isn't worth the content and definitely not if it seems cash-grabby. I've already been milked from Heroes and Hearth and I'm not happy about their trend to do this.The issue is less the number and more the percentage. Any game that lost 50% of its subscribers from top woul dbe in a serious dilemma. That's simply the truth. From the players I've talked to that spend a lot of time in the game, giving 16 months with no patches or content leading into Warlord which wasn't anywhere what people needed and was severely cut.. well people seem very ready to write it off.If the goal is to buy a pre-assembled starter rig then they are thinking of buying a gaming computer not likely to be a replacement for their console, unless they're ready to leave their console friends and favorite game titles behind which most social gamers are not willing to do.

As it is linux, the game support is minimal so you'll need Windows, this raises the price as does the consistent need for upgrades to continue playing games at a relatively good graphic level.Slow loading is annoying but as far as I can see, it has about the same level of content that I expected--not much. That's somewhat disappointing. I'm curious how much this 50 dollar season pass expects to add.The gameplay mechanics, implementation of vehicles, and imbalances more likely.One of the conveniences of the console is that one doesn't really need to ever do anything to it. It'll last for 7+ years, and rarely if ever does anyone need to spend anything more on said console, all games are specifically geared for its hardware set. When you add customization, changing hardware and additional purchases.. you remove that "convenience".

I'm not really sure what market or audience or success rate this machine will have. Outside of the loyalists I'm not sure what the numbers will be. It'll be interesting to watch.

Very few high quality AAA experiences are compatible with Linux and exclusives for SteamOS are nonexistent in the current sense. If it's preloaded with Windows then the cost is a lot more. Windows isn't cheap.I've always had to replace motherboard and processor every few years due to hardware issues, so a six year life is unknown to me.you miss the point though. As console games get better over time on consoles due to optimization and better knowing the hardware and never have any compatibility issues, a reasonably priced or slightly higher steam machine won't be able to do the same, especially with it already being relatively weak in the hardware settings. Forcing you to spend more money than you would on the console in either replacing it or swap out upgrades. Based on how people work, you'll likely see them going to a best buy or sending them in to get these upgrades because like with a. computer they won't do it themselves out of fear or lack of comfort.

So ultimately he's provided nothing bad happens with the console, the steam machine / pc will ultimately be more expensive especially since developers aren't going to start optimizing for more than consoles and the baseline or high mode of games for computers.Not just an ending. Hundreds of problems with the start to finish.Actually leviathan dlc is what actuality changed it more, but no it's just as bad as was the entirety.That's kind of key to why you didn't recognize the terribad.I'm sorry but there were hundreds of contradictions, plotholes, nonsensical factors, gameplay degradation issues, streamlining, the budget reducing multiplayer and numerous other problems start to finish.

It ranks up with DA2 and DAI and TOR in terms of them completely screwing up their games.My standards are merely requiring of consistency amongst all titles. They didn't even try.I'd have to disagree, there was an immensity of issues regarding plot, gameplay, and consistency. The games forced multiplayer also reduced the budget heavily which takes away from development and marketing was the largest expense which shows.

The events weren't bad, the execution and information surrounding them were. It was one of the major disappointments in gaming I've had started to finish.

I will probably play this new one but I suspect it'll be hard for them to ever get another penny from me after all the other problems with bioware titles recently.One to two was a paradigm shift in BioWare design, a mark of EA coming over them, and a genre transition all in one.

Two to three was a mark of streamlining and marketing over development as well as the ego of bioware finally showing to its fans in the aftermath.

One was essentially not an action rpg but an rpg with shooter mechanics. Two was essentially a shooter with rpg mechanics. Three was essentially a shooter with a dialog wheel and everything else just being fluff.

The story of one was always best though. Two didn't do that part very well.One key thing is that the cinematics in the game contradict literally all the codex entries and that the dialog contradicts the cinematics. The codex gets largely forgotten as does impact from choices to be honest.DA2 did not have an excellent story. The motivations and development for characters was sub par, especially with Andres, and they didn't really develop the other sides that well either. They had serious potential with the Qunari and deep roads but they squandered that. DA2 also had issues with huge health bars leading to high repetition. Further wave based combat nonsensically, a forced status system, imbalances all over the place, mostly meaningless choices and poor implementation of origin choices, and many other problems. To call that a good game.... It was a chore to go through and many will never touch it again.

DAI maintains good story sure, but the writing had lackingn factors, gameplay and combat was poorly done and really got extremely boring and repetitive quickly. skill sets didn't vary much and there were no real quality combat mechanics in there. The character development became very cliche or forced at many times throughout it, and hinterlands is a hanfwave excuse for everything. Not only do people point at it to say just skip this, not realizing that the main starting area is supposed to be something desirable to explore in games, but the larger areas and the first dlc area too are immensely repetitive and immensely pointless. Crafting becomes far too obtuse and expansive and items really don't matter for the most part. Among other large issues.

TOR was a game that promised continual class story expansions after launch and when people didn't see any additional content after six months the majority of subscribers left. The first expansion was short, had minimal content, and didn't really factor player differences. It was released too late and didn't bring back many either. Shortly after class story expansion was cancelled hereto permanently by them. They then shifted to free to play. And a taxing form of it at that. Sense then barely anything has really come out and their new expansion still ignores players mostly and has a staggered release, removes voice dialog in its secondary form due to not wanting to spend more and calling it style, which is disconcerting to people used to the voice dialog which differentiates it from other games, and among other issues it has no real content after that short story. TOR will likely 've a sign that story mmo doesn't work as the focus even though they only tried at launch and killed it themselves. Their base now is mmo players and nothing different.EA bought into them roughly soon enough to place their name on the boxes of the two titles. The doctors gave up a lot of creative control rights and EA began doing its thing that it has done to many others.It's harder to think of something that is rather than isn't good. The Reaper medium battle on the Quarian planet is a gross sign of your technology not being what the codex or dialog says. Instead you launch minimal damage kinetic mass cannons that are supposed to each have nuclear level power... And it effortlessly ignores them all. Don't even expect a thanix cannon which the codex says is mass adopted now, or high end black hole bombs that take out many reapers on the TURIAN planet. Just ignore everything for stupid reasons.

The final battle cutscene too. Ignore all lasers and thanix cannons and dreadnoughts and actually all the ally ships too. Just a large line of ballistics that do nothing and we already knew did very little from the first title prior to everyone being upgraded. A sign of the game not factoring its own lore.

And hundreds more.Honestly I don't know anyone and have never heard of anyone not having hardware problems in computers every few years.. I likewise don't know anyone and have never heard of anyone having console problems other than the red ring for any consoles until their lifetime died.

It could be anecdotal or minority but I don't believe that's the case. Known grounds but getting better at using specific hardware that never changes. Often times you can't choose, the games force you to.Um.. perhaps you need to reread. But those are plotholes, contradictions and inconsistencies all in one. They also would have changed the entire conflict had those been recognized.

The thanix cannon was definitely indicated as largely implemented, it came from sovereign in the first game from analyzing the weapon and wreckage. Was used in the second to destroy the collector ship and was implemented widely across all destroyers and larger.

Every accusation I've made is sadly obvious to anyone who pays attention.

Point is that even with those two scenes, the result would have been far different had the plotholes been resolved properly. For one.. Honestly the reapers would have done far warse.

As I said blackhole bombs are gravity singularity weapons similar to what dreadnoughts fire for long range bombardment. On Palavan they were used heavily for reaper destruction on the medium platforms.The collector ship wasn't a dreadnoight it was different. You're forgetting something. First a thanix cannon is more powerful than a mass accelerator so by default the should be using those. Second, codex and planet description details reveal its use as having success against the reapers. Third, as it is literally the weapon reapers use themselves but red instead.. It makes even more sense to use against them.

Even beyond that, other weapons and tech from alien races are not incorporated. The final battle previously showed ships coming in from other factions minorly but even though it showed dreads and heavy forces, none of those were shown in the final battle and none of them did anything in game either. The ground battles against husks and reaper stuff should have been the biggest problem though not with mech utilization and tanks. Instead the space fleets due to plothiles were made the problem. That's more the line I should reserve for you. You are responding to things as if you're not even aware of the context or what really happened. It took fleets to destroy sovereign who had a heavy energy shield due to being a vanguard and connecting to the citadel to power it while also having a geth armada distracting the forces. Further the thanix cannon is the literal weapon that reapers use, it is already proven far more affective.

Look I know ME, Star Wars, and most sci fi more like the back of my hand. What I've said can all be verified by reading the codec and paying attention to dialog and story cinematics and descriptions from planets and other intel.

You just want to say I'm wrong but won't even recognize the actual events. Then you misuse troll. I don't appreciate trolls.... He explored the protheans, was clearly integral to exposing the reality of the Asari, and was so intertwined in the game that it became clear it had been a withheld character.

Reading your posts I'm becoming convinced you never do research or don't use facts because nothing you seem to post is ever accurate.We are talking about the vast majority not the niche minority that goes on reddit or internet forums or customizes computers.

Windows will cost a hundred or more for them.It seems these days we have cameras but they are often turned off.The thanix cannon IS the reaper weapon. The Reaper weapons cut apart ships in ME1. So we already know it is more powerful than all the Mac cannons being used.

The GARDIAN lasers are ship to ship armor melting lasers also used for point defense.

You saw dreadnoughts in the visual they didn't do anything that their codex defines in their description. A dreadnought is the strongest of ships meant for planetary and capital ship destruction.

The thanix cannon is also indicated in description, codec, planetary intel, and overheard dialog as being used in most ships and working effectively against reapers. But in actual gameplay and scenes that doesn't get mentioned or utilized.

... How is it baseless speculations when I've read every book and graphic novel, played the games fifteen times each and know the lore and story comprehensively? That's not speculation.

You disagree so you want me to prove it to you, when in truth you should be the one trying to find proof against what I said. I'm on my phone but I'm not going to go through the entire game looking for the piece of dialog you need that's a waste of my time for a game I hate and when I have more pressing needs for my time. But I'll do some cursory looking to see if it's obviously placed a little later.

Keeping in mind that these are just two plotholes huge as they are of hundreds of critical ones. You're arguing in my element. I know this stuff significantly.Don't forget the cigars.I hate fishing..The inclusion of alcohol through a pub crawl contradicts the harmless factor.Sounds more like any dog.The idea one can objectify women and become sexually aroused and attracted to them intentionally same with porn.. while married.. it all contradicts itself.The booze and drugs seem to reinforce this bring likely to happen.Well it is a bias towards those that have strippers at the female party.I kind of want to play strip poker.Being drunk stopped being a legitimate excuse for things legally, socially, and mentally a long time ago.No remorse though.Didn't know Dell sells them. I'd have to see the hardware and total costs including shipping and tax to make a comparison to the soon to be 300 consoles.Well alcohol impairs cognitive processes, so when everyone is getting drunk in situations where drunken antics, shennanigans, or decisions may be less frowned down on.. it can lead to a type of encouragement to continue doing so and afterwards decisions such as randomly going to a strip club or other such things can easily be rationalized and then the issues start. Add drugs into the mix as many parties have and these issues become far worse. That's just one possible route.See you're going about life in a way that.. well honestly I don't know anyone with a successful marriage that followed your line of thought. The people I know with 20 - 30 years + of happy and healthy years were very much focused only on each other. Merely seeing an attractive woman shouldn't cause you to constantly have arousals unless you're thinking sexual or inappropriate thoughts as well.

Marriage, especially in the majority-based religion sense, is a connection between two people becoming one in a permanent way. It doesn't avail itself of the things you mention. As for saying what neither of you would or not do, that's feasibly impossible to confirm when surrounding yourselves with a more permissible atmosphere. Who knows what could happen.It should likely have already been a thing planned long before that to be honest.Likely the desire for consistent sex.Yeah he stopped collecting doesn't mean he doesn't have any success with it or memorabilia.Oh hey, you have some money I want JimBoBillyBobJustice. *Bang*. Now you don't.

See how bad that type of greed is? Now you're dead.He didn't lie. He stopped collecting that doesn't mean he threw away what he had before.I mean the banks kind of.. win.Ehh... the bill needed to provide free health care or a singlepayer system. Nothing more nothing less.You can easily blame companies and corporations for exploitation and such, especially when they're the ones creating the loopholes, not just using them.You're skewing a bit. You mention restrictive/dogmatic religions but the Abrahamic faith is 4.5 billion people alone and that's just for that grouping, that is the majority. You also skew a bit by mentioning "thinking them as attractive" you're not doing that when you're being aroused, you're thinking sexual thoughts as well, your penis has an intrinsic connection to the thoughts going on in your mind not just visual appearances. Finding someone attractive or appealing is one thing, giving into lust is an entirely different thing altogether. It isn't being honest with yourself.

If you're active church going Christians then you're hurting your faith by doing what you're saying much less being okay with it. First you're never going to see a Jesus-believing Christian at a strip club, that's debauchery and temptation all wrapped up together and the bible already calls it out specifically. Same with lust. While forgiveness is the thing, that doesn't mean you're supposed to actively sin by intention. There is no "varying belief" when it comes to what the bible says, the denominations don't edit the bible and if you're Catholic it's far more strict due to adherence to the Pope and other such dogma. Obviously not every Christian actively pursues Jesus and cares about the core of what the bible says but if they don't then they're not really living a Christ-like life in that sense are they?

In a sense, if we're talking religion it does make your beliefs less valid. Either you're sinning intentionally or you're hand-waving what the bible says, there is sadly no justification otherwise because the words don't change nor does the message. It isn't a set of rules but it is a set of guidelines and directions to get to know Jesus better which means with a lust-free mind.

I didn't say they couldn't watch porn, I said the long-lived and health relationships don't though exceptions to all rules exist, and with a widely increasing rate of divorces, second divorces, and continual divorces.. that isn't really something the statistics disagree with.

I can actually, if you live by a set of principles and make them intrinsic then you're just as likely to violate them as you're likely to behave in a way that is completely contradictional to your personality and views. But if you rely merely on trust and knowledge while also flirting with temptation constantly. I mean if you're saying you're a Christian then that's basically what you're doing, flirting with temptation or more accurately the devil. Watching porn in any sense is quite literally sinning intentionally by focus on debauchery.

In your sense you'd have more an argument if you were an atheist or agnostic or other minority type belief structure because you would be able to answer you simply don't care. But when you state you're a Christian then you really do contradict yourself heavily.Anecdotal, the vast immensity of stories about being drunk and such are about stupid things happening, things they wouldn't do otherwise. You open the door you open the paths.

One of the top rated comments here is literally a guy ignoring responsibility for having sex with the bridge on her bachelorette party because they were both drunk...Well that was the loss of some useful IQ points I'll probably miss in my next exam. The spartans would have been faster, more agile, and more responsive. Everyone would probably have died quickly against them.I don't know a single Christian in existence that doesn't believe the Bible is words inspired by the Holy Spirit and thus holy and perfect. I know a wide variety of Calvinists and different types of theological experts and pastors and ministers and I can tell you there isn't anyone that with a straight face could say that. Further there is no Christian alive that actively follows the bible that can say porn is okay, sex before marriage was okay, debauchery or drunkenness is okay or that any other intentional sin is permissive or okay. The forgiveness factor was not so that you could go around actively sinning by intention still. Even if you believed the bible wasn't holy spirit inspired which means you don't believe the bibles own words, then you're still insulting and desecrating Jesus's sacrifice through his death by intentionally and actively sinning.

You differ in a way that is blasphemy and heretical and that is terrifying and should be avoided. Your line of thought is incredibly dangerous and would basically lead to no difference between Christians versus those that do not follow the path of following Christ. In this case you simply believe a God exists but don't believe in his rule sets or reduce sin or corruption from your life. That's.. if you can't see how problematic that is and how nonsensical that is then I can not comprehend you as a person.

Porn is definitely in contradiction, even outside the Abrahamic faiths it is primarily seen that anything that indicates sexual lust and objectification is not in ones path of purity. You're essentially indicating that humanity should be able to do as it pleases and there's no consequences. You can't live your life righteously if you're actively sinning.Most people haven't read it or can actually comprehend what it really says so.. that means literall ynothing.In simplistic terms the corporate run-through of government to get what they want has not in any semblance ever been good for the continuity of the government, the country, or for its people. Often times not even the economy. Only for themselves. In this means the decisions are not rational and the few good things within the TPP are things that should have already been laws regardless and are just being used to as bartering chips.

The argument that corporations should not be faulted for using loopholes and doing everything they can to make a profit is False when they are themselves the ones creating the loopholes and influencing the signing of bills and the construction and writing of both them, the tax code, and other such things. That is itself a problem.

The NAFTA for reasons far beyond job loss was bad, this is a trade agreement with far more corporate influence it is in itself bad all over and honestly.. a corporation should never have been consulted or had any influence on a trade treaty.There should be no chickens bred for cock fighting in the first place...Everything you said would be great if 0 corporations had influenced the TPP. They did, this corrupts everything.You're encouraging sin, denying the sacrifice of Jesus and him being the Son of God and his teachings, and actively dismissing the bible. And the Apostle Paul did not state what you're saying.

Your beliefs are not mainstream. You go to a Protestant, Baptist, Presbyterian, or Nondenominational or Catholic church and none of them will agree with you. I also know Lutherans and none of them believe or think or are taught what you're saying.

There are some Christians who believe that the Gensis sections are allegorical but no one thinks to disregard them. There are no contradictions in the bible when the considerations of historical context and applicable information are considered and analyzed, this is debunked constantly in seminaries.

You are blasphemous and heretical and I will not speak with you. You are flaunting with the devil and have decried everything that Christianity stands for. Not the teachings of my church but the teachings of the bible itself and the Word of God and the New Testament as well as the teachings from the old that were fulfilled by Jesus. The Catholic church never believed as you do since any historical timeline can be established to it.

As I said, you are clearly far too corrupt in this faith line and nothing I can say can clearly convince you of the basics of the bible and the basics of the faith that even a kid would know in terms of not giving in to lust, not choosing to sin and not living in a way outside the pursuit of Christ-like behavior.

I have never met someone like you across hundreds of thousands of people I've met and I can only hope that you are far more than a statistical oddity than you recognize. You are more an atheist than anything.I'm using historical context. Statistics and facts agree with it. The established precedent of what NAFTA did to us also shows how bad these are. Likewise the fact a private entity can influence governmental procedure to this level is absurd and insane. If you'd like to review the findings then go to the sites tasking lawyers to read it, such as those that have a pawn in the game.There's no opinion there though, just comments based on factual data and historical precedent which establishes what is required for proper policy making and indicates certain corruptions.There shouldn't be that either.PETA never should have been allowed to exist due to what it does.Do they become tasty gummies then?Suffice it to say he blamed alcohol which did lower his inhibitions because that's what it does. What specifically caused his actions is another matter entirely.No, I'm pointing you to understand the root of the problem.Since all of this stuff is intensive studying of a sort, my question has to become what are you doing to destress and relax your brain with non intensive material? Games were it for me though some are high intensity. What about you?If you are programming games.. doesn't that relate to the thing you're trying to get away from?Afraid of it? I drink wine and relax and gladden the heart. I just do not get drunk. I also know that its important to recognise what type of impact alcohol has on the brain and the serious things that can come out of being inhibited or intoxicated.

As for being healthy and responsible.. I can tell you most can't, they just lower the bar a great deal.As a Christian yes because of his soul, but speaking strictly the issue is that he's claiming he's a Christian yet everything he has said is so against Jesus and his views and the journey of faith and even the entire Abrahamic faith. Also indicating he represents the majority when clearly that isn't the case... The issue is blasphemy and his actions could cause others to stray the path towards one that doesn't recognize the negatives or consequences and is human centric rather than God focused. In short he's speaking the words of the devil.

As for the problems of living in temptation, yes there are serious issues with that but that's another discussion altogether.Well you'll want to verify the integrity and cache.

If it's from some other source you may not be able to because registry information makes it work and copying that isn't something I recommend.

So first, worldly pleasures are themselves sinning for the most part and nearly all are selfishly conceited and damaging to the soul. Debauchery and lust and addiction and drunkenness and all that. It brings suffering on you, on God and on your soul and often you impact others through it. So that's one of the cardinal factors of faith.

Being a man of faith would mean you didn't intentionally engage in temptation from the devil or more accurately you were actively striving to become better and cease sinning intentionally. Anyone not recognizing Jesus as the son would be damned yes. As that's a greater evil.

Having an ill thought towards another is tantamount to murdering another in the faith due to where the thoughts come from. This man is also actively breaching the faith and possibly leading others away from it, this causes a serious problem of suffering for others.

You go to hell for being a sinner, that simple. You accept Jesus and strive to live towards him or towards His glory and recognize the sacrifice he made to go to heaven.

You look at harm as attacking someone physically or verbally, but actions impact the soul, faith, and journey of others too. Damage to this, an ill thought, or even lazyness are all manifestations of the corruption and that is the problem.If doing so justified its existence and continued the problem then yes. I'd use something else, though killing isn't usually the best option.Actually.. they do.No they really shouldn't in my opinion. Not for loans.Um... You could do it for free like other countries.Free like other civilized countries investing in their youth rather than penalizing them.Financial basics won't fix the issue for fifty thousand of college loan debt.A bs in math IS valuable though...You don't choose your passions and you're always told to go with your passion.stop hating downward.
Careful in this thread people. A lot if people are hating downward at people for making mistakes or getting unlucky. The system encourages that and it punishes you either way. Don't hate downwards, that's how they keep you satisfied.Do you think I care what people not representing the people properly care about? They should have all been kicked out the second they were found to be accepting lobbyist support.I wouldn't use that sword.There are no conservatives or liberal parties there are people who take money from lobbyists that are paid by either corporations or by rich people. Both parties use the same but sometimes have a difference or two. There are also marketing points to make sure your party has some difference but which almost always gets compromised. These points are useless.

Only the voting history of a candidate matters next to their contributors. Calling yourself a party other than "against corruption and corporate influence" is nonsensical because those in power don't care.

The goal is to make you hate downward.Please throw up in your verification can disposal unit.I'd use something else is what I said. Obviously PETA isn't every sword.No tips? That doesn't seem like a job most want to take then.I may not know the history of every sword though. This sword kills animals and advocates things fo ranimals without knowing the science.

This other sword might scam me and steal my money but I don't know that and I care far more about killing the animals.

So perhaps I use a cursed sword without my knowledge and it pricks me and I turn into a demon spawn. Or perhaps I take out a laze pointer and fire a missile.I need mental and medical care right now.. but I can't get it because I can't afford out of pocket at the moment and couldn't afford insurance as a late-age student. So.. yeah.The majority of people need to use health insurance, it's the fear of using it that is the problem.Pay no heed to what's behind the curtain.Why would you want to avoid taxes that your country needs and which you owe your country for enabling you as a citizen?I actually do.

For those that actually bother to be informed about the situation, government provided health care works, wonderfully. It may not be 100% or even 95% the best but it's far better than our atrocious health care system. So yes, I understand. It should not be something I have to seek out and pay for, it should be provided the same way education should be provided, by the government.Not at all, downvote troll and abuser and overall sign of the degradation of civil discussion.

But let me point out that I am so grateful you took what I said, distorted it, misrepresented it, and effectively lied and then insulted me or attempted to insult me with said result. My appreciation is unrelenting.

I am instead making decisions based on what I do know, with some regard to what I don't know but outside of assumptions, but recognizing I don't know everything. That's called basic rationality as an FYI.

Also, as a side note if more people stopped using corruption because it brought them ahead even if they didn't agree with it, then there'd be both less corruption and less hypocrisy. You're advocating the hypocrite stance, and I'm advocating the logic stance.

The CORRECT choice is to educate yourself as much as you can before making a decision and to factor in possible aftermath of your choice. But one must remember that they can not know everything.

Now, I have to mark you as a troll for trolling.

Incorrect. There's a thread discussing this right now. Please post all your research papers, scholarly archives, and numerous testimonials across the whole spread of people in Canada that are apparently all coming for are overpriced and super excessive health insurance.

You're skewing, distorting and lying. Your first statement applies to you, please learn how to tell the truth. Let me explain how. When something isn't True and you can't prove it is True beyond a shadow of a doubt, then you don't say it.

Actually Canadian health care does enable instant access things depending on where they go. Please learn more. The Affordable Care Act was lobotomized by faux-Republican and faux-Democrat ideals when it needed to be much more. This healthcare system has actively prevented the middle class and below from getting what it needs. You're being taught to hate downward and you're doing it marvelously.

If you think the cost comes from anything other than corporate greed and lobbying you do not seem very educated on this subject.

Now please leave troll.Statistics and facts please, all the papers and scholarly archives proving this please? All the wide-breath testimonials proving it?

Because that's not True nor is it True in Uk or Canada.Depends on the legitimacy of the claim. If the claim is through corporate greed and excessive lobbying to prevent easement or relief, then no. If it's a legitimate claim that I was simply too lazy to pay off then sure.

Lending institutions don't really get a choice when the government isn't controlled by corporate corruption and greed.The government IS bad no one can argue against that, also entirely corrupt and dominated by corporations, but legitimate taxes should still be paid.Mmmm interesting sounding words. My favorite type.

Aww I got downvoted for expressing interest and appraisal :-/Actually from all the sci-fi and science in clones, the consistent use of cloning again and again and again and again would damage the genes and possibly prevent reproduction.I'm not concerned about guns, I'm concerned about education. I blame the government as always, stupid corporate corruption inhibiting public and secondary education.You mention your computer. What about your phone which you always have with you?

Addiction science shows, more recently that running or avoiding the things you were addicted to isn't generally the answer. There's nothing wrong with responsibly playing a game from time to time. Games can be fun, stories exciting, and so on. But when we treat ourselves and tell ourselves that we are addicted and others constantly reinforce this or in some form we are made to feel bad for our actions it makes the likelihood of getting over that addiction far less healthy. Versus when we are in an encouraging and supportive group, you're more likely to engage healthfully than not while also maintaining some level of interaction with that which you were previously addicted to or at least spending a large amount of time on.

In short the real interesting factor is what changed this? Because your parents weren't addicted to games as much as we are now, same with the internet or social media. The change was the instant gratification requirement and the transition of the dynamics of social media and how we interact with people.

People often talk about how when friends move and such that they keep in contact through messages or phone calls or such, but rarely do you ever hear about them actually using the much easier physical, public, and rapid transportation methods to actually meet with them or stay in contact physically. We have far less physical interactions than we ever had and we have far more judgement, stigmatization, and harassment towards those either seeking it or those we classify as "different".

Our own technological advances and human need to communicate has ultimately led us to the worst addiction most will ever know--the internet.Republicans? There are no Republicans and there are no Democrats. There's no independent party either. There are candidates and those candidates talk with representatives and those representatives and those candidates all get funded by campaign contributors and those contributors have ideas and ideals and desires and those are known and forced upon those taking the money.

The only importance is the voting history of a candidate / representative, and their campaign contributions. Their state, their hair color, their appearance, their trust worthy smile and their likelihood of taking their kids to work in a cheaper car rather than an audi is immaterial to the issue.

Until we realize the only party name should be "Removal of corporate influence in the government" there will never truly be a proper candidate or understanding of the governments inherent and deep corruption.It's the goal to have sex, we know how much people like sex, if the sex and reproduction stops.. ehh. Also what if the child no longer resembles you? Doesn't that kind of impact your desire to have children if it's not really "your child"?Unless and this is what people defending corruption always forget, you've been influenced, marketed to, and advocated to your whole life that your degree merely needs to exist and that you need to get good grades with it. Then it's the fault of those influencing you. People succumb to peer pressure, influence, and manipulation far too easily because we are intended to by the sources advocating it. The companies want people to get useless degrees so they therefore have to spend more and more on degrees. That's why the lenders and servicers keep offering more and more loans regardless of the #.

Further, and this is where it gets good, in technicality all passions are economically feasible in a proper government and civil country. To assume otherwise is to limit yourself and should never be advocated. Plus, many of us take our passions and make them into something great, why should we not advocate for that type of creativity?

And no one should have to accept the consequences of a corrupt government making decisions, making school unaffordable, preventing remediation or other assistance, and so on. That is the fault of corporations and the government and corporations should deal with that.

A professional gamer is more of an activity not a job benefiting society. Nearly every degree can be used to benefit society.. there is no degree for professional gaming.

You're hating downwards by forgetting to look up where the problems are coming from.I'm sorry but no. Not if the funding, rights to it, the rules governing easement or alleviation, and the fairness of it is sacrificed in favor of corporate corruption, lobbying changing the rules, or other such things.

Stop hating downwards, look up when you want to see where the problems are coming from, because the people below you aren't writing the rules.Lol, look at you continuing to troll.

Had you been a bit more aware of what was happening you might realize that the recent changes to try and privatize the costs of universities in the UK is what has been the backlash and the reason for people leaving. Things worked fine prior.

The free education and education system also factors into post-secondary schooling such as masters and PhD to some or all forms.

That being said, your links are not really statistics, scholarly archives, or any such wide-breath testimonials. Your second link actually indicates something contradicting you. The costs are actually less than it takes yearly for most public education. If we factor in loans, grants, and other such things the main cost of a top 50 public institution 4-year school in America is roughly 20,000 - 30,000 per year. That's 2 - 3 times that of the UK privatization you mentioned.

Even so, the privatization of the UK is something the citizens are quite upset about and hopefully it goes back to the more affordable tax-based system.

It's clear again you're just trolling without context. You're blocked and reported. I would suggest you actually realize how little the government cares about you, how corrupt the government is due to corporate influence, and how you hating downward or sideways helps no one.

Edit:

October 2012 in UK was the more privatized cost influence and that UP TO 9,000 a year is steep yes, but no where near as high as ours in the US per year. Further, that's UP TO, wherein America the max is usually what you pay, in the UK that isn't the case. Standards also exist.
As an FYI, expecting fair and non corporate corruption based influence is NOT the same thing as expecting things to be free. Second, saying "do it like I did" is meaningless and irrelevant as who knows your situation, for all I know you have rich parents.

There are at this moment no candidates other than Sanders that are not paid for by corporate contributors and whose voting histories indicate a desire to remove the TPP due to its corruption, and actually work on fixing things. That said there aren't enough non corporate representatives to truly get things done.

The only one acting like the literal definition of an idiot here is you with your immaturity and desire to argue things without information.Please go study psychology and sociology.Actually do you know what the definitive source for real information is? Statistics and scholarly archives and articles.

Your usage of quotation responses is terrible first off. But in any case you seem to not understand facts again. At a top 50 public institution your price will be higher and no your meal plan is generally more than it'd cost to eat yourself, more than the room would actually cost if you found a good one and your books and recreational expenses are also going to be  factor. That's all part of the total cost, not just the tuition. The 20,000 - 30,000 year statement remains, it is factual. Also living on campus is generally required for most places for the first year. In comparison to UK the government pays for the vast majority now other than this usually 6,000 but up to 9,000 and no more fee PER YEAR.

http://www.collegedata.com/cs/content/content_payarticle_tmpl.jhtml?articleId=10064

As always, everything researched actually disagrees with you.

Honestly you really do come off as completely poorly educated. Or just entirely self-righteous, impudent, and arrogant.

You have given the impression of elitism, being divorced from reality, lacking in any actual research and being completely uninformed about society.

And that's simply the fact of it.

Good bye, I will not be responding to you again, troll..Uh yes.. as everyone that's sane is.Cool! The thing at the back that moves at the end is confusing though.Disappointed in 12-year old you's father for not doing that for you or at least showing you how.It has no finger prints!More 75%Video-Cassette.*Presses Record*

Oh what's that you can't legally record your TV with a DVD? HAH!What about Reddit specifically? You didn't post much today, BUT you might read a lot. A lot of people are on Reddit at work rather than working too. So that's a big thing.

Reddit is strangely addicting and it shouldn't be.I bet if you listened to the story of the people that did have to take our large loans you might actually understand the situation better. Try it sometime.

My 50,000+ in loans expected to be 75,000 in 2 years if things go as expected comes from having to redo my university education, some medical issues that led to doing that, a private school I initially went to prior to the recession, and depression that sometimes makes me take less classes and need to go a bit longer.

The terrible mental health system here tacked on to the terrible education system financing here has led me to a situation I can't get out of. I'm not entirely sure I want this degree but I'm far too closed off to not get it now, so I'm finishing up the Accounting thing. However, the job market for 4 year accountants is far less than 5 year accountants with a CPA and so I may be forced to get more education, versus going into Marketing like I probably should have.

Edit: Life could be fair and it is beyond fair for those above, so stop hating downward. Life should at least be balanced.

Edit 2: Actually your statements don't mesh with psychology and sociology so.. I do not know why you're ignoring the analysis points.

Edit 3: We are talking about US education, there are not more than 350 people in America.Still insistent: Last one, since this one you may need to be told to deflate your ego.

You're poorly educated because you're not using your education properly. I know genius's and idiots that are more rational and more educated than you, because they actually utilize the information they get and make logical decisions with it. You instead act self-righteous, impudent, and arrogant. LIE, deceive, misrepresent, distort, and essentially obfuscate information. You're kind of like Fox News basically. The people do tend to have information as a lot of analysts work there and reporters do uncover information. But the actual implementation? Terrible and False.

You do count room and board actually and you do count rent and buying food. That's part of the cost of education. That's how everyone does it. Only YOU decide not to do it that way.

Edit: Honestly the response to you towards anything you post is basically that you're distorting what really happened, lying, not doing research, and your information is heavily misinterpreted by you as you're just trying to distort. You SERIOUSLY need to be brought a few levels because your arrogance and ignorance of reality is serious.It could have, technically. But it wasn't nearly enough. I was technically in it but few places excepted the insurance around my location and they weren't accepting clients at those that did. There needed to be more enforcement, less burden on people, and less bastardization of the bill by corporate corrupt congress.So if I get the scholarship but don't buy marijuana because I don't want to do drugs that impact my brain or are habitually addicting ... what then? Does the scholarship die?The lottery system in its entirety is a False run. It doesn't actually bring more to the state and it costs more than it makes to implement.Not necessarily. There's likely a cap on how much goes to scholarship funds.&gt; If you are paying rent (or room and board) either way, then how do you possibly count it as part of the cost of education? Do people continue to count their housing costs towards their education costs after they have graduated? Of course not... but slow adults like you probably think that rent should be free too, right?

Because up to then the vast immensity of Americans haven't ever paid for rent. The housing cost is part of college education, especially in the dorm rooms which are at times mandatory for the first year or necessary for others. It's as if you're completely divorced from reality.

I have disproved or successfully argued or exposed the issues in all your "information" posts as of yet. You have brought nothing but distortion, misplaced insults, and lies. Your arrogance is so absurd you are honestly a poor representation of humanity.

Your ridiculous gateway assumptions are also stupid. Once you graduate, have a job offer and start working it is at that time that most start paying rent, taxes, and other such factors they likely never did before, though taxes might have been done if one had good internships or worked at the same time, which is harder to do now due to class intensities. Sadly though, very few will ever actually own a house, the cost of loans due to corruption will be too high and people won't be able to afford a house, most go back to live with parents for 3 - 4 years these days now. It's a cultural shift.

You've been blocked a better way now, literally the invisible method.

Any further comment you make you're wrong on, I don't think you know the definition of a fact or how to make one, much less how to tell the truth. Good bye.Pay no heed to him, he's trying to position a couple decisions as the leading cause for the selling of empty securities and debt. What he's saying has an element of truth to it, but lacks the majority of the other information.

He distorts, misrepresents and lies because he's either a habitual liar or he honestly believes things due to listening to Fox far too much.Oh I would advocate you not to misuse words that you don't know the meaning of. I would also very much advocate you not to enter this discussion, if you even try to side with the idiot it will just hurt humanity that much more. But well that is what Reddit tends to attract I find.

Preventative block and report, of course.I didn't get it until I clicked. Thought it was a troll..No, I avoid things that are clearly immaturity and idiocy and just meant to antagonize others. A cursory view of your favorite words and how you treat others made that obvious.I believe in doing what's right. What's right to me is what benefits society in general but not at the behest of harming others grievously or selfishly.

So I'm basically the opposite of whatever congress usually does.Here's how Reddit block works. There are two. One is through RES which makes your name invisible but when you click new messages you sometimes see it pop up quickly. Sometimes there's time to reply or you actually click it accidentally or you intentionally seek it out if it's not entirely volatile.

There's actually three blocks. Anyone PM's you can lead to a permanent block if you choose, you'll never see their name no matter what even briefly.

Then there's a third block which makes it impossible for them to even see your profile or posts as they appear shadowbanned.

The third block is reserved for only the worst.

A bitch is a female dog in labor, and I have a dick but I'm not clueless nor is it, and I'm not a liar. Further I'm not whiny.

The immaturity is ridiculous.Or will at least start slacking off more, yes.Cutest thing ever.

^It's ^^a ^^^trap.*this is more common than you wish*"I love you"Don't you usually take off your own pants, or instead she just reaches in and you know.. the pants don't really come off?

Anyway, the pants get pulled right back on after she looks. Have to wait for marriage to get into that honey.I don't know, do you only want one? Ehh good enough.I believe circumcision is finally starting to stop for the majority, so "good enough" would probably be worse than normal.Hey have you seen those graphics / the dialog wheel?I'm more impressed if the vessel gets off planet.Looking at a VCR is enough of a blast to past for me. Animaniacs added to that is a bit too much.Clones don't even get to be children? Man it sucks to be a clone. I'm going to hope we find a better way.Are we only talking about Muslim countries? Dog fighting is bad too.That becomes a problem if you're paying prior to seeing non corporate reviews, such as aggregate steam reviews or some such.. ... We are going to have very poorly educated and learned clones then So much for humanity.. just skip the entire childhood.The actual story is basically to prevent a singularity of AI that will undoubtedly be created after sufficient advancement which would entirely render sentient species extinct, rather than curbing their technology level as the Reapers did.

I don't usually touch fan fiction, it is fan fiction. I had enough fan fiction with Citadel.

Leviathan also adds the do nothing option if I recall, as will as adding some dialog lines.I'll be the one to suggest researching dog car seats and buying the only one that works (SleepyPod something).. it's dangerous otherwise and I want them to live a good live.It is a classic that's for sure.He's a cute one that's for sure. I'd give him a treat. Can I?That's a pretty good impersonation? Where did you catch a Lion that can look like a Golden Retriever?Puppies are easy! They love you and they chew your books and furniture up? What's not to like?No the sadness, but wait it's gone because the puppy moved! Hah back to the cuteness!O.oThat was great.In Soviet Russia, Fish Eat Cat!Only one has been tested successfully, the SleepyPod look it up sometime.What about as addicting? Most people I know spend about 16 - 20 hours a week on Reddit due to its access on the phone and computer. It's a little terrifying.Actually that's just objectively factual and inquisitive.

But insulting others randomly and telling them what they really mean  or assuming is probably going to end up great I'm sure. Anything can be used in moderation without significant harm GENERALLY but sometimes it doesn't work that way due to a variety of reasons and everyone responds differently, what I said does remain True though and I did get my answer kind of.

As for how it will impact you, that's not actually True. Habitually addictive substances can work just after the first few times, it all depends on the person and other factors.

As an FYI though you'll never be able to give a self-analytic response on what a drug has or has not done to you. It'd be insane for someone to say "I did it and this never happened to me or whatever" when we have no idea if that's True and likely you wouldn't really be cognizant of everything it was actually doing to you. You can't ask someone addicted to smoking cigarettes what their addiction really looks like. You need to ask an observer.So how was his driving?Careful, addiction science differs on your actual belief.

Let me get you a video to help:

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ao8L-0nSYzg
It's natural for you to seek distractions, avoiding them will just make you into a worker bee. Just don't let them rule you but don't just surround yourself with people confirming wha tyou think about yourself.Well you do need someone that can literally say whether you've actuall ybeen having the drug more than you yourself would admit, whether what you think is normal is actually something that didn't start until you did it, that you have obsessive tendencies and all the other stuff you don't realize about yourselves. We are our harshest critic but we are the worst factually based critic of ourselves.

Less that they are slacking more that the drug makes them slack off which based on how it works is typically True.

Obviously someone who uses a drug versus someone who doesn't will be in a worse position.. that's the whole point of not doing drugs in the sense that whatever mental impact won't occur.Worse for public defenders provided.Movie theatre recording is nonsensical as something called "Illegal". That's ridiculous. My eye balls are illegal then.

Edit:

No one may willfully and knowingly "circumvent without authority any effective technological measure that controls access to a protected work", or make or sell any device or product that does so as its primary goal. Civil penalties (18.74) apply for non-commercial use, and criminal ones apply for breaking DRM for commercial gain. Libraries, broadcasters and other similar entities are exempt from criminal penalties. No country is required to impose liability for actions by third parties done without consent.

That's stupid. If it's non-commercial it's going to be because prices are too high, they'd never have bought it anyway, or more than likely because the means of getting it currently is obtuse or restricted due to corporate greed and laziness. We don't usually enforce civil penalties in the US and this seems like a push to make it more likely.

Edit 2:

Copyright shall be "not less than the life of the author and 70 years after the author\u2019s death," or for corporate works "not less than 70 years from the end of the calendar year of the first authorized publication", or if not published for 25 years after creation, then 70 years after creation. This will expand US and EU copyright duration to TPP countries Berne convention still applies.

Shouldn't be a law here or anywhere. That's a ridiculous amount.

Edit 3:

18.29-36 - Geographical names
No one can misrepresent the country of origin of a good though naming. Geographical names may be protected by trademark. Such recognition may be challenged by people or companies from another country, for reasons such as confusion with an existing trademark, or that the geographical name has become customary. This section refers to product names with geographical names in it, like "Boston cream donut" or "Parmasean cheese". Some details on how those disputes and registrations should be resolved.

Goodbye french fries.

18.37-47 - Patents
Patents cover any invention that "is new, involves an inventive step and is capable of industrial application." Countries may exclude inventions that protect public policy or morality, including "serious prejudice to nature or the environment", "diagnostic, therapeutic and surgical methods", "animals other than microorganisms", and "plants". Some logistics concerning patents, their revocation on determination of invalidity, filing, amendments, publication (applications must be published), processing delays (patent duration extended by delay amount), etc. Countries may use patented inventions in a way that doesn't infringe on normal patent rights.
Novel agricultural chemicals that have been tested by a company and newly approved by a country may not be sold by another company for at least 10 years.

18.48-54 - Pharmaceutical products
If a company conducts testing for a drug or medicine, and get approval for it, they have exclusive right to use those test results to market their medication in a country for at least 5 years. New classes of drugs, called Biologics, get 8 years' exclusivity. A new pharmaceutical product means "a pharmaceutical product that does not contain a chemical entity that has been previously approved". I had the most trouble with this section

That's all just bullshit for so many reasons.

18.12-17 - Cooperation
Countries should establish common systems for patent and trademark registration, as well as collaborate on other matters (diplomatic boilerplate). More boilerplate on public domain. "Traditional knowledge" should play nice with genetic patents.

We do not need everyone mimicking our shitty patent office.

18.1 - 7: Preamble
Each country may choose to enact stricter or looser laws, so long as they are consistent with the chapter. The chapter does not affect a country's right to protect public health, particularly to "promote access to medicines for all." The parties have also ratified or will ratify a bunch of other treaties, including the Berne convention (establishing Life + 50 years as the minimum copyright duration), Madrid protocol (enforcing trademarks), Budapest Treaty (patents), WPPT (digital locks), WIPO Copyright Treaty (copyright of computer programs) and a few others. Overall I believe these battles have been fought already and the TPP will entrench them further by making them tied to a whole bunch of trade reforms. But since I find it extremely unlikely that any party would withdraw from any of those treaties anyway, the point is sorta moot.

Oh goodness, all those treaties are already pretty bad.We're not talking about perceptions. We're talking about voting histories, campaign contributions, corrupt bills being passed, exploitative legislation being passed, good bills with good names being emptied and refilled with terrible legislation for unrelated things but keeping the same name, and the fact that statistically your vote doesn't matter to congress compared to a corporation. The fact lobbying is even able to impact the tax code much less congress is likewise insane.

So yeah corruption throughout and fully.It seemed only people that lived or traveled on spaceships frequently or saw astromechs did.No, I foresee it being literally like the Elysium movie. Robots are made by us to keep us in line, and those same robots are serving droids on the Orbiting space station of the rich. Except the rich orbital station will also be heavily armed unlike in the movie, because hah hah.Not so much that it's worse than using them time to time, so much as the mentality, social constructs, and reasoning that follows it. I would recommend looking into the Rat Park research.So if I needed an XRay or an MRI in Canada, I've heard I couldn't get it immediately. Is this True?You misunderstand. I gave you that research indication to lead you to research papers which would lead you to more research papers on collaborating research.

This website and most people don't realize that when a source is properly given.. you're expected to research it extremely because it's not the single instance but the supporting information. Telling the result doesn't get you to read the hundreds of pages nor does it get you to truly comprehend or recognize it as True.

So.. I'll see you in 2 weeks after you've read the fifty or so articles and scholarly papers.

Also it was pointing out a study on Vietnam soldiers as well, a wide variety of them among other info. You're distorting, downvote trolling and showing abuse. You're just trolling now.Facts don't, you weren't giving facts, you were skewing and distorting. What I've said is an empirical fact. The corruption exists, it has seeped its way into nearly everything in our congress and government decision making processes, and to ignore its affect is to be ignorant and willfully deprived of reality.

But if you just want to troll, I will label you as such.I don't need to respect animal abuse just as I don't need to respect Qatar and Saudi Arabia and Dubais culture of exploiting humans as slaves.Research has been done on the corruption, look into Princeton.I am aware that it's for Canadian Ice Wine, fluently. But the two things you replied to plus everything I mentioned is an indication of the absurdity of these copyrights and trademarks. As well as the enforcement against them.He was around machines all the time on the Vaporator Farm and further he somehow had a Skyhopper and planned to go to the Academy. It all made a lot of sense.Didn't know this until today.The guy pointed towards his ear and then the horse attacked the ear. It hink it was a set up.You want rope? I give you rope! I saves you! Arf.Vietnam. Which I already told you.

I'll be waiting 2 weeks for you to go through all the research papers and scholarly archives.I didn't say I went to wikipedia so why did you? Oh right you're an assuming troll.

You are the one claiming I'm wrong, addiction science keeps pretty current with what actually works and doesn't. You're going against the primary view. Anyway, blocked and reported. What is it with so many trolls today.

Edit: Also I know you're a troll because the video had other sources as well and it was simply to get you the information you need to start digging into several weeks of research as a person doing research is expected to do. You're just trolling.OMG, water is wet!Oh the video wasn't the source, it just was an easily digestible version of some starting information to get people interested in case they wanted to learn more. These videos are easily digestible by most.

To be more accurate, this video was not done in the United States so it makes sense they're referencing nearby hospitals.

They can get addicted to opoids yes, but the main context is that using the social types of groups of encouragement and basically "rehabilitation" kind of like a rehab spa of sorts or keeping close family and encouragement around rather than constant reminders you're addicted.. that addiction becomes negligible in its impact on your life and more easily broken.

That video as I understand it was more developed because of more and more research coming out indicating that addiction science wasn't exactly how people were imagining it and that things were changing in the way people were thought to best be "treated".Essentially the only thing I care to hear a news reporter talking about is cute things like dogs doing great stuff.

This dog like all dogs is a great dog, but this dog is the best dog to this little girl!Good job you've just depressed a girl that can't walk and a large amount of people that wanted to be happy for her.Now that I am a good dog and it is established.. we must renegotiate treat quotas.So now I'm watching puppies.Actually he kind of does hate on it for a moment.

Keeping in mind that DA:I is a pretty terrible game in terms of its high repetition, shoe-horned characters and unnatural personalities, massive areas with meaningless value and very little implementation or skill development of a significant means.. he indicates this as a positive, then says that Fallout doesn't even have that.

This leads to strange thoughts.

He also mentions the story bored him,  which is a big issue.You're generally not supposed to need to "grind" to start a campaign.I've actually always found the FO missions and story generally interesting, more so 3 than NV in my opinion. This is a big issue for me.It's mostly apparent in politics.For the campaign? I've never experienced that.I had my partner try to murder me once.Not a hard thing to make happen.There can be actually.Yes, he betrayed the company and bankrupted it, I didn't have a second fallback plan. I went back to school.I don't think so, though occasionally it did run you into a group or two, or I accidentally wandered into an area. More likely the actual witcher hunts are probably the only other thing required.There are these virtual small mmo time simulators akint o Sims where people sell entire space stations and such."Is it me? I hope it's me! Please let it be me.".... Surprised he isn't audited.I think they honestly play more in the phone game realm than anything else to be truthful.Quality over streamlining needs to be the focus but the reverse seems the truth..No, NV had better lore but I didn't like their story or factions. FO3 had a more enjoyable plotline I'd say even if the writing may have been mixed.The fortune seekers are the same people that came to America for most of its populace.This doesn't contribute to discussion. Down vote.Our country is too based in inequality and corporate corruption to be trying to ship even more jobs off or destroy even more small businesses. I'm getting a bit afraid for my future honestly.Why can't this countries government care about the people for real once in a. while.. sigh.Buying 10,000 dollars worth of shares in this economy for the poor or lower middle class, at the right time no less? That honestly isn't very common. Stocks are more the upper middle and rich. Other than 401k's which usually have certain investments allowed and disallowed, there usually isn't much stocks for the poor.

And no, the corporations literally influence the tax code, the laws, the bills being passed and the writing itself when they should instead had next to no influence whatsoever rather than lobbyist domination. It's very depressing and there's not a good outlook for us.Isn't the boxers tail vulnerability due to improper breeding anyway?I suspect we had something to do with it being such a mess in the first place.I didn't expect to see this reposted... it didn't seem to be of that nature and it's only been a month or so (though I saw it before then too I believe). But well done anyway.There was no miracle that made me believe. It simply happened because of personal experiences, at least in that time.That slogan has to be trademarked..People claiming themselves Christians at the youth group that met at the church group for summer activities or recreational stuff like soccer and such had always been pretty mean to me and I didn't have a lot of social skills. I often met people claiming themselves Christian though they didn't really tell me that very often, and I wouldn't get along with them as a result of them being hurtful or harassing me. That was my experience with Christians and church was kind of boring.

Fast forward a long while and one of the first real friends I had made, or at least I had thought I had made at that time.. was nice to me and I came along to church with him and it wasn't as boring. Fast forward again and the first actual friend I really had that was genuine also came from a different church I had met them at and they were seemed to care. I've met a lot of bad Christians and a handful of good ones. After meeting some good ones I just kind of.. joined the church, in the end I got baptized.

I kind of fell away since but that's because I haven't really been meeting any good ones anymore. My personal faith was also always pretty complex.That's not True at all. Please stop hating downward and start looking up at the policies, corruption, bill contamination, and the fact we still pay excessively for healthcare and college tuition is ridiculous.

We can not keep focusing on other nations when our own country is so unequal and corrupt. You didn't even address what I said now that I look at it.I hear great things about Canadian health care all the time so I'm just going to say it was your location that was the problem, nothing is  perfect.

Again you don't address what I said though.I was expecting some epic scene or visual.. and I did not get it. I was very disappointed. Wanted some epic hyperspace gate thing.He's upper middle class but using scholarships meant for far less earning people... That's wrong.... I saw fire and was like "hah that's funny" then he died... that's awful.

Edit; Okay it seems he didn't die, that's good. Still could have and still creeped me out.It's a rail gun it has to.. uhh vent properly which requires a chambered opening sequence. This gun will only be used in very rare situations and so should not be in a position it can not be maintained.

There it works now.Auto-cleaning because it's the future, or have the robot do it.Oh I would say that unless you're talking about Hearthstone on your phone and then on your computer and in the bathroom and all over, that Reddit is what I find more particularly addicting due to its frequency and the variety of information, which is mostly all useless and pointless.He's probably a spy undercover, distracting the cat from the spy planting bugs in the house.The puppy gives up and shouted "Psh.. fine you taste nasty and your mother's inanimate anyway.""No fuck you! I am never going to shop in your store again."That must be the point where your life suddenly took a bad turn and your wife left you.One can't avoid an addiction, that doesn't remove it. One has to confront it, have a supportive community and social sphere, or one has to turn towards medication.

Some of the information isn't useless but it's highly misrepresented or trolled or distorted.But that isn't how the brain works though. The concept of cold turkey for cigarettes has helped some because we're all different, but for the vast majority they still have a predisposition towards it and and were they to enter in the same habitual situations or tried it again, the addiction would relapse. Sometimes relapses occur without even being in those same situations.

Further, avoiding something in itself doesn't mean you removed the addiction or problem, just like avoiding a person that is hard to get along with doesn't mean you became a better person or matured yourself.I've heard the campaign is bad so there's that.*Your son looks on from the shadows with his head drooping, forever neglected*Except, that it doesn't fix the brain's connection to it, which is what truly needs to be dealt with. Psychology, therapy, medicine, and other methods can do that, but by your own choice you can not simply fix your own brain by avoiding something. It's in a sense, running away from the problem rather than dealing with it.

The research I've done is extremely thorough.Well first, if you just stopped you'd find yourself going back to it randomly, accidentally running across it, doing it out of habit, and so you'd already have failed. When stressed or needing a distraction you'd return to it.. no.

And don't try to subvert the discussion by trying to place blame on my research. That's not the case at all. The information and research remains factual, the brain simply can't remove itself from addictions by its own volition. Even if you get lucky and it works for you it won't for everyone and the likelihood is that you're still heavily predisposed towards the addiction or a relapse provided the right stimuli comes across.For 110 I can take you out for the best meal you've had in years and great cigars and great dessert and great wine. You'll have a blast.Korea has an issue of being dominated heavily by Samsung. They have too much influence.Ten is a bit much. I was thinking three and a massive fixing of the tax code. But you can't forget the poor Because they used to be the middle class.The robot.The psychologists just don't seem to.. help. I mean I talk and talk and talk to everyone already, the majority of people I know already know that I have more issues than the immensity and they're pretty severe... they also know quite a bit about them and try to encourage me occasionally. Talking to a therapist doesn't suddenly get me daily hangouts with people or an extremely consistent social experience that over time builds me out of my darkness. It just gets me to talk to a guy that I might have a cigar with if he paid. Oh look, a 400 question survey that tells you that I am.. what? Depressed? I already knew that.

Not like I can answer this question #239 seriously without getting reported so we'll just click "unsure" there.

Ahh look ink plots. Yes it's two bears high fiving each other. Shout out to Fallout New Vegas!

Oh look the suggestion that perhaps I may also need to be heavily medicated. Yay my life. AHH LOOK A BILL! Just what I always wanted.It's clear you just want to argue. It's not an excuse to go back, it's the reality that hiding or running away doesn't actually fix the brains reliance.How did you enjoy it then?It wasn't hers, was actually mine. Must have left it there sorry. It was for another party I'm throwing tomorrow. Btw if you can tell her that John has a crush on her I'd appreciate it. Alright see ya soon to be mom!"Fuck that, get your veggies away from me. I eat your friends and your meat, and I'll eat the manager too!"The window washer isn't the spy? O.o

He's been found out!10% owns 90% of the wealth with the 1% owning the majority of that and a vanishing middle class with a congress that doesn't vote based on the citizens viewpoints and a corrupt government?

OH yes, we are in a wonderful state.

The problem is that capitalism was always a lie in the US.. we've always had that corruption impeding a True free market.I'm bent on paying things because of the misfortunes placed on me and the evils I had to deal with and at the same time you're just trying to make me feel worse for being what.. unlucky? Fuck you.

Stop hating downward. If the government cared it would have fixed the education system and higher education system a long time ago.I'll give DAI a 6 because I got bored enough not to desire to ever finish it and DA 2 a 7 because while it was awful I at least didn't get bored enough of it to stop it.. just irritated. But yeah Origins a solid 8.5. I'm loathe to give 9's.You doctor yet?I'm sure the only thing that matters in voting is whether a bill is good or not.. not money or corruption...That's usually not how the majority works in politics. They tend to flow more towards who is paying them.I feel like he only read the IP section.Wasn't that because of that terrible cyber bullying suicide stalker?Heavan

is not heaven.I need a friend that desires to and could hang out with me at least a couple times each week. Quite literally I'm tired of the few hours once every other week collection of a couple friends I have when time avails itself up at University.

I'm tired of it.

I bet the wish of having my depression removed from me as if it was just silly string on my body would probably help with that but maybe not.

A chance too. Just.. in terms of my success and opportunities related just to me. I need a chance to show and thrive.

I will leave milk and cookies and delicious wine out for you Santa. Please.What if it was bad and your depression became far worse?

That would be horrible and I anticipate that unfortunately for myself around the 20th or so (because I won't be playing until exams are done).

So much for a distraction from my depression :-/Depression is like a camera lens or filter.

Imagine looking through a filter on a camera and everything is just slightly out of focus, like having bad eyes, and the colors a little dreary, and the light a bit darker, and some pixels on the screen are maybe dead.

That's depression. It's a permanent filter. You experience the same things but it's all clouded by this permanent filter.It hurts you if you get addicted to it as a desire to seek distractions.Depression is best described as having blurry vision and not having glasses to correct it. Everything effects you differently even if you're in the same situations, and you can't grasp or concentrate or understand what's going on the way someone who can see can.. and so you respond differently to everything and eventually you don't see the joys or detail they do.. colors mean very little and what you do cherish.. is usually rare.I'd spend time with some friends. Then the next day I'd do the same... and the next day.. for once.I always loved C&amp;C Renegade so long ago.I'll let you know when I can afford mental health care.The police couldn't do anything and no one had the power or ability to track them down quickly enough. The bill was supposed to alleviate this. Did it?.... It is if you never had the chance to hang out with friends more than once every few weeks... Or if you just wanted to see what it was like to have people that really desired to spend their time with you.

That.. that would be so nice.You know I've seen this behavior before.. oh right the politicians do it all the time as does the mainstream cable news. Take someone with misfortunes recognize that "oh yes that's a problem" then demean them and their situation by either classifying it as a minority and thus not worth the cost OR insulting them for being in that position because of their own actions and not investing well or not doing whatever else well, even though they were the ones making the policies that kept them down and decaying the whole country that led to them being in that position.

You may simply be an asshole or perhaps you're just against any excuse for any reason. But here's something you may never have learned.. words mean different things. The word you want to use is not excuse. No you would use the word reasoning to be accurate as well as rationalization and observation.

Now stop being an asshole that has no idea what they're talking about and go jump out of a plane. You literally are the worst. You've no idea the complex events, no idea how psychology, sociology, economics, governmental policies, or anything works, and you are the one making excuses and throwing blame around. Trying to put everything on people for the mere fact they had either bad luck or were put in situations against their will without their control. You are an asshole and evil now go away.Consistent friendship is actually.Humans are social.. make socialization and friendship a rarity and something craved and.. well it just adds to the depression.No, you don't apparently seem to know anything about those subjects based on your words and actions, as they all contradict things. You just want to bring people down to whatever level you think on which is wrong as hell.

You do not seem to understand the english language. The word you're looking for is not "excuse".

It's not about hearing it all, it's about having compassion and not being judgmental because you're just making an ass out of you and making me one by responding to you.Yes if the corporate corruption, government incompetence, and civil decency as well as rights of humanity were factored in and thus better decisions were made everything would be better.I know it was a typo. I'm sure you've never had a typo on a phone before.No, but you've finally outed yourself as a troll. So thanks for that.

Good bye troll. I'd still have a cigar and glass of wine with you, but you'd be paying and I wouldn't talk much.Reddit is completely a waste unless you have the spare time and don't need to do anything else with it. Even then it should be used for the purpose of education (doesn't mean believing things said without research) not for the purpose of distraction.
(Caveat: if this is your way of social interaction due to depression or poor social skills or lack of social interaction in general then this may be more valuable but still need to be cut back)

When they rule your life and others or other parts of your life suffer because of it. If you had a hole that needed to be filled then you should look at what caused that hole or why it is there. Playing games shouldn't be seen as a sin to be avoided, but being obsessive or addictive by them or their interactions or whatever should be.*Forced laughter*

Common is come on? Oh in heavens.

I doubt you've never had a typo on a phone. I'm sure I can find typos in your history. Don't dare me to find one.

Found several in your history in the past 8 days. So computer or phone, typos.Haevan

Well they just misspelled Haven. He's a Haven for STD's or perhaps a Haven from women.Have fun with your fundamental attribution bias and problems. (IE self-denigrating Excuses)Rated E for Everyone

(This product not yet rated)Well let's see a compare and contrast...My eyes AND brain hurt.Rated T for Teen.Uncharted 7: The Old Man's Apple Juice stash.I wasn't against the voice-acting because we saw great uses of it in Mass Effect and even DA2 and DA:I (as much as I hated those two games variably) among other titles. But the way they've done the dialog wheel and without an investigation tab? That always set as a problem for me.

I feel that a large company doesn't have to do it the old way where we see in The Old Republic's new expansion a throwback to the old Knights of the Old Republic dialog (in the Alliance secondary missions at least) where no voice acting occurs from your character and instead you choose from a series of lines that are larger and more varied and then these are individually replied to.

That's what we were USED TO, there should be absolutely no reason that (especially with TOR being a game that was lauded for its voice acting as its main difference outside of great story (for the first 4 months) in terms of variation from other MMO's) with some money spent that better voice dialog and options couldn't be made while still keeping the actual acting, we are the customer and we are worth it.


You just have to hope the actor sounds like someone you like, though gender difference is good too.

**Thank you for a review that basically eases some of my concerns and raises the ire of others. Here's hoping the experience is playable for most at launch once the day-one patch hopefully comes out.**Well Skyrim lives based on mods and repetitive or user-based exploration and such. Not on its story or high quality campaign experience and related replay value.

It doesn't so much hold up as much as remain contingent on a small but determined group relatively in relation to population size of the actual purchasing numbers.

But I'm upset and I'm a fan. I feel like I don't get seen as a customer so much as a money machine. I have desires too.Geralt wasn't flat but the actions in the game didn't really get implemented into the overworld or gameplay itself other than the epilogue. A number of quests were unneeded and good ones weren't as well developed. Skill sets could have been improved as could the gameplay itself. It just felt like it needed more.. depth a lot of the times.

BTW we DID put those people on the frontpage.

In any case, we already saw full on leaked gameplays, livestreams,a nd other such things. We knew what was coming.I like how we see the development of the pool but in one instant the pool shed is just there.Oh I laughed. Thank you.Blue Dragon you say?

That's a video game.. it's dooable.I'm glad you have what you need, I do not so I ask you to do me this favor, it seems small but it is truly of value to me.

You can do me a favor if you like.

I don't really have real or good friends, they either tried to kill me or other things happened such as betrayal, etc. Not important.. and those I do have still rarely see me as I don't have that type of consistent friendship type of thing. I know nice people, good people.. somewhat but I've never been able to get the daily hangouts or near-daily hangouts and friendship consistency I needed, not once in my whole life and earlier I was too "different" to even have friends, that's more recent this decade. I know I could truly heal if I could have gotten it but I did not.. so life rolls on.

My request if you want to share your good fortune for others is to do this simple thing: Think of me (my username is fine) every day. Please don't miss a day. You don't have to send me a message or anything, just promise you'll think of me once a day. I don't know how much longer I'm going to last could be years could be shorter. But, things keep going worse by the week with my depression starting to come against me from the darkest places I've hid it at this century.

Point being, the idea that someone else actually gives even the smallest iota of me on a daily basis.. would be heart warming and my heart is usually quite cold and hard.

Either way, thanks for reading.Sit and bitch about Obama?Well let's consider how much it costs to live and work there first..I always wanted a house and it comes with a dog! You're rolling now.AC 2?This is the most important post :)I expect to see you at my party tomorrow best friend.Santa Claus stopped bringing your parents gifts because they lie to people about him. Never lie about Santa Claus, or you'll never get his presents. It only takes one time...Every single time.Oh that's precious.When they're bad..

And not only are you grounded but you're sleeping on PILLOW #4 AGAIN!Right next to convincing people on his twitter that vaccines cause autism. Yes he's that guy.I thought you drank it because you enjoyed the taste?People who are sorry they weren't there for you when you needed them and people who didn't even think about it.Honestly these makeovers are the best part of this sub. I just wish they happened more often."Fine hooman.. now where's my treat?"This one always makes me smile :)Interesting. There was a police academy at the community college I did a few years at and it shared the campus space. Everyone was polite and decent and mostly kept to themselves except around their camaraderie group. No racism or anything.

I think it depends where you go.That was debunked a long time ago, you do us a disservice by posting it without doing some fact checking. We don't need to give officers any more ways to call us liars and be justified doing so.Arguably it never came up more than once and even then that's suspect. Best to stick to some verifiable facts.You guys all see some impressive explanation.. I just see various lights and pictures telling me what it supposedly is. It's not that I don't believe you, it's just that I could never truly know.Fine, you can take me out for cigars, wine, and dessert but I expect high quality.Real wealthy people give TED talks, X is for college campuses.OR the reverse.Well we can become even poorer once the robot overloads rule us, less sympathy that way.But honestly seeing various light patterns and saying it's a mirv missile.. I mean I don't see how that's the best explanation. Maybe if I see a zoomed in shot.For now.. soon to change.We can't blame him though.Yet..Well perhaps it'll crash until I get there on the 19th.Real question is which don't give in to summons.Well only when we get user reviews will we really know, but we already saw leaks. We know exactly what we suspected was going to be a problem.They likely learned of it then I'd suspect so it wasn't a paradigm shift. They probably had symptoms.The rule is 3 seconds and has always been 3 seconds but is also False.Perhaps if I had the knowledge and perhaps I do, but the problem here is that he's the one positioning this information as so factual and after reviewing it.. the image still was nondescript.I mean a bear can do that...Suicide... depression and such things was more common unfortunately. The bullying and harassment from so many for so many years left deep scars.Can he yawn?Or that the guy is working as slave labor. Need images so we can SEE the actual visuals and such, hence why I recommend people watch the game played prior to deciding to buy or not.It seems impossible to get anyone to actually admit or talk openly about the big issues though... Which is annoying.I don't disbelieve the navy, simply the one post I replied to. You weren't shown a picture of a missile. Just of light. I could claimed it was anything and put convinced imagery explaining why. That was the point. This post never actually  displayed any confirmation of their assertions so I didn't really know what to believe.Okay... I can't say I relate. Skyrim was really just repetitive to Mr.I never felt the VGA was ever really taken seriously by anyone honestly. Spike having it was stupid."I'm sending in the rain... yes I'm singing in the rain.The first vault seems really tiny and short. I liked having more things to do in it with FO3. I was anticipating some prewar living but... no.

The item that's locked in the crate seems cool, suspect it is plot related though. Not sure I like what it insinuates I need to do though.

Outside of that honestly it doesn't seem set for getting you really intrigued or wrapped up in the world right off the bat. With the third you had a bit of history.

Things seem very bare too which is unfortunate. The dialog options with your robot are also very minimal, I had anticipated an investigation tab but now... Well I know better now. I didn't feel like I got to really interact with him.I wasn't disappointed by three story or world. I did wish it was more fluid though with loading and atmosphere.Almost every. But not just yet.I'll call it now then. The game, like with FO4 will barely deliver what it promised.Not according to the eight hours I watched the analysis on its exterior by others and the individual reviews from people that have had it far longer than I.

We saw great reviews from who we expected to see them from. The common gamers have known not to trust the scandal laden and untrustworthy main reviewers for at least a decade now. Even certain YouTube personalities can't be objective or weigh things. But even they still mention the issues in minor ways they just don't actually want to really talk about them.

I'm wondering if I should have waited for an ultimate edition prior to buying it.Kiko wasn't able for socialize with other Orcas and ultimately died. He craved human contact instead even going so far to find it at a beach. Then he died of pneumonia.

The risk is too great to do the same to others. Like with dogs, they've grown to need us. We can not harm them merely through ignorance nor eradicate them as Peta would likely advocate.

Honestly provided the conditions and temperament are good with the other orcas and tillikum, I don't see any issue allowing the shows to continue, they desire that social interaction now it seems.

But the enclosures need to be much larger.Even when taught how to survive like Kieko was, he wasn't able to join a pod of orca successfully and died. But he did seek out humans to play with.Not entirely. I won't argue about numbers as wwere both likely wrong but in terms of what they're doing, this is more in response to black fish, except the validity of that film seems very.. called into question once you look into things.

I want Shamu to have a great life but those Orca crave human interaction now. No one is helped by depriving them.He died after failed reintegration.What whale psychology credentials do you have to say how they appeared? They aren't humans.

I encourage everyone to do more research. Marine experts have reported the creatures are in great shape.I believe they usually live in the hundreds but I may be misremembering.I do hope that the new Deus Ex is an improvement not just a quick rehash.The issues you say will be fixed such as textures and such aren't bugs.. they are low cost choices.

As for the game, I merely try to see what individuals say, truthfully and accurately or at least objectively.

As for the size, the game is from what we've heard about 70% the map size of Skyrim. There was a more accurate comparison posted on here a few days ago if I recall or the other subs.

Not an old Fallout but just.. no real quality approach overall. The gunplay improving makes sense if they're trying to push towards shooter mechanics and style like ME was. I can't say the graphics look up to par and as for optimization, if you spend the money you can get it to be good for both.

It seems to have a lot of content though definitely not at the beginning. But that doesn't say anything about the quality of content.I'll pay you a hundred if you can actually as a psychology master for whales repeat exactly what the whale psychologists said about those events without looking them up.

Your interpretation of events is very different from reality.... How is death better? He wanted to interact with humans, he let them sit on his back for crying out loud. He very much needed social interaction and depriving him of that is wrong. Sure the facilities should have been larger so they could play, but they shouldn't be closed.Skyrim was a repetitive mess with poor story and no real point to anything. It mainly survived by a dedicated base of modders on the PC BUT THAT was a very small group compared to the population size of purchasers.

One could argue it encouraged the open world obsession we sadly have in games today.That's certainly economical.If you're fifteen and don't want to argue then why are you trying to troll? No one else here is fifteen and you brought it up, likely means you are.

The psychologists indicated the following, since you didn't inform yourself.

Tillikum killed a trainer and it was ruled an accident. The cold water was too much and she accidentally fell in. The whales had never seen that before and were excited about this new event and began playing. They couldn't analyze the real situation. When she stopped responding they acted the same way they would for wounded family and kept her at the surface on their back. It was bad luck.

The second was someone that dived into frigid waters which orcas usually reside in, while everyone had left. The orcas kept him at the top and he was found later, with the orcas visibly concerned.

The tillikum incident is different. There's a lot of talk about what happened but it honestly seems to have been a mood swing based on orca family reasons. I'd suggest further research to understand these better. At best he killed one due to emotional changes like humans often have. At worst he killed one intentionally... You do realize that anyone can downvote right? Any many people are on this website. News is considered one of the most non accurate subs out there trolled to hell and back. Essentially having a few downvotes means nothing just like having a few upvotes means nothing. Getting large amounts in the hundreds or thousands generally means you had a popular note but that's pretty much it, the reverse means a lot of people didn't like what you said which is rarer.

I already explained the third.

But if anyone is trolling it's the person that is abusing downvotes and was corrected by me and then decided to insult and shift blame and distort points rather than admit you didn't even try to inform yourself.First, stick to SeaWorld since that's the subject here.

Second, PETA has skewed nearly everything they've ever done or said or released or point at others about. I take anything about them with fifty grains of salt.

You have two articles about SeaWorld of those four, one leads to a useless factor BUT it does give this source: http://www.hsi.org/assets/pdfs/orca_white_paper.pdf. Granted it's only one source and verification of data needs to be made but there's that.

The other article lists buzzfeed as its originator which opens up a huge problem of validation. Still, it seems to have merit except that the actual information showing this as being admitted isn't really linked and I'm not able to find the real court documents. Further it's pretty clear they're misrepresenting the drug factor. When he was TRANSPORTED like when they flew Kieko, they had to use drugs because yes he was just in a container being shipped. But this says nothing otherwise in regards to normal interactions.

Now the one source I mentioned was good but validation requires numerous sources not just one article. 

SO it's something to do more research into. But the psychologists and experts themselves have indicated how social situations have definitely been desired and helpful to the Orcas and the trainers do truly care about them.
I indicated all three, The first, the second, and the third called the tilikum incident. I'm no marine scientist, that's why we're going off what they said.You're talking about the tilikum incident. The actual videos of the event and the marine experts had very different impressions. Hence why I've been advocating becoming informed.

You're taking things and making assumptions that the marine experts disagree with. Either post sources and facts or we can keep going based on what the marine experts said.

You're making far too ridiculous a jump from one thing to another and it would be taken the same way in anything, you're projecting your thoughts as a reality.

You've lied about all three events essentially and it's getting tiring.  From now on you should only on what the marine experts said.Sigh. Trolling again?

Experts such as those that work at universities or are on the board that monitor the orca development as well as the experts sent in independently after the event. Stop obfuscating and dsitorting reality.

Marine Land is not SeaWorld, we are discussing SeaWorld, an American company.

I already explained every event, as the experts and eye witnesses explained it. You can't distort those so stop.

Your only option is to talk about the third death or the incident of Tilikum and honestly it may have been premeditated potentially but the facts just don't lead to that. There's also a lot of factors relating to Tilikum that make him different than all the rest. Honestly he's a very complex case.

There also were no witnesses to the second incident, he was on his back at the surface which they only do for family members that are wounded. Due to human socialization it makes perfect sense that Tilikum would engage with humans in the same way as familial forms.

It also gives much detail when the actual family of Dawn who died from the actions of Tilikum fough ttooth and nail for the Orca to not be put down. Clearly you may not know nearly as much as you think.First edition is epic! Played it once or twice but sadly don't have it or a lot of friends anymore so don't play it.I actually heard you just needed to take off the heatsink for the processor. It just makes the processor feel overburdened.It's believed had he integrated well that he wouldn't have been doing his own thing dangerously Because in truth we haven't actually established that.Oh my I'm keeping that.The information is basic. Cursory self informing can lead to reports on what the experts actually said as well as the trainers regarding those events. Yeah I don't have the space for everything in top quality. So Yify will have to do. But I do prefer physical discs for games.Same this time. A lot of people that didn't play 3 aren't offended by the dive in quality or content quality and depth. Even the textures, graphics, or dialog.Mods won't fix the dialog or the graphics to be honest though they might improve textures so long as they are just updated not replaced. It won't improve the quality of content at release either.

What mods do isn't a reflection on the game rather its after market value. I judge Bethesda on what it releases.You use aggregates. But it's the best we have short of tortenting it to judge a game.But honestly I would give this a seven. I think that's very fair. The game doesn't reflect a progression of systems in anything other than adding a voice and making better gameplay. It reflects being held back and not progressing the technical or display systems and refusing to spend much money on the voice actor protagonist.I rate most things a seven honestly because I find that is good core but not great. Witcher and Deus Ex deserve eights sometimes .5 added. But the nine range the reviewers want? You have to have really great DLC and such to usually merit that.Alrighty then, so in case anyone just wants a guys opinion about what the games score really should be , all things considered.. I give it a sex and a half.

I believe the user reviews will average around there over time with them being six or so right now. I think with dlc of quality it can reach seven.

For a game it is fun sure, but it doesn't feel much of a progression and it holds itself back heavily. Dialog and character development is where it is held back the most. That hurts it, and less marketing but more development could have remedied that.

I'm insulted the game reviewers like to lie so much about what scores really are like.

(Six does seem insulting but I view it as above average)Yes

When the dlc releases it'll probably have more content befitting a sixty dollar game but for ninety.

Mods can't fix all this though. They can improve a few things but not the rpg part. I wasn't the customer target for this game. Sadly.

As a game though it is good. What that means is that it is fun, it just is a bad fallout successor to 3 and NV.Really is she that great or is it just sex inflation?I often wonder what's happening with steam reviews. I have taken to just watching non commentary playthroughs on YouTube usually and then judging. Or torrenting and then buying when it meets a price I agree with.

I used to watch AJoe, but he's not as trustworthy now so yeah... I think in time the user scores will average though.You could do self informing... That's been what I've tried to encourage the whole time. Looking up the actual information..  because while I was in this discussion I was doing just that and ironically had been earlier this week.I focused more on intellect and perception but my charisma was inflated.. it's not as high as I personally think sadly.I fully completed it in 40 but it was.. very boring.I'd say so yes and a useless setting.Black Friday, or try a steam machine if you want that route.That's awesome. But I don't think that should change the score to a nine.Except you're forgetting one thing. Since I can remember in all our debates we were expected to be informed and do research prior to engaging in the debate. It's the minimum requirement. It's the differing research others might not have seen which is the thing we must prove or provide.

The problem is online .. The minimum is 0 research and an opinion.Wildlife preserve basically.Didn't that work for 3? You had a nine box quick slot?It's more a I was responding to one thing and studying tax at the same time in class.

I finished this discussion last night and for my effort of trying to discuss things rationally I was down vote trolled. I went off to play fallout 4 instead. Now I'm studying.

But I'll try and find that for you later.Did they reveal the issues of TPP last time? I thought MGS had major circle jerk.Only way to simplify the tax code is to get corporations out of the GAAP committee influence sadly

I didn't think this was the audience since they all were arguing.

It would be best that the orcas were in a preserve but I'll get some sources later.Ask Warren Buffett maybe? How we treat our worst is the greatest reflection on us.I've put off playing it honestly. I don't want to play something that repetitive that then doesn't even end properly. MGS was only played by me because it was one.of the PS3 exclusives. It wasn't 10 out of ten.The whales are in this position because of us. We may have had good from it but it's our fault. If there's not enough money, then we find more.

The ORCA is a complex example but the preserve is the best option. I don't think social interaction can be removed though so.. I'm not sure if the Orca are happy performing or not.. it's beyond the scope of research available.Stop that. I finish any game unless it bores me beyond a limit. Fallout was so much better in terms of engagement and gameplay. Though this new one not so much.... This is a discussion forum. it's meant for discussion.I feel that voice could have had more dialog if they spent more instead of less. I was craving more dialog the whole time... just more things to ask or talk about.Honest question. Why do you even pay attention to the mainstream reviewers? They haven't been relevant or honest for ten years at least.. what does it matter what other titles got when they too got inaccurate reviews.Mass Effect Andromeda I anticipate to do the same, sadly.Good luck on the job.Don't forget your season pass. Might also save up for paid mods.Yeah the big insult with it always seems to be lack of choices because it costs more. But it doesn't cost that much more honestly to have some more lines. But they also don't like paying Va's much as It is so it all feeds back into the issue.

The large lack of dialog through an investigation style menu like the dialog wheel has been known for though was majorly depressing. Even your first dialog with the robot. You.. you barely get to talk at all and you've been away for so long.. It didn't feel real.Honestly this is the truth. Not sure why down vote trolls are in this thread.

Bethesda made a title for people that were not expecting progression from FO3 and likely hadn't played any of them. We are expected to go along with it.

To be accurate, there are improvements and changes but where it really counted, there was disappointment I'd say.I wouldn't agree on the graphics, the settlement system which is largely not living up to its potential, or the dialog because they didn't use an investigation option and seriously needed to give your character more dialog options and develop that better. Story was also good but pacing and immersion was bad.Skyrim maintained itself through a dedicated base that really modified it and enjoyed the freedom of mod choices. But the steam achievements stats show the same for most games stats in terms of low percentages of people actually finishing the game.

In truth they aren't playing vanilla skyrim anymore honestly.

Open world games are usually very poorly implemented. It's believed you either have open world or you have a great storyline and plot with a more linear base. You rarely see exceptions and even they have issues.

It's a small group compared to the purchase population.This makes it harder to understand the mixed reviews though.The plotline and combat was very generic and the gameplay just seemed repetitive. I fully completed it by the time the dlc was out in seventy hours.As long as it remains canon. I'm not sure what more they can do really.Well Witcher 3 would like a word with you as something to look at in terms of high quality open world.

The problem with your assertion is that in quality sense Infinite actually is the worst. The quality going down is a trend that is the problem, even if technical sides go up.I think the best indication is if Best Buy stops having desktops or cuts the size of their showrooms for desktops heavily. That should show you when trends have moved away.I look at it this way.

When I have a 7 I expect the next to be either 7 or better.

If 5 years later the new 7 comes out but it doesn't reflect the features, plot, environment, style, and technology that would make it a 7 in that day and age, then it isn't a 7 anymore.

The publisher is immaterial to this.I mentioned he died of pneumonia already in the thread, but he sought out a beach for social human contact himself and he was not travelling consistently with a pod of other Orcas, he was not able to reintegrate himself. Instead of whale contact he desired humans hence why he sought out a beach of people near Georgia and even allowed some of them to sit on top of him I mean.. it was clear that was a factor.

Kieko was not an aggressive wild hunter though so he was more of an even temperament.

A conservation attempt would be good, I agree. But they actually seem to enjoy performing so I'm not sure that removal of social interaction and daily trainer interaction would be good for them.If it tried that with my accounting books it'd tear out all the pages.. those things rip and tear just by touching them sometimes.Except I wasn't entertained.I'm seeing, though not as commonly, disgust at the transition from FO3 to a lower quality version albeit with improved mechanics in FO4. I imagine the same thing happened then, that FO3 had dissenters but they were insulted, downvoted, trolled, and basically made to feel as if they should just accept things and stop complaining. Exactly like this sub and other places has been showing.You're not the only one, though NV did do many things better.I don't know if it's a majority, we've never seen numbers.I want a higher complex RPG, but the reason I don't like the upcoming Torment or Pillars or Divinity is because it's done in the older mechanic, older graphic style with none of the benefits of the modern worlds development such as VA and such. I'm not really for that.It is possible to have both the former and the latter. It just requires money.And that's FINE so long as the RPG elements aren't bare bone like in FO 4 and ME 3.

I don't need a reading heavy game, I need a voice acting heavy game.In the time of FO3 the great games of F1 and F2 wouldn't have been played even as they found out it existed. They saw the name 3, that made them look.. 1 and 2 are older isometrics of a VERY antiquated style in terms of graphics and such. Not a lot of people including myself can go back to that.

Dragon Age Origins was really the best example of that older style brought forward and it did well. I can do things like that but not like the Divinity or Pillars of Eternity stuff coming out now. It's too old without the new.We do still buy them, everyone I know does as well. We just wish they were better.You misunderstand. It is possible to put both aspects into one game.

You don't have to have ONLY old style games with old style graphics and old style mechanics. You can bring that forward and modernize it without streamlining or degrading its quality.

If people hate riding a lot then you can add high-quality voice acting but unlike with FO4 or ME3, with FAR MORE interactions and voice acting options. You can upgrade the graphics and the style and the gameplay and everything.. and still have the great story and writing and content of the older games.

The problem is developers are doing the minimum rather than the maximum.Sounds like shit.I'm too ignorant to headphones to know if sound was good or bad sadly. It is marked with sennheiser all over but I saw no instructions.Tell them to elevate you to their manager and to investigate the recent sale.Or like, the customer support is bad, the comparison isn't worth the value, the benchmark isn't good. Something like that I imagine.Let's just admit I don't know much about fans other than the good brand to buy... I've no idea what that means.Tomorrow a free puppy will be included, better to wait.Until they've come out, had model updates and revisions and people actively have the necessary hardware you won't see large excitement outside the niche and probably not even there to any real degree. They are expensive top.I'm seething with rage.This needs to  be up at the top but sadly...The one on the right is having a lot of fun eating that.Yeah, but it's better to find a deal where the Within is usually 7 dollars or so rather than to buy both separately for far more because Steam doesn't ever do a good discount for it.Then the question becomes why some are reporting awful sound from some.The monitor has a color calibration issue, you'll likely want to download the proper color code calibration. It was third party for me when I bought this monitor years back.

I'm also not certain why pre-overclock temps matter if you're overclocking, you'll want to put those out and at what speed and such.

Also, your set up cuts off so much potential media space and I suspect you'll use far more if you're gaming and such, I'd consider investing in a larger drive option as well as modifying your liquid cool set up so that it doesn't block off TWO drive cages.I bought a Fractal to help with this but I still know nothing about good cable management.According to the benchmarks it doesn't really have any discernible differences as of yet, though people are in a tidy about that. More likely it'll have a lot of benefit for non gaming and general uses.I edited my post so you may want to review it again, but I can't see why you'd particularly need to overclock you've got more than enough and I can't see what would really get any actual discernible gains from overclocking it beyond what it is already, the games and such don't really require that much and poor optimization as a trend won't allow you to really get as much from it.I'm a bit worried by the 500W, I don't know if that's future proofing enough.

I feel like for 1,000 we used to be able to get more...I might recommend at least 12 Gigs. I feel 8 these days just can't cut it.I use my main computer to store Anime, TV, and movies and such (though I don't have the space for bluray rip sizes just yet) but I've never heard of CouchPotato and such. I have fooled Plex to work on my Xbox One, 360, Sony devices and other such things so I can stream most stuff with subtitles but it's the free version. The full is so expensive for features I'd never use.. mmm Maybe when I own a house.

Is this like a spare computer meant for NAS stuff?So I've only ever used crap headphones from logitech that hurt my ears so I never use them. So I was wearing them last night and I couldn't really tell what the dif from my Bose Companion 2 speaker set with bass was compared to this.. it seems impossible for me to even determine which is better..There was a 60% failure rate on the 3 TB and some other models that used the old model... literally every place is still selling that old model. :-/Typically as we try to shift fully to SSD we don't do much with large media, though WD Black if it's a main drive, Red if it isn't (lesser colors work too just avoid green). And HGST or whatever it's called is the big one that has high quality. But Seagates work just check the model #.If he goes with the Hyper 212 I feel this is really only for if you ever plan on overclocking, stock has been fine otherwise for my entire life with computers.

That being said, the Hyper 212 is a tid bit annoying to install what with the constant moving of the brick.If I'm not too late, perhaps you can consider Hardware Swap sub. They may be able to get you something a bit better for your money and swap of your card..I have that stupid case.. from 2006. Oh god the wire management.That relying entirely on one friend with a 1,600 dollar budget and getting what I got was stupid and that Mitchell won't even talk to me in 2 years so why in heavens would I use his advice? Of course this was 06. Did youtube even exist in 06? I don't know.

P.S. That stupid 1800 laptop was also a piece of shit and is by far your worst ever purchase other than student loans. Gateway doesn't even make laptops anymore and one year after launch everyone used 4 gigs or higher not 2 gigs of ram. Stupid NX860 XL.Are you knocking on Corsair water cooling?IO Ports are my bane.I just type hyphen press spacebar and then type...Oh god RentACenter.IF possible, I'd really suggest going quad core, yews this likely will change your MB. Honestly though you're already spending quite a lot on the MB.. and less on the CPU? I always learned the CPU and Graphics should cost the most.

There is also absolutely no need for DDR4 in your build.See unless I get a step by step or tutorial for cable management in video form that's not going to help me.You have a Z97 but a processor that can't be overclocked and without a fan cooler. This is a financial waste. Surely you must have an operating disc of 7 or 8 hanging around? If so just install that if possible, otherwise if you don't then use this.

I'd say you have no need to go with 1866, 1600 is fine and it'd be best if you could dual channel or get greater than 8 but 36 for that is already pretty cheap.. though I saw Vengeance 2.0 1866 DDR 2x8 gig going for 70 earlier so who knows.

Might be time to consider a solid state if we can get one by removing waste.

Your monitor is expensive, determine if 144 is what you actually want or not.So it's a damn auto torrenting machine lol.;.. hahahahahahah Oh that's hilarious. 

I'm hoping VPN, because PeerBlock is a placebo.That thing is 23 pounds, has sustained 11 years (just replaced it today) and has the worst wire management ever. Finally the top fan died. Driving that back and forth to home and back is a pain in the ass as is everything in that case.

It went through 3 separate full builds each costing 800 allowing for it to be pretty high-end withotu approaching niche level. And somehow I made it silent.No.. I'm a visual learner. I learn best by watching those videos.I drove to AZ from the MidWest just so it wouldn't get damaged in a plane. Stupid decision, thing was a giant metal cube that could take anything, even water. Though it fried every 3 and a half years for who knows what reason.I have no idea what any of that is. I know how to use Deluge/uTorrent occasionally and the poorer I get the more I do. I should consider a VPN but the only need would be for trying to do it at University and I don't pay for a top 40 university for the risk of being kicked out.What does break in mean other than contouring to my ears better?If you're using a TI I think it might be time to consider moving from 60 FPS expectations, especially with that budget, and instead going towards a higher framerate and getting equipment to match.

I'm not sure your power supply is future proofing for that either.

There's no need for that level of speed on ram, the benefits are negligible, though the cost doesn't seem ridiculous so ehh.. cheaper than the 1866 I bought from Corsair 2 years ago. Stupid memory leaks all over it I have to replace.

With everyone buying Hyper 212's I should see if someone can ~~e~~ mail me the extra fan bracket that comes with it since I lost mine. But anyway it looks pretty solid. I'm just not seeing this as a 60 FPS machine. This isn't built for that low. Which gives me the indication either you're spending too much for your target or you're not looking at what your gear really is meant for.

Of course your monitor takes a position too.Ye sbut it requires hardware of a high end attached to it.Determine what games you want to play and determine if you ever plan to overclock, if not then you don't need a Z and a K.

Consider a different SSD. Consider a cheaper version of that card, there were some deals. Your case may be unnecessarily expensive but aesthetics matter to some.

also what's your monitor? This helps us determine exactly what you can even meet with your hardware.I probably know a bit more than that actually. Usenet is from my era but I wasn't into computers during its popularity. I try to avoid the piracy and so on. But I can see if I were building a media dedicated computer rather than doing it all manually on one that I might consider these. It is interesting though. I never considered auto downloaders.If you're spending 2,500 dollars on a computer then we need to adjust your goal posts. You want a max framerate and a 1440p resolution as standard. However some games suffer from poor optimization and may require you to use 60 FPS or slightly higher. This might require another monitor. (Your monitor has a button for swapping HZ but I'm not sure if you want to go through res changes, YMMV.)

I swear I have seen TI's for 450+ even recently I'm sure... If that's True then you should really consider more price hunting and I wouldn't close on this deal until you see more sales go through.

You might want to consider the 5800 series instead of the 6700. 

There is literally no reason to go with DDR4 memory at this point but somehow you found ridiculously cheap DDR4 memory so who knows.. have at it if you like.

If we're moving the goal posts then we may need to consider a bit more future proofing a bit less.. ridiculous cost.No the issue is that the vast immensity don't and won't be buying that hardware. So this is either set to only a high-level niche device or if you want it to be something parents all pick up, you need to be able to make it retroactive or scaled back for lower computers.You have a Z board but a non K processor. It's a waste. Either overclock or do not. Avoid the K and Z or use them. 

Your motherboard forever limits or restricts what CPU you can use. Decide now what socket you're sticking with and then decide whether you're going to overclock or not as aforementioned.

More details on your drives and stuff please. DDR4 ram isn't a necessity at the moment but if possible getting higher than 8 gigs would be preferred.

There's been some good deals with GTX 970 recently going into the upper 200 range. I'd recommend reviewing prices and keeping eyes on sales.Your drive: ST3000DM001

Is an old 60% failure rate Seagate model. Run away.DDR3 isn't anywhere near close to being outdated and gamers aren't going to see any differences much like 3000 vs 1866 won't show much of a dif with current DDR 3. But 16 gig could be nice for you.

There are 250 Samsung 850 Evos and Pros for 70 and 140 and there are 500's for 200. There's a 960 gb one for 200 as well but well YMMV with it.

Why is it everyone can afford a 980 TI but me..  What is with the craze for the 4790 too? I mean I have a 4770k but I've never overclocked it..

Also do you even have a custom fan cooler?RAID would want NAS drives so either their Surveillance, WD Reds or HGXT Star NAS drives.

I mean I've used Barracuda 7200 RPM ST3000DM001 too but.. I'm swapping to WD because they keep selling those 60% failure rates. It might be better to have gone 4 TB instead of 3 TB. There were many sales for them all.What is with the obsession with the 4790? When did the 4770k Not become enough?

That drive shouldn't cost 100 if it's the 840 series and the 850 series Evo of that sold for 70 1, 2, 3, and 4 days ago. And possibly again soon.

I think we can do some searching for your card for less. I don't see much else than that to be changed.That memory isn't necessary at that speed, if you care about shaving off some dollars that's your first bet. 

I feel we can find a better price for the GFX card but I'm not sure. I'm also not so certain about that processor.You have an overclock Z board but a dual core processor that can't do anything. This is not financially prudent unless you plan on buying a new processor soon.For 10 dollars more we could have got you the Samsung 850 Evo 500 Gb SSD.. 

Why does your memory cost.. oh right I paid the Corsair TAx.. apparently that means you pay 80 dollars extra.

To determine a motherboard you determine what architecture socket you plan to use then you build from there, it's usually the starting decision, it determines your memory type, your price point and such. Your highest priced items should be your card and your CPU, the MB has a Z in it if it is an overclock and if it's an overclock then you have a K after the processor. If you have one but not the other it isn't financially prudent.

I think we can do better for the processor but we need to pick out a motherboard first. You won't need a thousand features so stick to a 100 dollar range motherboard, then reverse from there if you need to cut corners.

The PSU should be 500 W minimum. If you plan on future proofing then look more. You'll want something with a Bronze minimum guarantee from a reputable brand. You'll want to then look at that specific model number when you've finally chosen and see if the internet shows it works well or had manufacturing faults.Well Id id some more searching but I'm sure I wasn't mistaken I know I saw a cheaper TI.. I just don't know why its price suddenly vanished from the lists. Keep your eyes out, by Christmas there are usually some good sales too.

Because you basically just went choosing the most expensive possible premium ultra things you could rather than building off of what you really will do with it. Also that processor is overpriced beyond compare, I mean if you have the money to throw around then sure do what you want, but you should set goal posts for what you really want to do not for what you think PCMR wants you to do.Honestly I don't think the Corsair quiets are worth it. I think Noctua or higher is best.Is it really a necessity for us to keep making his motherboard more expensive? This seems way too feature intensive for this build.I'm out of my element then. I haven't dealt with DC since the Athlon days.I'm just not sure that ram is going to be enough not for modded Skyrim that's for sure. Of course if it's just regular vanilla skyrim (what is the popularity with Skyrim anyway,... I'll never understand) then it might be fine.

This is the lowest budget I've ever had to see.. I'm not sure how I can  future proof this.I've had the Corsair 650 die on me before, Corsair warranty covered me.. I had to pay for stupid ridiculous shipping though.I'm still familiar with the i4770k.. I believe that's Haswell or was it Broadwell? I forget their names. I've still seem next to no differences with the max i7 types so mileage may vary. But I see everyone going 4790 or the 5800 series.There's an industrial black PWM. But why do you care about the looks? The color is a mark of pride for some of the best fans. Close that window up anyway, you don't want the noise.ST3000DM001 The harddrive is a 60% seagate failure rate. Get a 2 or a 4 or 4 1's or anything else.Pictures and specs plz.Your card was?

You could probably keep the power supply and drive. Memory has to get an upgrade, DDR 4 may not differ much from 3 but 2 does.

Let me know your entire build, including hardware, software, and accessories and peripherals.The refresh didn't change much from what I had read prior to its release. I mean sure the new series beyond that have some changes but Intel hasn't been pushing any strides recently that I've noticed.Power Supplies
AX Series\u2122 PSUs have a 7 year warranty
HX Series\u2122 PSU Models HX520W, HX620W, and HX1000W have a 5 year warranty; all other HX Series\u2122 Models have a 7 year warranty
RMi Series\u2122 PSUS have a 7 year warranty
RMx Series\u2122 PSUS have a 7 year warranty
TX Series\u2122 PSUs have a 5 year warranty
RM Series\u2122 PSUS have a 5 year warranty
CS Series\u2122 PSUs have a 3 year warranty
GS Series\u2122 PSUs have a 3 year warranty
CX Series\u2122 PSUs have a 3 year warranty
VX Series (Models VX450, and VX550) have a 5 year warranty
VS Series\u2122 PSUs have a 3 year warrantyI don't expect HDD's to fail until I've had my motherboard replaced generally which is every 3 years and a half. The rate usually lasts beyond there. SSD's last far longer.

The flood had a lot of problems for Seagate.Seems a bit pricy. I think shopping around could be a better option, and seeing what exactly you'll require or if you want to overclock.I'd consider a comparison to the fans honestly. Noctua has a good name and will go for pretty much similar prices. It's ugly looking unless you go industrial, and you should go PWM if your mb supports it (which some ridiculous priced MB like that will. The Quiet series is.. arguably not so quiet for some. I'm not a decibal level type of comparison guy but I read a lot of reviews. But noise level may not be your issue.

Also if we're going with an 89 case I suggest the Fractal R5.Then the Industrial PWM is your choice.I know that processors now have dedicated graphics unit integrated into them. I know the 4770 series has that and it's a trend now. Beyond that I don't see much development in speeds. Games with their poor optimizations don't really use the processo rmuch anyway, it's all the graphics and memory.Look at what other people built, look at some top builds or listed builds for your price range. Compare and contrast.How to Make a Warranty Claim

Before submitting a warranty claim, we suggest you contact our technical support group or visit corsair.com and review the support section for technical assistance. A simple fix for your problem may be found there.

Valid warranty claims should be processed through your point of purchase during the first thirty (30) days after purchase. This period may vary depending on where you purchased your product; please verify the return policy with the retailer where you purchased your product. Any warranty claims that cannot be processed through your original point of purchase should be addressed directly to Corsair. Our customer service contact information can be found on the web at corsair.com/company/contact/ or in the documentation included with your product.

Returning Your Product
In the event that you need to return your Corsair products for repair or replacement, Corsair will provide you with a Return Merchandise Authorization Number (RMA#) as well as return instructions. Do not return your product without prior approval from Corsair. Any product returned without a valid, unique RMA# will be refused and returned to the sender at the sender\u2019s expense. To avoid problems at the time of receipt, clearly write your RMA# on the outside of the package and include a copy of your RMA confirmation e-mail within the package.

Request a Return Material Authorization Number (RMA#)
Please follow these steps to obtain an RMA number:

For end user customers, submit an RMA# request online at: corsair.force.com
A valid proof of purchase is required for RMA processing (i.e. receipt, invoice, copy of credit card statement).
To request an Express or Advanced RMA, a valid credit card must be provided to secure the new replacement unit for shipping prior to Corsair receiving the defective unit.
For business to business (B2B) / Direct customers of Corsair: complete the RMA request form and return it to RMAService@corsairmemory.com
RMA credit value is based on the current published price list or lowest invoice value within 90 days of the day of the claim, whichever is lowerOr use it or another as a backup. Either way.

Run a SMART scan on it every few months.You might get more use with DDR 4 high speeds if you're using specific programs, debatable.

This be quiet brand seems to be popping up but their advertising is so childish it's just seeming like a joke to me.

Consider fans or liquid cooling then.I've still never overclocked beyond the now installed "Turbo boosts" that automatically adjust themselves in the background in my life.. Technically the GTX 970 has a default overclock by MSI but eh.. someday maybe.Haven't you heard the new iPad Pro has replaced the PC? What are you doing getting a craptop? Just get an Apple Tablet! Or a Chromebook! Who needs games? Rot your brain.

Anyway, yeah I can see that. A craptop.. mm haven't that term for a long time.

Yeah 300 is low um.. I mean I'm not anywhere near as good at building as many of these guys. I'm lucky to afford what I can honestly. I'm sure given another day or two of reading you can get some attention for further assistance. Perhaps check other cheap build stages out. Read the whole thing and good luck. Sounds like you need to go to Corsair.force.com and I think that's how I did it.

I suggest express RMA.. shipping for a PSU is about 16 dollars.Ahh my Fractal case, let's see how can I help... Uh huh.. 

If you're overclocking you'll want a custom fan unit. People choose the ridiculously cheap 20 dollar Hyper 212 EVO.

If you're not overclocking then you don't need a Z or a K in your core or mb.

Tell me your old parts, put them up in the same part list if you can.

I need to know your monitor as well.

Your PSU is future proofed a bit much if it took you this long to do an upgrade. You can go down a bit. Though it's already cheap.I think we can shop around a bit on the GPU price and style. maybe we can manage that up to a nice 16 gigs? Maybe. 
That drive is pretty solid.Motherboards have style, features, more features, overclocking feature support beyond the norm, custom BIOS (I personally love the idea of mouse-based GUI bios), and fifty other things these days. The Republic of Gamer stuff is just ridiculous with what it adds.I wouldn't recommend a 960, the 970's were in the high 200's earlier. Also you could go Radeon 390. Swap the Sandisc with a Samsung EVO 850 250 if you're just getting them for a primary. You can usually get 16 gigs for 2x8 for slightly cheaper. 

I don't know much of your monitor but it limits future proof, cheap enough not to be a burden though for future choices.

I'm not an AMD guy any more so I can't say much on your MB choice and CPU.Consider a Radeon 390 comparison, look at the Cyber Monday deals and consider Christmas late-end deals. Also even if you buy a card you still have a return policy but I've never used Superbliz.

The MB seems to be non gamer edition. So I think it'll fit the needs. We'll get someone that knows more on Asus MB's than me in here,.Hah it's my processor. Poor 3.5 Ghz.. no one uses you anyway. But I think it might time for you to be OC'd to 4.0 if I can help it.

Cyrorig versus Hyper 212 Evo Mmm...

If you're going for an SSD and a 1500 budget I think you can nab the 850 EVO for 70+ going on now.

Determine what model of the 980 TI you actually want.

That power supply isn't future proofed you'll need more than 520, recommend 600 - 700.

I'd suggest 16 gigs. You can usually get that for 80 from Gskill or whatever.

Oh um but you shouldn't be paying 400 dollars for a last gen i7. Check out the 4790 and the i5 k series.
Shop for power supplies find something 80+ bronze rated at minimum. I don't care that it says Corsair. See if you can upgrade your ram for slightly more to 16 gigs. You don't need a custom cpu cooler if you're not overclocking.

Consider a 250 SSD with a normal drive option of 1 TB or 2 at 7200 rpm.. Not everything needs an SSD.Seems solid to me, research your CPU's usage and features compared to the i7. See if something you want is missing. Determine if you want a quiet fan setting or not. If you're overclocking get a custom CPU cooler, try the Hyper 212 EVo or Liquid cooling Corsair H100 i or H60.

Dual monitors is useless for gaming the bezel kills it, either three, ultra wide screen (not utilized well) a high-end monitor focusing on 1440p or higher rates (which means different purchase requirements to fulfill those) or just a multi task monitor for the purpose of browsing while gaming.Huh.. I thought they changed that. Ahh well. Right then.If you're going to downvote abuse people trying to communicate with you, they aren't going to help you much. I know what hyperthreading does very well thank you, I'm old enough. I just figured that they had installed it on everything by now.There's more than just the last few hours.. sales come and go and then come again.I can't help if you can't show me an accurate part list to be honest.

What MSI Mobo and if it's a gaming then it may be unnecessarily expensive.

I find my mb and cpu die or need a fix or something needs a fix every 3 and a half years.I'm not familiar with your motherboard nor do I have the time for a comprehensive data mine. Look at comparison reviews or some type of review on a reputable site for it and then decide.I don't generally go on Reddit to read things I go to comment. I know I thought I knew everything when I made my first build. I could have use unsolicited advice.

/u/thoughtofitrightnow your board is overpriced I'd say. I think you can make headway reducing it, look at reviews or comparisons at review sites to see what might be recommended. Gaming MB series are often heavily underutilized.

Also the graphic cards dip in price often not just the 300 range, sometimes the 200 range at times, keep your eyes open if you want to return and swap ever.If I was scolding you we'd be drinking scotch and having cigars.

I edited my post.Is it within warranty? You never know.Suggest upgrade in memory to sixteen, don't worry about speeds too much. I mean.. yes temporarily you won't need more internal storage but you will in time. Not all games need an SSD.

I don't know too much about ASRock.. but you're not using a gaming motherboard so that's gonna be easier. Check out reviews online on a review site (not a sale site) for the motherboard and comparisons.

Determine your case noise, if you want quiet ness or whatever.The i7 series has multithreading, if you use it for.. professional reasons then that's going to be the value for you.

Shop around for your graphics card more, see if anything opens up. More christmas sales also occur... You don't mix weed with premium fine cigars and malt scotch silly.

Anyway, I'm a late night poster. The others are probably sleeping. See what turns up tomorrow.This is a part where we say you did a terrible job and that you don't get dinner. :-)1,400 for no worries, but you may need peripherals.If you're buying extra fans do some research, you don't want to be misled.

We're using a triple channel board for memory? 

Shop around for the GFX, consider Radeon for slightly less.

Ultrawides are poorly utilized by games, YMMV.

My current recommendations are based on your own. Your budget doesn't fit your total so I won't bridge past it until you want it.

I'm sure someone else knows more about your Xtreme than I do.AUD is scary...Actually I never really made friends with gamers. Different maturity and different social skills hack then. It was the immersive worlds and story that distracted and still distract me.So far I've only raised the price when I meant to do the opposite. What about the board attracted you?We aren't at a stage where proper optimization, drivers and patches, and implementation of high end 4k, VR, triple monitor or ultra wide screen exists yet on either side of the fence.

1400 would mean no worries about gaming anything out. If you want to experience everything at top and have no issues then double it.Depends, did you buy me some Cuban cigars and scotch like I told you? Or do I need to get out the whipping stick?Sex. It has seen sex. This thread made me feel utterly doomed.I thought better of Japan.Wait what wait.. that's not the lyrics..I did some searching, I was a bit outdated, stick with the 4790 but consider going I5 if you are just gaming.No, sixty percent failure rate though admittedly everything was failing more a couple years ago. Still a heavy focus. A lot of research and drive testing was down across sites in the thousands of # often all at once.Mm some down vote abuse occurred.. wonder who decided that type of troll was a good idea...

I was actually comparing inexperience. Being a person that hasn't used headsets for ten years. I am unable to determine which is preferable or has better sound squality and can't compare differences to my old speaker set very specifically either.Cheaper no real difference if that's all you are doing. Hyperthreading is more for very different usages.Well they weren't debunked, reviews across sites show similar failures. And there were far more sites than just those.I'm not sure the 970 can do that efficiently sadly but it is his  best bet.

Though his memory isn't going to be near enough by any stretch.I just find it isn't, especially when doing any real degree of multitasking.So you want a 550-650 depending on what card you go with. Consider Nvidia GTX 900 series or possibly a good price 700 series of quality. Or trend to Radeon 380 or 390. I suspect that's a 400 dollar price increase.These sales were bad, Christmas and prior sales are often better.If the Samsung EVO 850 250 is still 75 I'd go with that for an ssd.Sometimes I've found that we tighten the header screws and short the motherboard on the case. Did that once.Being more accurate if you're using chrome and have thirty or so Windows open and basic programs and then basic gaming programs and then a game...It hurts.I had heard that people had been finding mostly better sales prior.Fallout has awful optimization. Use mods or wait for patches.Every hour for me if I'm gaming.They cost 300 and are common purchases. Well new ones exist now I was mostly considering the latter USA Amazon.Admittedly it is more likely that the reason audiophile like them is because most people don't really hear sound properly as they use poor machines and output devices. So when we come upon quality it is often so different that we assume it is bad rather than what we had being bad Crashing your stuff as a business is still shitty.Often times consumers might not buy it if it's too low. You need an equilibrium price.Varies but I'd say it was better than the initial Logitech speakers.Games do go on sale as does XBL in the same logic every PC game is sixty.You'll go high on GFX and CPU, cut costs on HDD but maybe not cut the SSD, cut cost on case and cooling, and mb doesn't need to be epic. Memory is average price. PSU get a 80+ bronze rating.

Teach your kid that he's a kid that is ignorant. But that's okay.Your price needs to generate shareholder value then.Ask yourself basically why he really wants a console. Do all his friends play violent games he shouldn't be playing as he curses rapidly into the microphone? If so he wants to play with friends. If he doesn't really play with friends then a computer is good. But I've no idea what your peripherals are. Obviously if you don't have any monitors of quality or any such things then the price increases same with a TV.

I'd give yourself a 600-800 budget but only if the kid will appreciate it. If so help teach him how to build it and why the parts are chosen.Honestly Amazon will make exceptions up the wazoo for you. They have the right to refuse though.The problem is that for many it was just ten percent or fifteen percent decreases or worse raising the price before cutting it to slightly lowered costs . Many found better deals for a lot of stuff prior to the sale days.Well it's been how long since the 4770? No real changes.. prior to that.. no real changes. 

Consider a stronger graphics card.Right and the mark ups prior to sales were also common. Honestly ymmv.It never works like that for real. Usually the officers get the shareholders voice because they don't often show up physically to vote, so they leave it to the officers which often make a committee to make real voting decisions. Then there's the board..

They buy stock which increases capital.Problem is with my luck every single time I have to end up replacing the mono and cpu due to some damage or death somewhere. Every time..A company can always sell more shares provided they didn't issue all of their shares they announced.

Ways to add more or split or shrink them also exist.First, tell me what you have. All your peripherals and any paarts or drives somewhere around.Not entirely True.

First you get free games included in the XBL price which can be found for thirty or do easily.

Second, dlc receives huge cuts for consoles unlike it does on pc generally.

Game discounts are usually rarer for large amounts off. Generally it takes 9 months to see fifteen off or more and a year or two to get a fifty percent deal.

Digital sales and physical copies are huge sales for consoles especially with buy two get one deals or other such factors. Then there's the used market and the rental market.You have a k and a z motherboard but no custom cooler? If you're not planning on overclocking then that wasn't financially prudent. If you are, then you'll need a better cooler.If you're not overclocking then you don't need a custom cooler. Suggest if still available getting the Samsung 850 for a few dollars more for your ssd. I think you can do better with the pricing for the gfx.I need to know the parts. All the parts. The monitor. Everything you will potentially draw from.I'd say to make this a full post. I'd also consider showing us the build entirely so we may see if it needs something else for the future. Finally I'd recommend you see if you can buy from US.Two things..

Anyway I can get the hyper 212 evo brackets for the fan mount from anyone? I can't find the other.

Also, never overclocked in my life. always heard it decreases life and I have enough bad luck with part life. What's the real facts.Mmm if the stock is loud. Then sure.

Use the excess savings to buy a 1 tb or more 7200 rpm hdd.Processor, fans, custom fan cooler, hard drive, another hard drive, ssd, motherboard, power supply, disc drive, additional high rpm pwm fans, memory and gfx all only 300 watts?Wrong. Xbox One you keep it, PS Plus you dint keep it but they reappear if you resubscribe.

BioWare dlc always is cheaper on consoles always as an example.

Never seen fifty percent off a new game unless it suddenly sucked on the pc. But I have seen huge retail store game sales.

Also buy two get one free retail sales too.

Go to toys r us some time during black Friday.

I'm sorry but half your info is inaccurate and the other half reads as pcmr bullshit elitism.That sucks. I want to see a full part list please. Including monitor.Fractal R5 to replace my 11 year old Antec nine hundred. A sennheiser headset I don't even know how to appreciate which I may return. A 5 tb drive to replace the 3 tb barracuda from Seagate. A noctua 1500 rpm pwm quiet fan at 140.First you're not providing any links, second half of what you said has been wrong or severely distorted. Don't lie and say you've backed up things. You haven't. Feel free to though.

MadMax wouldn't be considered new and further it wasn't that good. BL OPS 3 wasn't that good but it's a holiday season sale of a minor percentage. That's to be expected.

I'll see what console discounts look like for it.I don't know enough about these to compare to noctua pwm.If this was True I imagine people wouldn't constantly recommend higher supply when larger graphics cards are used. There must be something missing.

I like my pwm noctuas.Unless you get pwm and use the mb.

Silly downvote trolls..See I have bad luck. A pin gets damaged or the power supply fries something. Every three and a half years I end up buying a new mb and cpu.Is the ssd necessary at that size?Show me the full part list. Monitor included. I don't like lacking info.960 and 970See if its plugged into SATA 3I'm more concerned with resolution.Seems fine. Cortana search doesn't work half the restarts. Does the other half.Corsair and Seasonic. One time used a five year lasting power supply but the cpu somehow burned itself who knows how.

But it did force me to pretty much be non niche top of the line every three years.

I believe the pin was bent at purchase but I didn't recognize, caused problems eventually.Do you know how long it took to get Dragonborn on sale? Do you know how long it took to get the tiny smidgeon cut you got for Mass Effect dlc a year or so back YEARS after ME2 had been out and even later for ME 3?

Do you know that Amazon sales like the recent 15% off also factored console games too?

Did you know that 2 months isn't considered NEW and also wasn't a very good game by most standards and reviews?

And yeah.. Xbox and PS both had significant sale deals and do other times of the year too. I'm not sure why you want to think that a multi-billion company wouldn't have good sales at times... that's good business sense.

You can be wrong and it's okay.. just stop arguing. You're to the point where you're just trolling and refuse to admit you were wrong. You were wrong about a lot already and now you just keep going..The majority company brand that the world gets when they buy a computer and think they might want slightly better than the dell default speakers?

Also Logitech is pretty well known as a good brand.I mean I think that's common for gamers or people that use their computer as their main entertainment device. I can't think of any time I haven't had numerous programs and chrome windows (god chrome eats memory) and tabs open and then of course the taskbar programs and a game. More so if you use two  monitors to multitask.There was a niche at high school that had gaming computers they did lan parties, but mostly just played counterstrike.. :-/

I was the only one really playing rpg's and rts's and such.I mean you skipped the 1000 dollar build... No I said that DLC is heavily discounted on consoles FAR MORE than it has been on PC.

You're trying to distort and redirect so as not to admit you were wrong.

You were entirely wrong with the games not being yours when you stopped subscribing to Xbox Live. You were entirely wrong about sales not existing for digital and physical. Entirely wrong on the level of sales. Entirely wrong on used games. Entirely wrong on everything.

You were also entirely wrong on deep discounts for new games, and while there's an exception here for christmas sale the new quality games aren't getting big discounts.

Yes, 15% on a PC GAME isn't a good discount either but that's what you're more likely to find for new games. You're distorting again.

Consoles games DO HAVE good sales. And online passes are also on PC you hypocrite.

I didn't look for 10 minutes.. I've been doing other things. You thought I'd dedicate time to a troll?I doubt that. It likely has SATA 2 ports as well.&gt; e fact remains is new games get better discount on PC (especially with key seller). END OF STORY!

No you were wrong about everything and your trolling is now going to be ignored.

So you're saying you made claims without doing any amount of research at all? WTF were you making claims for then? DO RESEARCH. Entirely wrong on everything.

Key sellers are often shady, careful there.

Your entire line relies on the idea that companies don't know how to have sales.. that makes no sense.

Why in heavens would I play CSGO. I'm talking about games like FPS's, TPS's, Adventures, RPG's, and such. Not your addictive ridiculousness.

Truth is you've proven you don't do any research and you've failed to address all you're wrong about. The fact you already admitted you didn't do research before making a claim is enough to throw everything into the spotlight.UghMMm it's an excessive extreme Gaming mobo. I might of known. I didn't assume it one of those, my fault.I've NEVER been able to get Rapid to work in Windows 10 with Samsung.I'm going to assume the drive is damaged.Literally Magician says that it can't confirm the operating system is 7 or 8.1 because I'm using Windows 10.

Fully updated.I prefer a story to my games.Incidentally, troll, this is my first time ever buying WD in my life. I've bought literally everything else under the sun.You should get the 250 and get a 1 TB 7200 RPM drive as your supplement. Use it as backup or main stuff. Stick the games that actually need loading screen galore on the SSD and the OS.Graphics processing unit.Your console friends will miss you, don't forget them!When you put the IO shield in the case on the motherboard, you may have accidentally shorted something if you put it on wrong and the pins are sticking into the ports. This is a long shot.

You may have also bent USB pins causing short protection. Bend them back.- Additional storage media a 7200 RPM drive.
- Quiet PWM fans if board supports.
So RPG's, and story games then.

Because repetitive multiplayer is boring

Thanks for downvote abusing and trolling though.I mean I bought the 970 for 170 dollars during the 3.5 gig scandal. So... eh this doesn't seem like a big discount.They were at 640's available a couple days ago.Which really breaks my immersion.Why are we happy about using exploits?He's the only dog I know of that can randomly fetch guns and tools for you by merely asking.Well that would insinuate a game with a quality story.

Actually if you'd like some real facts, Mr. Troll, you might find the popularity for games like Destiny, League of Legends, and DotA 2 and similar comes from hiring specific accomplished psychologists to design addictive mechanics that work the same way nicotine does in the brain.

So that would mean it isn't your choice and that your brain is being chemically hijacked. There are certainly some who may enjoy that repetitive factor but for the immensity that somehow find themselves absorbed with it.. welcome to psychology.

I'm so glad I'm not worth anything to you, it makes it a lot easier to ignore you.I don'tunderstand the use of the fan controller when it's limited to 3 fans, the case only comes with 2, and PWM is superior.Couldn't you just overclock it yourself?Wild Hunt was like 70 for a full completion... I'll never understand how people found a need to put 230 extra hours into it. Just like with Skyrim.

Edit: Let's create a website where people share their views and experiences.. and then troll and abuse downvotes when someone disagrees with our bias viewpoint! I like the PWM that just uses a curve chart like the graphics card does. If only the graphics card could be controlled via the bios fan controls too.Oh.. mmm... I've never heard of a splitter cable being needed. Basically 2 per 4 pin header?

I actually find, when considering Noctua that PWM doesn't really add any cost.The flame war wasn't with you. It was with Mr. Trolls A lot.Full completion.I had a shitty motherboard but this z87 G45 Gaming from MSI gave me my first mouse based bios where I just click in a GUI. Could be a little simpler but man is it nice.My only issue with fans despite all being PWM is figuring how to create the right static pressures and case flow.. I think the noctua at the back can't exhaust all the inflow from the two fractal at the front..Right, I was hoping for my MSI board to take care of it all since it's all plugged into the motherboard with PWM stuff.Well this one runs at 1500 if need be but as the PWM manages itself it doesn't account for static pressure plus 2 fans versus 1.. plus the heat sink 212 evo default running at its own thing ehh..

I'm not sure, perhaps I should get the Industrial version at 2000 - 3000 but I don't want noise.Even having figured it out by watching the E3 launch.. there's so many options and you need to like level 145 to really have a great set up of perks since you either upgrade stats or perks...Does it come in a portal?It's a lie.I would hope not but hopefully with PWM at like 1600 it isn't too bad.Sorry, Chewie was killed by a moon a while back, he can't help you.No you wouldn't of ruined the mb, at most the pins from the shield are touching inside the plugs, or one of the USB pins is touching the side or some such. It happened to me and the entire stupid plug pulled out. Stupid cheap Antec. Then why does PWM exist? What's the difference here?

This is how I set them.

http://www.hardwareheaven.com/reviewimages/msi-z87-g45-gigabyte-z87-d3hp/msi-bios6.jpgWell I want to avoid any need for that. Case should be a whisper.So how do I set this up?My current Antec Nine Hundred, dust magnet that it is, with 2 11 year old (yes) 120mm LED never-heard-of fans running near constantly at low, a noctua 1300 running constantly at 1100 at the back exhaust, the top 240 mm fan being pretty silent on its own, and the hyper 212 evo default fan being on PWM.. I can tell you that it was whisper silent. That's an 11 year old case. If an old crap case like that can do it then surely something else can. I just hope this R5 can do well with cooling too.Sounds like you have a ground fault issue.

Check your main Input/Output area the and the case specific Input/Output area.

You're looking for bent pins, look and see if any usb port doesn't look like another usb port.The elitist master race meme (originally an insult towards elitists not compliment) aside, they wouldn't be very happy with your choices, expecting you to have SLI, Ultrawide monitors, overclock to hell and back, and so much more.

But let's carry on...

This doesn't seem bad for a PC-Noob race build :PWell I have 3 storage drives and a disc drive so I need the top and bottom drive cages, but I may move the middle out so the intake has more room. Might put a bottom fan.. since I have a spare 120 mm.There are stores, like Fry's or Micro Center, yes.

You'll have better luck here if your build request ever gets noticed. Not everyone trolls the new comments section like I do.

Consoles aren't peasantry and the entire at-home gaming culture owes their existence to the Magnovox Odyssey and similar increases of consoles. Don't go all PCMR now. Don't lose your console friends either, consoles are cheap so stick with your friends. The W10 streaming is nice too.

First step is to determine what your budget is and then plan out what type of processor you'd like. Do you want to overclock? Do you not want to? The side bar should help you get prepared, then submit a build request with us with your own thoughts and we'll look into it.

Also consider all hardware you already have AND peripherals. I want to know the monitor and all that jazz. Use the PCPartBuilder copy and paste thing once you've outlined your stuff.You do not need some ridiculous overpriced gaming chair when just starting out. Though yes you should get something with at least ergonomic proven support soy our back doesn't die.Please learn to copy and paste.. I do not want to have to open more windows.

Go to the site, click the little reddit friendly animal guy up top and it should give you copy and paste details.It's possible you've shorted it out, see that you haven't tightened your headers and screws keeping it from grounding itself too much. I saw that happen once.

That or you could literally have a part of the MB touching a grounded area.Then buy me some nice wine, chop chop. Nothing else to do clearly.

http://on.inniskillin.com/product/Inniskillin-Vidal-Icewine-375ml#productReviewsAnchorAre you going to be overclocking?

My heart jumped at the the "GOTTA BUY ULTRA PREMIUM" trend going here. How about some liquid cooling or some quiet fans.Essentially when you put your motherboard in your case you install these headers into the case and then place your motherboard over them and then screw those in to the headers. This keeps it above the grounded area that is the case and it also prevents a short.

Either your power supply does not work or you have a ground fault with your MB.Perhaps an SSD?

make sure your PSU has a 80+ bronze rating minimum.

You don't need an overclock most likely if this is most gaming. Not sure if you need an i7 either.Show me ALL the hardware AND the monitor and the peripherals.Well I spent 20 on it for the old Antec case I will feel awful if I don't use it and I don't have the extra fan bracket for the Hyper 212 EVO to be redundant with a push / pull and stick it to that.. so.. Nope, thank's for trolling.Did you buy it from RentACenter or something? Why are you still paying?Switch to a 250 gig SSD and get a supplemental 1 TB or 2 TB 7200 RPM HDD.At least it wasn't RentACenter.

Learn not to finance your computer.[PCPartPicker part list](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/X8pM99) / [Price breakdown by merchant](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/X8pM99/by_merchant/)

Type|Item|Price
:----|:----|:----
**CPU** | [Intel Core i5-4460 3.2GHz Quad-Core Processor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/intel-cpu-bx80646i54460) | $174.99 @ SuperBiiz 
**Motherboard** | [Gigabyte GA-B85-HD3 ATX LGA1150 Motherboard](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/gigabyte-motherboard-gab85hd3) | $70.99 @ B&amp;H 
**Memory** | [G.Skill Ripjaws X Series 8GB (2 x 4GB) DDR3-1600 Memory](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/gskill-memory-f312800cl9d8gbxl) | $44.78 @ OutletPC 
**Storage** | [Seagate Barracuda 1TB 3.5" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seagate-internal-hard-drive-st1000dm003) | $45.99 @ SuperBiiz 
**Video Card** | [PowerColor Radeon R9 380 4GB PCS+ Video Card](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/powercolor-video-card-axr93804gbd5ppdhe) | $207.99 @ SuperBiiz 
**Case** | [Deepcool TESSERACT SW ATX Mid Tower Case](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/deepcool-case-tesseractsw) | $35.99 @ Newegg 
**Power Supply** | [SeaSonic S12II 520W 80+ Bronze Certified ATX Power Supply](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seasonic-power-supply-s12ii520bronze) | $55.99 @ SuperBiiz 
**Keyboard** | [Cooler Master CM Storm Devastator Gaming Bundle Wired Gaming Keyboard w/Optical Mouse](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/cooler-master-keyboard-sgb3010kkmf1us) | $21.98 @ Newegg 
 | *Prices include shipping, taxes, rebates, and discounts* |
 | Total (before mail-in rebates) | $668.70
 | Mail-in rebates | -$10.00
 | **Total** | **$658.70**
 | Generated by [PCPartPicker](http://pcpartpicker.com) 2015-12-01 17:25 EST-0500 |

That makes it easier to see your stuff.You can buy me a new Hyper 212 Evo there you go. Nearly as expensive as getting new parts from stupid Coolmaster.An i5 would lose hyperthreading. I'm just not sure what you mean by using it for multimedia.. is this becoming a heavy streaming machine or.. what?You spent 4,000 on a computer that died 5 years later? You could get God's Computer for 15 years for that.

So yeah since you're rolling in money, mind financing me some ice wine?We've had issues with the Mushkin stuff, I'd swap it for dif ram.http://images-cdn.9gag.com/photo/a9LmZqW_700b_v1.jpg

Sometimes happiness has a surprise..... Portland, Oregon is not a country :P

[PCPartPicker part list](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/DfLXD3) / [Price breakdown by merchant](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/DfLXD3/by_merchant/)

Type|Item|Price
:----|:----|:----
**CPU** | [Intel Core i5-4460 3.2GHz Quad-Core Processor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/intel-cpu-bx80646i54460) | $174.99 @ SuperBiiz 
**Motherboard** | [Gigabyte GA-Z97X-SLI ATX LGA1150 Motherboard](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/gigabyte-motherboard-gaz97xsli) | $92.98 @ Newegg 
**Memory** | [Panram Ninja Series 16GB (2 x 8GB) DDR3-1600 Memory](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/panram-memory-pud3l1600c118g2njr) | $69.99 @ Newegg 
**Storage** | [Samsung 850 EVO-Series 250GB 2.5" Solid State Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/samsung-internal-hard-drive-mz75e250bam) | $77.99 @ Amazon 
**Storage** | [Seagate Barracuda 2TB 3.5" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seagate-internal-hard-drive-st2000dm001) | $68.88 @ OutletPC 
**Video Card** | [EVGA GeForce GTX 980 4GB Superclocked ACX 2.0 Video Card](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/evga-video-card-04gp42983kr) | $489.99 @ Amazon 
**Case** | [Phanteks Enthoo Pro ATX Full Tower Case](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/phanteks-case-phes614pbk) | $99.99 @ Amazon 
**Power Supply** | [SeaSonic G-750 750W 80+ Gold Certified Semi-Modular ATX Power Supply](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seasonic-power-supply-ssr750rm) | $102.99 @ SuperBiiz 
**Monitor** | [Asus PB278Q 60Hz 27.0" Monitor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/asus-monitor-pb278q) | $399.99 @ Amazon 
 | *Prices include shipping, taxes, rebates, and discounts* |
 | Total (before mail-in rebates) | $1587.79
 | Mail-in rebates | -$10.00
 | **Total** | **$1577.79**
 | Generated by [PCPartPicker](http://pcpartpicker.com) 2015-12-01 17:35 EST-0500 |

Please learn toc opy and paste.

You're spending too much on the 980 for low return, go to a Fury or such or consider a Ti.It was more 60 seconds according to the clock, but a lot of people just post a link when it asks to copy and paste it so I was just doing it for you. Sorry if you think I came off as aggressive. Or oppressive. I'll return to oppress you with more dtails later.

You have an overclocking motherboard but have no custom fan cooler or overclocking processor. This may be a financial flaw and you can probably get a better featured motherboard if you remove the overclock, unless you do want overclock later then swap the processor or use it for future proofing.You need to find a way to pay that off dude, or it's going to eat you and maybe your credit. Can you lump sum the remains or ask for a consolidation or some other such thing? Maybe roll it over into another purchase from Dell lol?Are you asking how to return a card to newegg?The amount of ice wine and fine cigars and friends to share them with that you could buy for 1,000 is quite a bit. Well I wish you luck on that. I'll check this over later.It won't be the CPU that bottles you, it'll nearly always be the GFX card. An i5 should be fine, a high end one for $290 maybe? You can hold off on the custom cooler unless you feel the stock is too loud. We can change your motherboard to something with more features and less Z in it. Everyone likes a nice mouse-based bios. Let's get rid of that 980 and get you a Fury X or a TI with the minor savings we've got. Let's also make sure it all fits in that case.

What's that PSU rating... Right Dell crap fried it. Alright you're looking at 650 80+ bronze rating I'd say? I think but I've heard that Radeon's run stronger. Maybe I'm too high.I'd still prefer some fine cigars and ice wine, you would too if you tasted them.You can ALWAYS spend money. No company will ever tell you that you're not allowed to spend money.

Submit a return, make sure you order your new card, check on Hardware swap maybe if A REALLY good deal exists or use cold hard cash.I honestly can't see a need to overclock but I'm not sure how your emulation will pull it through the ringer.

I try to get you to take the advice and search with input so that you can learn more about this than me just building you one. 

Take the advice I've given so far and look into card options that might be better, maybe read a few review comparisons of 390x Fury vs 980 vs TIWell I mean it's literally telling you ONE OF THE USB PORT PINS IS BENT. Either it's your front case ones or your motherboard ones.

IF NO pins are bent then it's damaged USB somehow. In that case it could be a faulty motherboard.Well first, as much as I may like A-SUUUUEESS and as much as I understand that a Laptop / Tablet makes more sense for a student than a desktop.. If he asked for a graphics card like that then he wants to game. Now he might play all the games I hate or no games at all, but still.

Back to the point please list all peripherals and hardware that you're attaching that you already own. Including monitor and drives. I want to know what I don't need to include.

What would you like to use the computer for?Oh come on we can do it here, where's your christmas cheer?Games don't utilize SLI very well, it'd be better to focus on one single card and bump the power suppl ydown a bit.I'm also looking into it and it's not just deciding on the brand, because then there's so many models and variants and then DXRacer being sneaky and changing certainf eatures.. it's all ridiculously hard to get unless they just send you one for free because you're popular on Youtube.This seems like your CPU Fan isn't working.[PCPartPicker part list](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/XnkKvK) / [Price breakdown by merchant](http://pcpartpicker.com/p/XnkKvK/by_merchant/)

Type|Item|Price
:----|:----|:----
**CPU** | [Intel Core i7-4790K 4.0GHz Quad-Core Processor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/intel-cpu-bx80646i74790k) | $249.99 @ Micro Center 
**Motherboard** | [Asus Z97-A ATX LGA1150 Motherboard](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/asus-motherboard-z97a) | $139.99 @ SuperBiiz 
**Memory** | [G.Skill Ripjaws X Series 8GB (2 x 4GB) DDR3-1600 Memory](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/gskill-memory-f312800cl9d8gbxl) | $44.78 @ OutletPC 
**Storage** | [Seagate Barracuda 1TB 3.5" 7200RPM Internal Hard Drive](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/seagate-internal-hard-drive-st1000dm003) | $45.99 @ SuperBiiz 
**Video Card** | [MSI GeForce GTX 970 4GB Twin Frozr V Video Card](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/msi-video-card-gtx970gaming4g) | $344.99 @ Adorama 
**Case** | [Corsair 200R ATX Mid Tower Case](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/corsair-case-200r) | $47.99 @ Micro Center 
**Power Supply** | [EVGA 500W 80+ Certified ATX Power Supply](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/evga-power-supply-100w10500kr) | $37.06 @ Mac Mall 
**Optical Drive** | [Asus DRW-24B1ST/BLK/B/AS DVD/CD Writer](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/asus-optical-drive-drw24b1stblkbas) | $18.88 @ OutletPC 
**Monitor** | [BenQ GL2460HM 60Hz 24.0" Monitor](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/benq-monitor-gl2460hm) | $173.13 @ B&amp;H 
**Keyboard** | [Cooler Master CM Storm Devastator Gaming Bundle Wired Gaming Keyboard w/Optical Mouse](http://pcpartpicker.com/part/cooler-master-keyboard-sgb3010kkmf1us) | $21.98 @ Newegg 
 | *Prices include shipping, taxes, rebates, and discounts* |
 | Total (before mail-in rebates) | $1144.78
 | Mail-in rebates | -$20.00
 | **Total** | **$1124.78**
 | Generated by [PCPartPicker](http://pcpartpicker.com) 2015-12-01 18:24 EST-0500 |

*Click reddit icon, copy and paste*

Cut out overclocking save money, at least 60 or so. Drop the graphics for something less overpriced premium. Paying the Nvidia tax there.. Your manual should show you the proper layout for those.Is the power supply able to turn on?The power supply has a switch at the back, make sure it's turned on and then see if any power signs are coming from the supply and if the motherboard responds.Corrected your link:

https://pcpartpicker.com/part/msi-video-card-gtx970gaming4gDo you have a means to measure electrical output from devices? Or a spare power supply?Ergh... we need to go out and introduce you to real quality. Calling that a cigar is like calling beef jerky dinner.

And everyone likes wine, you just need to the right type. Oh missed opportunities.You must have typed g (you have an extra g).I sometimes have been known to like turtles.Now you accidentally duplicated both links to be the same thing, the PSU doesn't show now.Shaken not stirred, you pleb. What would Bond think?Pricing error? The GTX 970 I got was because the company lied about it being 4 gigs in the GTX 970 as opposed to 3.5. I got half that price thrown out for me.There's also triple channel.You seem to have double posted, Mr. Quick with his finger.So I basically just have to have more fans in the front than the back?The driver crashes come back every few updates. It's been a trend.I'll never forgive them for being so lazy!The bezel is a thing that bothers many... It would incidentally not be Battlefront though, people forget it was always a casual third person shooter.EA games, challenge everything.Well there's already a BioWare Star Wars title in development and one from Visceral Games too...Honestly it looked like Gears of War with Star Wars. The hype for it was extreme but it just seemed like another cover runner.The criticism and competition they ignore. DA:I is one of the few games that could literally bore me enough to quit.Imagine if we had Witcher 3 pre graphic downgrade. Oh my.The problem is that it wasn't the mainc riticism. The issue was recycled environments, huge health bars, a bland combat tree, wave-based combat, the status system, blocked off environments, and being trapped in the same place all over as well as the art style, among other issues.

Instead they ... well they changed it an open world with incredibly repetitive and useless large world areas, a bland combat tree, and mostly the same issues. They improved on story I'll admit, but the companions were very messed up with their whole social justice warrior blend.That's not True. They're definitely greedy what with how they've run their corporations or how they've treated employees or at what cost, or massive firings, unrealistic financial goals that cause damage to other employees, etc.

But charity is a complex subject.Honestly it would have been better if it really was just altruism.Arguably there is another Islamic State that we may be in cahoots with.I just hope it doesn't become a trend that ANY student protest is considered self-absorbed.Why are you upset at her becoming Christian... maybe she wants to have faith in the afterlife.They all get new bodies and purified souls so..Well one thing's for certain, you're now on a list.It's a major immersion breach honestly, it's a pretty valid plot line push factor and yet some things, repetitive though they are so as to expand the length of time of play, just get in the way of the immersion at that early stage in play.Not according to how the actual character speaks when talking of him, no.Your kid is dead now, you waited too long. Father/Mother of the year award. Wife/Husband would hate you.I mean your son did quite a lot of great things, he just.. seems a bit bias.It's an immersion beach and Bethesda would be so much better if, going off this "your character has a history" style they've taken to, they opened up the world after the main quests expediency methods progressed a bit. That way you'd have more of a stake in things.They pretty much lead you to direct clues that tell you where though.And more likely if it were RL and Shaun ended up the same way, you'd probably be offed as an "impediment" later on.See you've gone from being "accepting' to completely dismissive of a religion. You've pretty much placed yourself in the bias camp entirely.

You seem to have a terrible understanding of the bible though. It would probably be best if you never talked about it unless you actually read it or read some real information on it.. because nothing you said is how the bible reports things. It would be dangerously ignorant for you to give feedback on the bible or the faith related to it.

You're disappointed in her for perhaps seeking solace in something or becoming part of a community that believes something you do not know anything about.. That sounds really backwards.Except in some part the settlement thing is a bit pushed as a requirement which also pushes crafting and such. The level segments is also a bit.. pushed. It's hard to make a straight bee-line there.It is known.I mean if she literally gave me wine everytime I made a decision.. that'd be pretty great.It was the only real way Iw as ever going to be able to play a GTA game and not hate it for being GTA so I liked it. But it was weak at points.Riddled with just as much downvote abuse and trolling sadly, as is mostly every sub,.So hate to inform you but you've past due for your colonoscopy appointment. Can we get you in here at eight am tomorrow?A man's gotta be able to take his own pants off when he's the boss, come on.Sigh, we have Obama to blame for this meme. Thanks Obama.Is no longer okay.Automatic anal probes are best anal probes.Do their Kleenex feel super soft on my nose?Sounds like a goodness opportunity...
Err.. business.Wouldn't that mess up the right to left flow?I heard three years just a bit ago when I was playing. Sigh now I have to find an older save and go through it just to prove to down vote abusers that they were wrong, which they'll still ignore.Shhh bby is okay.I mean that they are overpriced and overly specialized. It's against the manufacturer not you.And never will be boob bopping ever be a thing again... Kittens with mittens!Damn drunk ass.You just made a blanket statement that one could be applied to things you'd never want that to be an acceptable defense for, and with which insinuates you know everything.

You're wrong.. oh so wrong.

Also, you aren't the boss of discussion.I feel like I've seen that.. but I imagine "if bridge is destroyed and car is in proximity, accelerate / drive erratically to point B."Mm well I have four fans, ill see what I can do. I'll have to draw up a pretty elaborate fan curve set up in the bios though if I'm going to manage good pressure.It's the small things that are often the biggest.First that's not even how this works. Second, that statement doesn't even work in reality. Third, I know people that have the set ups. Fourth I've had the set up too.

Stupid troll.Bethesda didn't make Fallout 2 so why anyone mentions it makes no sense to me. There's no relation and if was a reboot.*Wag Wag* Aww he loves you. Give him a scratch.Bromeat?Paladin Danse liked that.Garfield playing with his food.. sigh stop playing with your food Garfield!Yeah his degree was just recalled, turns out he paid someone else to take his tests.There'd be a required general credit series of classes called "Abusing downvotes" which would be preceded by "Ignoring etiquette" and would be concluded with "How to hate others downvoting you while still downvoting".Despite W3 being of high quality yet still having a graphic downgrade and numerous issues.The people insulting consoles barely seem to know what consoles even do much less can do, and they don't learn either, nor do they appreciate the rich history or value or recognize they are the majority profit point for at-home gaming.Recitation Class 1:

"How now to get on the front page".

Recitation Class 2:

"You're still not on the front page."That sub bans anyone that mentions ANYTHING outside the circle jerk. It's ridiculous.Followed by the graduation requirement class:

"How to leave PCMR".Shh bby is okay.Not Found

These are not the nodes you are looking forStrange, I was under the impression we used those scans to determine brain activity but I see no highlighted regions of activity. So either you're brain-dead or I am wrong.

Being on reddit and a human, obviously it can't be the latter. So I've never met a brain dead human before, nice to meet you.What if.. what if the waves are REALLY BIG? What if it's a GIANT MAGNET?Subject Matter for Meeting:

"What does the light symbolize, I wonder"ALWAYS. I want to see a car chase and then they just stop because it's a dog at the cross walk.I get the impression he's nefarious."Bitch, I just want to choose my cereal in peace!"Comedy movies seem to do it for me. I have no idea why. Also being strangely warm does.Even in another language.. but whoever came up with those t shirts is an idiot.Compassion.Reddit buddie 1: Vaccines cause autism.

Narwheagle: *Upvote*

Reddit buddie 2: Racism is good, kill all the *insert race here*

Narwheagle: *Upvote*

Reddit buddie 3: Narwheagle raped me, if he upvotes he admits it.

Narwheagle: *Upvote*

Reddit buddie 4: Narwheagle is in prison for raping someone.

Narwheagle: ....

Reddit buddie 5: Puppies are awesome

Narwheagle: ....

It takes a cute dog for me to upvote it. Not just a regular dog.I don't :(I am amazed by this new style. I MUST have it.

*Year later*

And the newest fashion by Feline Mystique is the Lampoure Shade, from France. It is the hottest thing!Figures OP isn't very functional.Those times when the room's just warmer than normal and suddenly well.. out pops Johnny. Or you're laughing at Valentines Day and BOOP out pops Anthony. Get back in the hole Anthony.*Upvote*All dogs are cute but then we need a baseline to be like OH MY GOSH THAT'S CUTE rather than.. oh that's a dog.I gave up, the downvote abuse came and this post wasn't important enough for me to suffer - 50 because of the trend of DV's.

But yeah oh well.According to another poster, it's just because your scan wasn't very functional. So ehh your brain just doesn't function :PMy teacher does that in the syllabus too man is it annoying.Must be a prison buddy.Sweet so he was wrong. So when do I inherit all his upvotes?Sadly my own.. I find more joy by looking at puppies and younger dogs than my own very old dog.. and I've been with her through cancer... As she gets deaf and blind.. I love her but.. well there's not a lot of excitement anymore.

Also.. most other dogs.

BUT PUPPIES! OMG THE PUPPIES. Also golden retrievers even though mine is a golden.

Here's an example:

https://www.petfinder.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/11/99554849-service-dog-puppy-raisers-632x475.jpg... He wasn't even moving.DEMONSTRATEWell... soon she'll get a handicap aid and next thing you know..

http://animalfair.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/04/funny-dog-shaming-540x393-1-331x220.jpgMajority of people will probably say they can't tell any difference between the last two because I barely can.It could *hert* others too much once they see the difference though.Yeah that guy is happy and handsome.. Hopefully to the front page we go.Measure your phone.I want to...Actually downtown and most places around it are pretty great.

Wouldn't want to live in Flint.About to finish college yet to get what I need to... a lot of no call backs.. It's been err... well I feel like I have less value.The fallout from the newest game across the sub has been pretty extreme.That's the thing. I AM.*Meanwhile...*

"STOP OPPRESSING ME!"- I distract myself with games, primarily story.
- In the rare times I get my friends to follow through rather than flake I'll either go out for camaraderie male bonding with them, enjoy a glass or two of wine with them, or just play some games or watch media.
- I'll gorge myself on reddit for hours upon hours upon hours, distracting myself from everything I need to do due to being addicted to socialization.
- Constantly speak in a language no one knows when I'm REALLY depressed and I'm not even sure if I even remember correctly anymore.
- Procrastinate heavily as a consequence which leads to more distraction.
- Ultimately be defeated by worthless feelings..

Somehow pull through and live to the next day.

Edit: But I make myself a little proud of myself because I treat others, as best as I can, how I really would want to be treated. And I go above and beyond.Moscato D'Asti.

It is a wine you will probably love, keep on ice do not refridgerate, wait about.. an hour for the wine bottle to get cold and then pour in glass. Drink within 4 hours. Feel free to keep it remaining on ice.

It works for people who hate wine and who love wine. Enjoy.I only hate people because they abandon, hurt, or won't be my friend or spend time with me much.. if at all :'( I don't want to hate people.I fail at this utterly due to people's necessary trend of continually flaking out on commitments. It creates a circle of enhancing my depression.This basically IS what meat spin is.Careful. D'Asti is a dessert wine. Moscato is just a fortified wine. I hate the latter love the former. It's based on the way the grapes are prepared and used.

Ice wine works the same way.Please drink verification can.Try Canadian Ice Wine and Moscato D'Asti.

There's SWEET like... sugar stuff. And then there's sweet like a flowery scent. You'll learn.Yes, make some babies so I can eat them, clearly the best life decisions.Wouldn't be bothered by any of that honestly.- "What annoys you?"
- "If something annoys you, do you go tell your friends about it?"
- "Do you often have self-introspection and objectively consider your thoughts or do you just go with what you feel?"
- "Do you have a clique nearby?"
- "If you have a clique nearby, are you just going to spend time with them all the time?"
- "What time are you really going to bed at?"
- "What time can you deal with going to bed at?"
- "How loud are you?"
- "Can you be quieter?"
- "Do you desire to make friends or to just have a roommate?"
- "Will you give any effort to this arrangement?"
- "Are you an asshole?"Teeth, gums, lungs, heart, brain, and tissue.

I'd like to add a regeneration capability to the original base line of the DNA.What did you say?Keeping in canon, you're not likely to survive the sessions.. any of them.You talked about how good the dog is, not how cute it was.

Being old has sapped the spirit from my dog and the surgery damaged her hearing :( But yeah.That's called flaking, just in the longer extremes.

Time to sit down randomly with people or actually force yourself to associate at a club. It isn't easy and it doesn't work 99.999999 %of the time.

I have so many people I wish would spend more time with me.. or even want to..Everything you thought was a lie is True.

EVERYTHING.

And yes, we are lizard people. Please prepare for your gene therapy, you get to join the club before we head off to Area 51.Imagine if one was like that gif of the guy dressed up as a roman soldier.. and he would move and do things or tap you when you weren't looking.Gallowboob is a conglomeration of people obviously, he had different people take his tests each time.I would certainly hope so..- Betrayal: House
- Star Wars: Trivia Pursuit DVD Edition
- PITArnold S.

Because he's still upset he can't run for president. Then he'd go terminating the countryside.Never do what you wouldn't be okay with someone doing to you.It's an old post... but it checks out.

*Upvote for cuteness*It smells, value has reduced.Well not doing anything won't do it, though doing something might not either.It is now!

Bernie Sanders for government of country!Antarctica Research Base

They have to BE VERY careful what they do or they all die.Did the same things.. somehow came out better.You are on the list."So.. why did you keep destroying your planet and civilization and oppressing all your people when you knew it couldn't last?"This insinuates Reddit is good... That's arguable.

So I can has cheeseburger and its dog equivalent. Since they're funny.We need to see 144.You probably have better luck than me if you try to be honest.

My steam is Helphaer. I don't really do MP games but if you ever need to chat when I'm on...Slowest loading gif in existence.

It is no longer okay.Reality is when someone does take what you have.Not getting into offers when I was applying prior to my graduating soon.Shh bby is okay.That human decency was a lie.Shh bby is okay.No, I'd anonymously report it, unless I could sell it to pay off college but.. only to pay off college.Students against destructive decisions.( \u0361\u00b0 \u035c\u0296 \u0361\u00b0)It's why this country is so corrupt.. no one does anything.( \u0361\u00b0 \u035c\u0296 \u0361\u00b0)It's a very competitive process, we went a different way.Ask them the questions you really might want to know if you worked there, but don't give any impression you actually expect something for yourself out of this, not until negotiations.You took WAY too long to give that treat. Try again and do better this time.( \u0361\u00b0 \u035c\u0296 \u0361\u00b0)... I came here to post memes and get easy upvotes.. but I'm not sure what to type?

Do I type about rice? Do I post meme faces? What do I do..

( \u0360\u00b0 \u035f\u0296 \u0361\u00b0)I saw another post while distracting myself from doing any significant work for the impending final exam I have in 5 and a half hours and the quiz I have in 3 hours after that.

It was about our golden rule.  I realized it was intrinsic to me.Don't you go knocking my SPECIAL BRAND!Shh bby is okay.&lt; ( ^ _ ^ &lt; )So far at 2:47 A.M. older than everyone in this thread.

I've never really... had a drive to do otherwise.That wouldn't fly with the Pope. Either no sexual acts at all or you're lying. Get out of this thread you poser.He did.

"God"

*Drops mic*Never seen this before. It's decent.A person people can rely on, and who they choose to do so with.So that's Bolt 2.0.You don't inhale, statistically outside of over-indulgence the risk is negligible, and it's a good camaraderie tool that we avoid addiction with. Just too expensive.Actually that IS a proper phrase. You're reducing one's strength.Shh bby it okay.Strange, all I see is that it's hot to complain about the two titles sucking constantly.. all day.. every day.. every sub.We must go higher.Drugs..HIVE MIND!I expected Heir of the Empire. As a person that read near every expanded universe book, when they killed the canon I felt my childhood fly away.It was all okay'd by Lucas, that makes it non fan fiction.Have you ever seen fan fiction, like from non accomplished writers? Yeah that's shit.Honestly it just seems so boring too. I was around when they were called Aeon of Strife maps in SC1 and WC3 and I can tell you we had some good custom AoS's back then, even the original DotA was still good.. but now.. it's all just repetition and competition and the fun seems sucked out.The main reason is because he's not controlled by corporate or financial campaign contributions and his voting history near 99% shows sense with what people agree with on here and what the youth wants. Sure he's not perfect but he recognizes the ridiculous corruption or at least appears to and there's no other choice possible if we want to stop the corporate corruption.Homeland was good for the first 2 seasons... After then...That is definitely a different console experience.Because.. you may actually start being unable to do things you used to do easily.. and appreciate the help.He may not remember his house is the other way.I shared my view honestly a couple times and it was seriously trolled and abuse of down votes was thrown at it. The fact that still happens is just stupid. The troll was the one trying to antagonize by framing the situation differently.

As had been determined in another comment here, I understood it once I figured out the presentation was using a different method than I assumed.It's to indicate your silence. You're in prison silly. So delusional. This is a dream..It was a good game though it could have used a bigger development budget less marketing and maybe some more story development.Wait that's bubba over there.. I think it's "comfort time" for you and his buddies.. This part's not the dream though.You're not unhandsome, so you've got that going for you.

David Radcliffe looks like me. There ya go.Can the feelings be over here instead then?http://ifunny.co/tags/narwheagle

He means he looks like this.Perhaps.Simmer down now boy, or I'll get out my whippin' belt.http://www.popsugar.com/tech/photo-gallery/37136934/image/37136964/Taking-n00bs-like-bossYes you fit there. You decided to come to a post that had benign and simple inquisitive nature to it and try and troll it, then antagonize it all for the purpose of getting to refer me to a sub you belong in despite it being heavily abused by anyone disagreeing with people.

Blocked, reported, and tagged.Even higher, we must cross-post to /r/marijuanaenthusiasts Balls in your court then. Good night.Kind of the point.We don't deserve to be. Dogs do.Less about optimization, more about hardware requirements, but I'm sure it could scale down.Cookie crisp!Thermal grease, wire management, headers for resting motherboard, and motherboard cable installation are the big rough spots for new builders.My first prebuikt was an emachines.. so I remember those days.

The set up seems find.

In the future getting a high spec solid state drive, possibly drive enclosure to make it fit, an increased graphics card, and a battery upgrade would be things to consider. Only one of those would be hard to install.I games at 1080 on 17 and 19" for years when I was younger.Often times the progression or upkeep of quality in New game iterations is low for one reason or another sadly. This is a consistent trend I am convinced is meant to recruit younger at the cost of older core purchasers.Just click reddit icon then copy and paste.My first was probably an hour and a half, though I had a friend.. point.What's wrong with nude computer repair?I always just clip it to the case and pray. Never had the PSU plugged in or attached directly to it.I just tried, I have to be in a. particular university department not the business department.Its cookies for breakfast!Shhh bby is okay.I missed karma train? Maybe it isn't okay.Flamboyant down vote abuse aside.. what is over? The meme?They last for years though...I recommend RoccatSWTOR mouse, only expensive gaming mouse I ever had for like 170 and it lasts a long time and does what I need. Not sure on the ergonomics though.Are you expecting to overclock?

Edit: Mixing ram with different voltages and brand is a bad idea. Choose one.It's best to stick with eight gb singulars but that'd require full replacement. If you want to sue your own, you'd need to buy identical. If this board uses dual channel in layered means then your four slots will probably need two more cards.Not just time. Money. Budgets favor marketing far too much. Such as with FO and BF recently.This doesn't mean it doesn't bother many. Bothered me.

People are far too quick to abuse downvotes.The most lauded games came out with serious degradation in quality.The implementation of new systems, progression of quality from previous iterations, and overall story and character development were all minimal efforts.How do you disagree with a vague personal experience. Damnet reddit.It was my intent to, but I didn't actually.Only time I've upvored it.Didn't get many up votes though. Damn. I was sure this time... Well thanks for reminding me.Not retract just not participate.It seemed dead.You're such a viralphage."i am your dog now"Wait until you learn that corporations lobbyists are literally on the tax committee and have open access. same with the tax code itself.True but the public doesn't know Jane's bill of great charity is now a prison bill.It shouldn't be.Majority of people view anything that disagrees with them as trolling. I don't really feel bothered that people are ignorant.It's all shielded by budgets. Development, marketing, administration and then Longevity.For a niche sure, but you are the minority. The majority doesn't care about much other than buying it.Nothing bad to report.There we're the lucky few of us that never had a single problem with it. But I really like their motherboards.. never had any issues same with gfx cards. Interesting.. you know now that I think about it when that scandal for the 970 was front and center they only offered me a cheap mouse as consolation or a return. Amazon cut half the price off for me.Or how nearly all new implemented systems were done so poorly.. now where's my character development and story at....Sadly not enough space for all my gaemes. Ssd quality product prices need to lower more for larger sizes.Still not working for me.How is Corsair TX?EVGA also does good with their ACX if you're worried. I'm not sure on the Ti. I'd read more reviews. The vengeance higher speeds has a lot of memory problems sadly.I play different games each time as they release. So I keep them all installed.It's more just that memory often needs to be scanned and tested and then returned until you get a good one.Not what I'm doing though. So your first issue is you're skewing and distorting what I'm doing through bias and opinionated interpretation.

That being said, when someone says something with a blanket statement, there is certainly a need to clarify.

In any case, what I said is what the majority already knows. Reddit likes to forget the majority even exist.To be fair, many educational institutions including public school actually are signed up with dreamspark for free Windows.These days the cpu is very rarely tasked. That's not to say it couldn't be, but game developers aren't very good programmers and don't utilize half the features cores have. Graphic cards are approaching this. Developers suck at optimization and so they don't run as well on what they should run well on and many times don't use many of the features provided.

This is why things like hyperthreading, high end memory speeds, ultra wide, sli, 4k, 1440p, and even higher frame rates aren't used well in newer or older games usually and many times even will cause problems if you try to use them.Every Seagate backup I've ever gotten has been nothing but headaches sadly.Heart we have a problem. Are you in diagnosis mode?Get cancer and make me really sad about her dying soon...

Bad dog.. do not get cancer! All I know is pny makes shitty flash drives.I do like them. Just not ones with large bezel. You're being bias because you're assuming what I'm intending or mean. You were wrong.

End of trolling for you.You're the one constantly misusing troll, which really just means antagonizing someone for a reaction.

I don't dislike multi displays. You stated I do, this ped you to looking at my statements in a skewed and distorted way which led to misintepteting them, which led to you becoming bias and unable to see reason.I've always had randomly did connected internet problems. I blame my router or the stupid isp.It can be hard to tell which motherboard to get. They all look different and have different styles and features. The best is to find a brand that has worked well for you, then choose the socket you need, then make sure it had the features you want and then finally determine if the price options work. Then look for reviews, if it sucks they'll probably list one that was better.The problem is games aren't optimized with ultra wide generally... It may not be worth pursuing it.4k isn't anywhere close to being fully distributed and TV's are still hyper expensive for it.People like the MSI GTX 970 because of its cooling system.I might consider getting an ATI card rather than a Nvidia unless you want to up it to a TI.MSI z87 G45 Gaming

I updated it when I first installed my SSD last year.The bios recognizes things sometimes the system didn't recognize xmp mode when in the os.So many rmaWell that's why I ran the Windows memory and reported the errors.More capable compared to the 980.That's called being an ass and a poor sport.He didn't deserve that though, just be a good sport. I don't think it's fine either personally.What about sportsmanship?.... Why should you get punched for trying to be happy and celebrate.. other players once the game is over should celebrate with you because hey you did a good job and that was great. Just as you'd hope from others... I mean I'm of the mindset they all should have gone out for cigars, strippers, and scotch personally.64.I use a lot of long load time games. I have 5 tb now.Most retail will fire you if you ever treat a customer differently when they are upset.

Also perpetuating the problem is shitty, selfish, and lacks empathy.It's fifty fifty if it ever works.Just have them buy you stuff. If people took me out for good cigars and scotch and strippers.. I'd fix their computers quickly.Sadly these days if I don't see 75% off at steam I just click away. But ToB REALLY HAD me going that my choices might matter. They didn't.Dude WTF are you doing? Get out of here with your warlike propaganda. I do not want to see Abrams tanks in a police sub!When a company make a goof you shouldn't really be okay with them cancelling orders, they goofed not you.Honestly most corps would have just eaten the loss.Now watch you'll go down vote three thousand things.I mean I wouldn't shop there if they did, unless they asked and were a small business.My desktop sometimes restarts after sleeping for a few hours. Sometimes the mouse stays on and brightens the room with led. Oh well.You'd be surprised.I'm just surprised they tried to give it an award.. by now we all know all the problems and state of it I'd think.Ahh the spokescat for dapper Dan.True but being upset on its own isn't enough for that and any employee delaying or making the customer more upset shouldn't be accepted.A movie about a mission to mars where they have a robot dog that is a probe and utility type of thing but it goes haywire and starts murdering them and it has blades and everything. I didn't like seeing a murdering robot dog and it had creepy music. Honestly it seems like you're just digging into your trench and not just admitting you were poorly educated on the topic. Don't bite off his head, lucky we don't bite yours.I'm more concerned what they'll do to those who have processors now damaged.Honestly there's just too much stuff in this post that it is overwhelming which hurts the usefulness heavily.Who cares?Only upset he was being mean to the original poster of this string.No Al has so many problems when you recognize who fricken funds it... I've never understood how anyone but the rich wanting more power and corruption could vote republican personally. It seems to contradict the gothic and emo mentality as well so that just is flabber gasting.Probably had Alek give him bills to sign without reading.Except it also leads to rampant corporate corruption, it also isn't more beneficial for you to have rampant student loan debt, your kids the same, deathly medical bill prices, some of the worst younger education in the world, and other issues.

The True republican viewpoints while always a smokescreen,, have always had the same campaign contributors and problems.*Points at rampant corporate corruption and a deadlock that inhibits proper government, as well as pretty much a corrupt and incompetent everything on the republican side. Democrats aren' much t better, especially since we haven't been a democracy for a long time. But both are degrading the entire entire country.While a lot of this is helpful, it doesn't really solve most of the issues it brings up to be honest. Thankful this sub doesn't actually mesh with PCMR.The elitests and ignorant do yes.Then what you also want is a power so overwhelming of the government that it is entirely corrupt.

Government should really try and do things more efficiently.Did you not read the person you responded to? ? I see everyone with a good library of Blu-rays and DVD"s still..

It's just an underrepresented factor on this niche website.The guy indicated he is new to computers and just wants to run high on games, that means he is not going to be some fluent guy in overclocking and thus should not have recommendations for K and Z models.I could have done turn based in this but it'd need this type of graphic update regardless, at least for me.Honestly doing this was the only way I'd ever be able to play the seventh game.. I just can't play games after they've been out for 7 or so years. I get used to a certain type of graphics as I age and that progresses, same with mechanics and systems.I try not to reload unless absolutely necessary.&gt; ew Vegas' dialogue system is one of the main reasons why it's so damn replayable. Strength, Science, Agil, Small Guns, etc.

The problem is we did not. They could have taken that route and simply really done well with the dialog, maintained a lot of dialog or optional dialog options, investigation methods and large scale lore questioning and character development. There were options. None were utilized.The animation style.. makes me hesitant that Ic ould play through and enjoy this or the original... Thats eems unfortunate.Broken Steel was the best DLC of all the FO in my opinion.The perk tree confuses me. I did a calculator and.. unless I am level 135 it doesn't seem like I can make anything decent. Already gotta spend a lot of time just upping the stats.Sigh it had to be a MOBA.. would have likeda  TPS, or FPS, or RPG, or Action RPG or anything.. but no yet another MOBA throw that story out the window sigh.I can't agree witha ny of the others but Lost Odyssey was an EPIC experience if you could stomach the first hour or two slow crawl.To be honest with the ability to save criticals and all those ridiculous critical perks... this will likely prove easy.&gt; This kid ignored it and wasnt ready to face what the internet got to offer.

When I was 18, 21, and so on I'd still be hurt by people being hurtful...Careful, Blackfish was found to not ENTIRELY be accurate.

I would encourage anyone to do real research before letting their imaginations run wild and treating that as fact.The issue is the facts on either side are so obfuscated that either both are awful, Israel is a hero, or somewhere darker is the truth. Reddit is just as misinformed and blind too so it really is hard to know the real facts.They went full Indie so probably never well.But the person who brought it up would be shot in the head immediately, like the real world I'd want to be a support worker.You mean the aloof one?While the constant misuse of retardation is annoying.. being deaf has no relation to suffering from mental retardation of the faculties.Honestly he seemed pretty angry to me.We were just commenting on how the last puppy is a member of a gang and will probably end up with all the girls or else you'll be found in a lake with concrete shoes.I like that blue collar.Well we know the collies best friend.. but what does the other dog think?Pretty sure this cat is saying "I Know where you sleep"/https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Retardation

It's actually pretty hard to really use retardation as an insulting type of form factually, but I'm not sure a "physical trait" really exists according to this. TIL.Your dog probably just needs more treats to sate his longer than average tongue. You must not be doing a good job at giving him a proper share of treats and food.*I think I'll lick my nose.. WHHAHA UHHH BRIGHT FLASH*
I prefer Telltale's Wolf Among Us, Walking Dead Season 1 and Tales of Borderlands personally. The GoT one just didn't have the same flair.Can confirm, right next to Spiderman as he was helping them solve a crime."I own you now"."I love you guys too!"3 hoomans versus 1 puppy? I feel the number gods require another dog to even out the prime number.That kid must have been a fast grower."This is the best toy idea ever".

*Dollar signs ring in the background*"Yes.. I need that back now"But then he rolled on his tummy and all was forgotten."I admit nothing"It brightened up the day but woke up the cat.You have 3 karma, mentioned Half Life 3, and posted about Half Life 3.

HL3 confirmed.The horrible story is what pushes me away :-/What's more annoying is the character limit on what you can install it to as a directory...
i've been saying the same thing about corporations running the American government.. and it'll never happen until they're literally dying.Replay value on older games is poor for most because older games don't have as advanced mechanics or graphic systems and older styles aren't played by the majority outside of the niche. So... it's a problem.I felt that Black Flag got away from the assassin stuff and stayed pretty much the same just with more boating from AC3... I would like a pure assassin type game again.You'll have to check the console sales to really know its success.I'd imagine that'd first be thought of as a correlation / causation problem. But I'd primarily say that without any further research of it on my own I can not rationally nor definitively state anything on the matter and of course I am not at liberty to do so right now as it's finals week.You are expected to have documented with video all of these dumb things, please for the community of Reddit, deliver OP.I'd hardly call gliding a leap of faith :-/You said just said "tell me you see CA"... then he tells you then you're like "well of course"...It could very well be due to the damage from certain types of breeding or it could be anything.While the abuse of down votes and netiquette is pretty common here I'm just surprised it went to this type of sub."Someday I'm going to grow up to be a triceratops!"Well he's ABOUT to.What movie was this from?Can confirm.MR. Tom Wheeler, don't you have the FCC to run back into the ground? Get out of here.I use charter and I'm already arguing each year for a slightly less high increase than threatened.http://i.imgur.com/Tcfcxjh.gifv

I mean it had this!

THIS!Only if he's told to miss.Is he even SECOND best? Is he BEST at anything? Is he even GOOD at anything? HonestlY?Well he's not brave, he just doesn't like to think of himself as less than the Slytherin.Movie ron is adorable, but also an asshole.So you're dying from palladium poisoning and alcohol poisoning and lung cancer and from suicidal depression?Avada kadabra!

Enough of that...He did something terrible but I don't know what it was.You misunderstand. Not the titles, the comments.Why should I have to PAY my legislators that tax me?If it works so well, why is the government entirely corrupt?As it came from him, nothing sounds like it seems.Incorrect.

It is dominated by corporations, bribery, representatives that are vested in their own interests, a leadership mount that is primarily supported by billionaires to get there and thus has major conflicts of interest, a congress that has statistically 0 voting influence from those they represent versus a 60% influence rate by corporations and wealthy individuals. And so on...The comments have nothing to do with being relatively poor deals, reposts, MIR or being posted by Jet. 

The majority of comments also aren't the content you've indicated. As such this really isn't very relevant to the fact comments expressing views, opinions, experiences, or even asking questions in those threads are heavily downvoted.Aren't the primary things he's investing in mostly just electric cars with high price tags and space travel with higher price tags?You should be near the top.. reddit must be drunk tonight.Ahh there you are! Still not the top though...It also isn't really a poor person concept which the majority of America is quickly becoming what with the dissolution of the middle class.You almost had me OP.It's worthy of investment but not over every other pressing concern or the detriment of society.Being prevalent doesn't mean it isn't the behavior.I bolded it, anyone who understands Pension expense like... I clearly do not should quickly be able to go to page 109 (and 110 if needed) and see what I'm missing.

http://h30261.www3.hp.com/~/media/Files/H/HP-IR/documents/reports/2015/hpq-annual-report-2014.pdf

Page 109 - 110

Oopsies.Did that link help? I posted it at the top. I just don't think I really understand how to gather the Pension expense data from HP because what I did doesn't seem right and I didn't see a way to implement the PBO.Would this be it?

Debit pension asset 238
Debit OCI G/L 15
Credit Pension expense 226
Credit Cash 27So what would that look like? If what I listed isn't correct?We are talking about convenient middle class style expectation of living conditions in large amounts on mars. The spacecraft necessary would be immense and construction more so.May I come too?No one wants to live poor.. wait. Very few people want to live poor on mars away from all life and friends and entertainment.

You have to be able to do it all at once.There's a fact check on that statement actually. Interesting read. Didn't know Bernie smoked..I thought you meant a cigarette.So is Reddit and youtube and everywhere honestly.Isn't gas for your car kind of a microtransaction? if you stop paying then you can't play. Or is more a subscription fee ala an MMO? I expect good mileage with my subscription.Like the game media.
Anyone with the slightest hint of any different viewpoint is downvoted to hell on Reddit so.. ehh.I'm not so sure, I don't pay maintenance fees on my internet or rely on it to get me to work or other such places. I feel gas is more a subscription fee which it realistically is.I'd have a fine cigar and glass of scotch with him personally.Hey how do I get in on this free karma? Who do I need to curse at?Don't statistics show though that speed limits and other such traffic restrictions actually cause more accidents?We've all had to urinate once or twice in a bush come on now.While it shouldn't do that, doesn't that mean this entire thread should be downvoted to hell. The entire meme test caption is a "cry about downvotes" attempt.

I see rediquette died a while ago for most it seems, as downvotes are only supposed to be for non contributing to the topic posts.Are you insinuating all your own downvoted comments are "so fucking stupid?"Ties are hard I mean come on.I have seen a ridiculous amount of fluent and unimpeded and dangerous traffic just "work" in other countries. I also do know that statistics show that the speed limits do more harm than good.Can confirm, extremely addicted to reddit please send help.What about that party we had though? I'm sure he'll figure out his documents were stripping Piracy doesn't take anything from anyone and a person that wouldn't ever pay for it is thus not a lost customer. the benefits are feedback and free advertising or future purchase because they ended up liking it. Statistics don't support Anti digital piracy.You've got some, since you opened the floodgates I did a little searching too

I've had a few multi hundred down votes but I can retort with the reality that the statistics and facts did agree with me, people just didn't want to hear it. That is typically the majority of instances of severe down voting--not wanting to consider or hear opposing views.

We see it offline all the time with people trying to talk over others and close their minds.

I would personally say what you started this chain with was pretty stupid or at least incredibly juvenile. But it's clear you have a very different interpretation of things outside what I'd say the normal state would be.

This does bring legitimate concern to whether this sub and things like it may be.. well more closed off and aggressive than normal, which is of course unacceptable and inappropriate due to the squelching it advocates. I now recall I've seen that here myself before.If you're going to truly hold onto the position that anyone severely downvoted must just be completely wrong and it couldn't possibly be that people were not willing to hear things or didn't agree or didn't want to.. then you should review the image this post links.

That wasn't long-winded nor was it an attempt. It was an observation of your behavior and it was reinforced by your own words and desire to call others actions stupid, potentially including the factor of calling others stupid.

No it's not a matter of my leaving, it's more a matter of you changing. Telling everyone to leave all the time simply reinforces bad behavior. But that's not what the point was. The point was simply to indicate that there may indeed be a huge problem and you're just making it worse.While those are also troublesome, I am specifically thinking of the speed limit studies that are arbitrary to begin with and don't actively protect people.Speed limits also force people to have variable speeds from people breaking them, people that aren't but slow down the pace of traffic and can cause accidents, and people that have variable speeds within the actual limit.

While being hit at seventy is obviously dangerous, forcing people to go sixty five in An area that needs a much higher limit can cause people to have artificial congestion and which also causes problems.Should we tell him? When you smoke your brain gets hijacked by an arsenal of factors including the nicotine and other chemicals to boot. Everything you think about smoking is driven by that and you're entirely unreliable. Essentially it's all fake.

Cigarettes are a near-permanent smell that's nearly impossible to permanently get out of clothes and hair folicules as can be attested by non smokers that are unfamiliar to the smell and you go near them. It's atrocious. It doesn't make you look cool nor do people think you look cool with it other than a few niche fetish sites that have their own issues. It also hurts others and yourself and does nothing good for you, as all the bad is actually caused by the cigarette and all the good is.. well not even real.Perhaps a fine cigar could.The problem is that the artificial congestion causes more accidents.That's because we don't have a predator, though we do declare war on ourselves quite often and have made the vast majority of the world's people poor.It's still possible but it would be a major undertaking and there might not be much reward. The downgrade having happened makes this even less likely.Approach? When someone tells you how gravity works after you state that you think it does so differently.. is that an approach? That's a fact. Your self-awareness has nothing to do with the chemical imbalances and hijacking that high concentrations of nicotine and other such factors bring. That's like saying you control mind when at most you can influence it.

Moral high ground? This isn't a moral high-ground. We're just talking science here. Facts and reality. There's no "oh you're awful", there's just the fact you don't have any control over your responses regarding that drug and everything thought about it by you is going to be heavily clouded if you're a user.Statistically, people self-regulate themselves pretty well when driving and if they don't the kind of social pressures and peer revelation pushes them to mesh with the crowd of drivers. You're also trying to isolate high speed accidents from the same causes of low speed accidents, that's ingenuous.

There are exceptions to every rule but primarily these come up as problems related to emotional issues and those would happen irregardless.Oh there's going to be another Witcher after Cyberpunk that's for certain. Enhancing a graphical option wouldn't necessarily extend its life though.To make great friendships and relationships that innately desire to know me and be there for me. I hope those experiences truly expand my horizons and bring joy to my life for once.Ego strokingI just saw this I swear last week like literally last week.. I also just saw another repost literally last week. The repost date distance has seriously shrunk.

Still that dog looks drugged out of its mind.So... basically make yourself even more of a burden on me as I accidentally come across you....  I thought it was a towel but THEN!This would be exactly what I'd feel like.. IF I HAD ONE!

:-/ Alas I do not.And the corruption spawned from it has pushed the majority into it. With a dissolving middle class, a dominated congress, and numerous other corrupt elements of our society.. it is unacceptable and irrational to defend capitalism.Most people aren't aware of the impact of their addictions because they don't actually recognize their addiction, what it stands for, believe hearsay, and sadly like most people think towards most things... don't actually do any significant data mining or research into the matter. It's a problem.

I have my own shit but it isn't something I can't comprehend or recognize, and I make sure to do everything I can about it.

But I'm not being condescending. This is more just.. observations of fact.This is the greatest dog face ever captured.. the sheer confusion, judgment, and disguised hatred coming from it cannot be put into words."Hooman has something for the cat? I WANT THAT!" *Charge*You say that when the evidence is right infront of your eyes as the corruption of America destroys the country from the inward out and the vast immensity of wealth is held tightly by people only concerned with gaining and which never touches those that need it and hurts society as a whole.Well it's not so much above, though a critical addiction through hijacking the brain would really be seen more as a disease or a mental illness. You're not above those people, you simply hope they get better. You even identify people as "smokers' and "non smokers" when you create the barriers of identity yourself.

My conclusion isn't illogical because it isn't a conclusion, it's just an observation of some facts. 

I only see you trying to twist the reality of things for your own advantage, personally. You get the fuck outta here with that..

I feel like typing that insult made me lose intelligence.COBRA COMMANDER has a new look.Why does this make me laugh?I would like some more on my breadsticks, yes.I get that reference! That cat is cruel.He opens 90 programs through CMD prompt?\That one is probably doing real coding.You aren't making a free choice, you're addicted. Or you were impacted by social and peer pressures and what kept you was the chemical hijacking. This is pretty well known stuff. Why are you acting like it's first time you've heard that an addiction isn't a choice?

You may think you understand what you're talking about as well. Clearly you do think that, it isn't True.

The information I get doesn't come from Reddit thank you.

Your own insults and juvenile comments really work better when directed towards yourself.Appeals how? She doesn't stand for anything that will help them.I'm biased towards non corruption.Generally we've figured out that it doesn't matter, even if we all showed up it still wouldn't matter.Is that Moon Moon again?Imagine if people were really that kind to their friends.. where did that level of compassion go off to anyway?Most "quitting" of cigarettes are actually in ways that leave the residiual obsession, a large degree are transferring to vaping but maintain the same habitual and other addictions and have a gateway both forward and backwards against their will, further they still remain controlled. There's not a lot of ways to safely and comprehensively remove that level of addiction.

That wasn't my goal, the goal was only facts, you're just distorting and misrepresenting what I say as much as possible because you don't want to recognize the facts. 

You really don't seem to know anything that I'm trying to do, not sure why you insist on continually saying you do though.

This is jawsome.Screw your milks cap back on you slob!This door knows no patience.You should really do better research before claiming what someone supports. I'm far more informed and supportive of Bernie than you'll ever he, and I actually understand his entire platform for what is plausible and not.

The point isn't support. It's ability to fight against corruption.Your predisposition towards addictions and the substances you abuse is oft more favorable than you intend due to the constant thoughts about it.

The aesthetics too are.. False.It's more that I've read legitimate and multi-sourced research so I know for a fact that it's the case. I suppose facts are not 100% so I know for a reasonable 98%+ variable.

I was just pointing out some reasons why speed limits are altogether not of much help to the majority.If manageable the problem is since people don't follow those rules for a variety of reasons, the issues maintain themselves.Seems you're resorting to silly trolling measures then. I shouldn't have taken the bait most likely. Good job.You must be exuberant.Octopussy?A sentence should end with a period.So basically only if you're rich or have the force do you matter.But then is it a sentence?Pneumonoultramicroscopicsilicovolcanoconiosis."yes.. I think I'll eat human now"Incorrect and don't assume what I can and can't do, you also haven't argued any psychosocial science or any sociological or psychological trends or anything.

I expect a certain amount of due diligence as custom in debates. You should already have read related research articles and scholarly papers and studies about it.

That's partially why you're trolling, also your constant dismissal with no real counterpoint related.Yes my 400,000 + comments riveting read I'm sure it took all month. If we're bringing post stalking you have me at a disadvantage, I request a week at least to review all your comments to better understand your behaviors with proper context, without any misrepresentation or distortion like you just did, and for accuracy state.

You've still not addressed really anything I've said honestly.

But that's okay.It's a sleeping AT.AT. Pretty pooped out.Well for intimidation and also for easy manuevering through all types of environments.How.. how does his officer suit jacket stay on without moving...

In case anyone didn't notice.. It's open at the center in an amazing way that shouldn't... Stay on.

A lot of trolls in this thread though it seems.That's kind of weirder.Being honest and objectively pointing out its issues or forming a view towards it should be applauded, just accepting it because it is star wars should not.To be honest to ask any spending to be cut in half would be quite severe and scary to most. You could try ten percent perhaps or the freeze on some project but then you have to decide which. We've got two carriers being built but we can't just leave them alone for a year or stop building them. We can't get away from a lot of the expenses that are necessary.No I explained why and not everyone else. Also a lot of people have problems with it of a severe nature. You're just ignoring them.Well we are building the new carrier the Gerald R Ford. The next line past the Nimitz class. So in the sense of technological progression, it exists and its power capacity is higher which allows for greater advancements and technology.

That's why we're replacing all the carriers.. Think call of duty mixed with star wars but no tactics.There was a star wars game with two big red circles next to a joystick that all the arcades had. You played through three missions and it cost quite a bit. Ahh good memories.

Battlefront isn't even supposed to be a first person shooter..I do not understand how. So little content and so repetitive and generic.. or if you prefer a huge list of objective issues..

What possibly could you enjoy enough to ignore app that?Battlefront was a third person multiplayer team based game. They occasionally had vehicles and it was entirely focused on fun over anything else. Mostly objective based.Don't care what you do, just give me the AT-AT power up for the entire game! No duck you you took it!I couldn't agree with replay value. Honestly bsttlefeont two bored me after a while. Not a lot of differences.Honestly the maps are too small and too funneled as is.They DID have issues though. Mostly drowned out by fanboys.Look, I'm all for turning off the military r&amp;d and projects other than the budget for operations and emergencies, but all that free budget should go to repaying college loans and helping others get educations and empowering the poverty.Repetition mechanics are NOT subjective. And the content is obvious.. it's also clearly intended to be monetized.

No it's a very generic style, in fact it's pretty boring.

Objective issues ranging from lack of campaign, to the random chaotic feel with no structure, massive imbalances, the power up implementation, poor weapon design, the powerup system in itself, and so much more.

The game isn't AAA quality by any means.No the games aren't shit, but they weren't ten out of ten like the hype wanted them to be. Nor was TPP.Fine, the propensity of games made during and after the time when the prequels came out were pretty bad or just average.I wasn't new, but it had poor character development, necessary and obvious character or conversation dialog options were not present and many characters you had barely any real chance to get to know. Along with many other issues.1999:

Star Wars: Episode I \u2013 The Phantom Menace (1999) - Windows, PlayStation
Star Wars: Episode I (1999) - Pinball
X-Wing Alliance (1999) - Windows
Star Wars: Droid Works (1999) Windows, Mac

2000:

Star Wars: Episode I \u2013 Jedi Power Battles (2000/01) - PlayStation, Dreamcast, Game Boy Advance
Star Wars: Episode I \u2013 Battle for Naboo (2000/01) - Nintendo 64, Windows
Star Wars: Episode I \u2013 Obi-Wan's Adventures (2000) - Game Boy Color
Star Wars: Racer Arcade (2000) Arcade
Star Wars: Force Commander (2000) (Real-time strategy) Windows - set during the time of episodes IV through VI
Star Wars: Demolition (2000) (Vehicular Combat) PlayStation, Dreamcast \u2013 set during the time of episodes IV through VI

2001: 

Star Wars: Obi-Wan (2001) - Xbox
Star Wars Rogue Squadron II: Rogue Leader (2001) Nintendo GameCube
Star Wars: Starfighter (2001) Windows, PlayStation 2
Star Wars: Starfighter Special Edition (2001) Xbox
Star Wars: Super Bombad Racing (2001) PlayStation 2
Star Wars: Galactic Battlegrounds (2001) Windows, Mac

2002:

Star Wars: The Clone Wars (2002) (Action) PlayStation 2, Nintendo GameCube, Xbox
Star Wars: Episode II \u2013 Attack of the Clones (2002) - Game Boy Advance
Star Wars: The New Droid Army (2002) - Game Boy Advance
Star Wars: Jedi Starfighter (2002) Xbox, PlayStation 2
Star Wars Jedi Knight II: Jedi Outcast (2002) Windows, Mac, Xbox, Nintendo GameCube
Star Wars Racer Revenge (2002) PlayStation 2
Star Wars: Galactic Battlegrounds: Clone Campaigns (2002) Windows, Mac
Star Wars: Bounty Hunter (2002) (Third person action) GameCube, PlayStation 2

2003:

Star Wars Rogue Squadron III: Rebel Strike (2003) Nintendo GameCube
Star Wars: Starfighter (2003) Arcade[2]
Star Wars Jedi Knight: Jedi Academy (2003) Windows, Mac, Xbox
Star Wars: Knights of the Old Republic (2003) Windows, Xbox, Mac, iOS, Android
Star Wars Galaxies: An Empire Divided (2003) Windows
Star Wars: Flight of the Falcon (2003) (Action/Space simulation) Game Boy Advance \u2013 set during the time of episodes IV through VI.

2004:

Star Wars: Battlefront (2004) PlayStation 2, Windows, Xbox, Mac
Star Wars Galaxies: Jump to Lightspeed (2004) Windows
Star Wars Trilogy: Apprentice of the Force (2004) Game Boy Advance \u2013 set during the time of episodes IV through VI.

2005:

Star Wars: Episode III \u2013 Revenge of the Sith (2005) - PlayStation 2, Game Boy Advance, Xbox, Nintendo DS
Star Wars: Revenge of the Sith (2005) - Jakks Pacific TV Game
Star Wars: Battlefront II (2005) PlayStation 2, Windows, Xbox, PlayStation Portable
Star Wars: Knights of the Old Republic II: The Sith Lords (2005) Windows, Xbox, Mac
Star Wars Galaxies: Episode III Rage of the Wookiees (2005) Windows
Star Wars Galaxies: The Total Experience (2005) Windows
Star Wars Galaxies: Trials of Obi-Wan (2005) Windows
Star Wars Galaxies: Starter Kit (2005) Windows
Lego Star Wars: The Video Game (2005) Windows, PlayStation 2, Xbox, Nintendo GameCube, Game Boy Advance, Mac
Star Wars: Republic Commando (2005) (First person shooter) Xbox, Windows
Star Wars: Battlefront Mobile (2005)[4]
Star Wars: Battle For The Republic (2005)[5]
Star Wars: Grievous Getaway (2005)[6]
Star Wars Imperial Ace 3D
Star Wars: The Battle Above Coruscant (2005)[5]
Star Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith (2005)[7]
Star Wars: Republic Commando: Order 66 (2005)[8]
Star Wars: Lightsaber Combat (2005)[9]
Star Wars Trivia (2005)[10]
Star Wars: Ask Yoda (2005)[11]
Star Wars: Jedi Arena (2005)[12]
Star Wars: Puzzle Blaster (2005)[13]
Star Wars: Jedi Assassin (2005)
Star Wars: Lightsaber Battle Game (2005) Handheld TV game \u2013 set throughout the entire saga

2006:

Star Wars GameKey (expansion) (2006)
Star Wars Galaxies: The Complete Online Adventures (2006) Windows
Lego Star Wars II: The Original Trilogy (2006) Windows, PlayStation 2, PlayStation Portable, Xbox, Xbox 360, Nintendo GameCube, Nintendo DS, Game Boy Advance, Mac
Star Wars: The Best of PC (2006) (Compilation) Windows
Star Wars: Lethal Alliance (2006) (Action-adventure) PlayStation Portable, Nintendo DS \u2013 set between episodes III &amp; IV
Star Wars: Empire at War (2006) Windows, Mac OS X
Star Wars: Empire at War: Forces of Corruption (expansion) (2006) Windows

2007:

Star Wars Battlefront: Renegade Squadron (2007) PlayStation Portable
Lego Star Wars: The Complete Saga (2007) Windows, PlayStation 3, Xbox 360, Nintendo DS, Wii, Mac, iOS, Android
Star Wars: Empire at War: Gold Pack (game and expansion package) (2007) Windows
Star Wars: Original Trilogy (2007) Jakks Pacific TV Game

2008:

Star Wars: The Clone Wars \u2013 Lightsaber Duels (2008) - Wii
Star Wars: The Clone Wars \u2013 Jedi Alliance (2008) - Nintendo DS
Star Wars: The Force Unleashed (2008) Windows, Mac OS, Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, PlayStation 2, PlayStation Portable, Wii, Nintendo DS, iPhone OS
Star Wars: The Force Unleashed Mobile (2008)
Sharpshooter Clone Training (2008)
Live Fire (2008)
Star Wars: Jedi Math (2008) (Educational) Leapster
Star Wars: Jedi Reading (2008) (Educational) Leapster
Star Wars: The Clone Wars (2008) (Platform/Educational) Didj

2009:

Star Wars: Trench Run (2009) - iOS, Unity
Star Wars: The Clone Wars \u2013 Republic Heroes (2009) - Windows, PlayStation 2, Nintendo DS, PlayStation Portable/PlayStation Vita, Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, Wii
Star Wars Battlefront: Elite Squadron (2009) PlayStation Portable, Nintendo DS
Star Wars: The Force Unleashed - Ultimate Sith Edition (2009) Windows, Mac OS, Xbox 360, PlayStation 3
Lego Star Wars: The Quest for R2-D2 (2009) Unity[3]
Star Wars Battlefront: Mobile Squadrons (2009)[14]
Star Wars: Jedi Trials (2009) Didj
Star Wars: Republic Squadron (2009) Jakks Pacific TV Game

2010:

Star Wars Arcade: Falcon Gunner (2010) - iOS
Clone Wars Adventures (2010) - Windows, Mac
Star Wars: Knights of the Old Republic III (2010) Windows, Xbox (Cancelled)
Star Wars: The Force Unleashed II (2010) Windows, Wii, Nintendo DS, Xbox 360, PlayStation 3, iPhone OS
Star Wars Cantina (2010)[15]
Star Wars Battle of Hoth (2010)[16]
Star Wars Arcade: Falcon Gunner (2010)[17]

2011:

Star Wars: The Old Republic (2011) (MMORPG) Windows
Lego Star Wars III: The Clone Wars (2011) PlayStation 3, Xbox 360, Nintendo DS, Nintendo 3DS, Wii, PlayStation Portable, Windows, Mac
Star Wars: Imperial Academy (2011)

2012:

Kinect Star Wars (2012) (Kinect) Xbox 360
Angry Birds Star Wars (2012)

2013:

Star Wars Episode IV: A New Hope (2013) - multiplatform pinball video game
Star Wars Episode V: The Empire Strikes Back (2013) - multiplatform pinball video game [1]
Star Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi (2013) - multiplatform pinball video game [1]
Star Wars: The Clone Wars (2013) - Multi-platform pinball game[1]
Rise of the Hutt Cartel (expansion pack) (2013)
Lego Star Wars: The Yoda Chronicles (2013) Android, iOS
Star Wars Pinball (2013) Windows, Mac, Wii U, Xbox 360, 3DS, PSVita, PlayStation 3, PlayStation 4, Kindle Fire, Android, iOS

Star Wars Pinball: The Empire Strikes Back
Star Wars Pinball: The Clone Wars
Star Wars Pinball: Boba Fett
Star Wars Pinball: Balance of the Force (2013) Xbox 360, PSVita, PlayStation 3, PlayStation 4, Android, iOS
Star Wars Pinball: Return of the Jedi
Star Wars Pinball: Darth Vader
Star Wars Pinball: Starfighter Assault
Star Wars 1313 (2013) (Action-adventure) (Cancelled)
Star Wars: First Assault (2013) (First-person shooter) (Cancelled)
Angry Birds Star Wars II (2013)
Star Wars Knights Of The Old Republic (2013)
Lego Star Wars: The Complete Saga (2013)
Lego Star Wars: The Yoda Chronicles (2013)
Star Wars: Force Collection (2013)[18]
Star Wars: Tiny Death Star (2013)

2014:

Galactic Starfighter (expansion pack) (2014)
Galactic Strongholds (expansion pack) (2014)
Shadow of Revan (expansion pack) (2014)
Star Wars Pinball: Heroes of the Force (2014) Xbox 360, PSVita, PS3, PS4, Android, iOS
Star Wars Pinball: Masters of the Force
Star Wars Pinball: A New Hope
Star Wars Pinball: Droids
Star Wars Pinball: Han Solo
Star Wars: Attack Squadrons (2014) (Cancelled)
Star Wars: Assault Team (2014)[19]
Star Wars: Commander (0 BBY) - Android, iOS, Windows Phone (2014) [20]
Star Wars: Galactic Defense (32 BBY-4 ABY) - Android, iOS (2014). Spans the Rise of the Empire Era and the Rebellion Era.
Journeys: The Phantom Menace (32 BBY) - iOS (2014)
Journeys: Beginnings (32 BBY-19 BBY) - iOS (2014)
Star Wars Rebels: Ghost Raid (5 BBY) - StarWars.com, Disney.com (2014)
Star Wars Rebels: Rebel Strike (5 BBY) - Disney.com (2014)

2015:

Knights of the Fallen Empire (expansion pack) (2015)
Star Wars: Battle Pod (2015) (Rail shooter) Arcade \u2013 set during the time of episodes IV through VI
Disney Infinity 3.0 (2015) (Action-adventure, sandbox) Microsoft Windows, PlayStation 3, PlayStation 4, Xbox 360, Xbox One, Wii U, iOS, Android
Star Wars: Galaxy of Heroes (32 BBY-4 ABY) - Android, iOS (2015). Spans the Rise of the Empire Era, Rebellion Era, and the Era of the New Republic.
Star Wars: Uprising (Between 4 ABY and 34 ABY) - Android, iOS (2015)
Star Wars: Heroes Path (0 BBY) - iOS (2015)
Star Wars Rebels: Recon Missions (5 BBY) - Android, iOS, Windows Phone (2015)
Star Wars Battlefront (2015)

2016:

Untitled BioWare Star Wars Game
Untitled Visceral Games Star Wars Gamehttps://www.reddit.com/r/StarWars/comments/3oebzm/in_defense_of_the_star_wars_prequels_let_go_of/cvwknfgI saw a lot of tactical application on BF and a lot of voice chat team work. But part of the lack of structure was the fun, not just random arcade shooting.I never saw that on the PC version.I mean... they didn't really have an AAA budget for development, with one it may have been different.

It's my biggest concern about Cyberpunk 2077.Maybe you played the Xbox version?It had about 44 - 49 million in actual production of the game. That's also very low for a high-end RPG, look at the scales.I think it would, because it was extremely low for production of an actual RPG, even if that was just 100,000,000 development, basically 2x larger, If eel the game would have had the polish and design it really needed.Is this your signature? Doesn't look like it to me!Would you like to know more?The pod claim mode got repetitive real quick though sadly and had very little differentiation.You may need to go back to school, that's not "the first thing", that's more than one.Dogs aren't commodities. You don't kill one just to fit in another. You are a terrible person.It's listed as the sequel though if you dig into it.Booby trapping something would result in a nasty lawsuit and possibly criminal charges. I would not risk it.It is a pumpkin... Who in heavens honestly expects tetanus from a pumpkin?I actually used the word propensity until I saw massive vote trolls bent up on my comments. But no, however all the browser, phone, and majority of games were.On that site yes, but on Wikipedia it lists it as sequel and on other sites other things.Yeah no way should that happen. As a person studying accounting and having learned the tax code, that is insane. There are by far thousands of useless parts of the code that don't help anyone but corporations selfishly.To be honest people seem entirely unaware that when the tax law itself is actually created or modified that the people advising them are.. corporate lobbyists.That won't fly with an attorney.The Republic Commando series by Karen Traviss was definitely unique and fleshed out the clones and troopers and Mandalorians but that seems to have directly been retconned by the Clone Wars TV series. Order 66 likewise seems retconned.... That is more of a cheap insult than anything else.

Try scotch and cigars.We should be hating the government, instead we hate people who want the government to do something.. The whole conservative / pro-rich mindset needs to stop.Then the banker loses all the cookies.No, no don't even do that. Don't even skew or distort like that.

Corporations are the people influencing the lines. Lobbyists are in every facet of leadership influence. They even lobby the tax committees.No, that's news, they're also anti police, and anti logic.Never heard anyone say that about Call of Duty.. have heard a lot towards Counterstrike because of its unrealism and poor balance and community. Battlefield? Perhaps the older ones,t he newer ones require repetitive grinding.

Unreal Tournament wasn't that difficult to be honest.

I'd say casual just means that everything seems overly scripted during multiplayer, like background funneling.You realize that's 100% right?

And they also have influence over numerous policies and committees and even the tax code.Wait... recess is gone?Power rangers has been around for a while and is still current today as they have so many series.Peeing in a urinal.So it's not just me? :)Financial aid.No you really can't.You forget about endowments and the class divide.There are indeed benefits not related to being smart for going there.The job creation metrics are not nearly as.. valid as the proponents try to make it seem. A big company moving in does create jobs but there are costs."expansion packs"

I believe you meant map-pack / dlc.... .... .....

WHAT DOES THIS HAVE TO DO WITH MODERN BLACK OPS 3?

I actually wondered if we'd get a high-end modern zombies game but nope.

Ah well, here's my cash.Well you're supposed to use a wingsuit while skydiving so.. perhaps you need to jump higher.Orwell's world is real but Huxley keeps us from seeing it. There, both at the same time. Also we're Orwell to everyone else and Huxley to ourselves. We even recognize it.Just be sure you check his numbers before believing them. As always, things aren't what people say.Sarah Palin doesn't follow Christianity, she simply calls herself a Christian.

Evangelical: "of or according to the teaching of the gospel or the Christian religion."

I'm non-denominational, but we all focus on the gospel of Jesus.The bible determines that, and she's taken actions and shown no repentance towards them which make it clear she's not actively portraying herself as a Christian.

That's not uncommon. She's entirely bought and paid for.What you're doing is what politicians do--tell me what I'm apparently saying even though I'm the one saying it.

Corporations are not innocent, they are the ones corrupting the lines. Likewise, they're the ones taking advantage of it.

The people that let them do that? They too are to blame but it's impossible to know if anyone could truly resist all that for long.Perhaps /u/Stevemlutz is already at the bottom and so has no idea what could be beneath him.
... OR he is so rich that he can't fathom the poor.But now it's Judy's turn to cry Judy's turn to cry Judy's to cry......ii..y..... because.. Johnny's come back.. to ME!So where's your post trilogy?That's intentional. It's easy to have "good for nothing people that did nothing to get rich" and to hate them. It's a trap. Hate won't change them and it's the hate that makes people like them.But he'll be refuse the offer, then the next person will work a bit and then leave and then finally Abrams will come by. I get it.Just because it's impossible to know doesn't mean it's "okay". The lobbyists are specifically being paid to do such a job. The politicians are being paid to run the government and still allowing a conflict of interest. The majority of the "legal ways" are made legal due to lobbyists allowing them to be. Further the legal ways used to be illegal.

If you are the one defining the confines of the law and you are just a corporation or a group of corporations, then you are not following the law.Actually, certain wolves started not being aggressive due to food hunger and were rewarded with food or shelter or both, in time prior to any breeding occurred, the animals protected us from other wolves that did not get the shelter or food. In time we then bred these and they became many years later the first "dogs".

But without them we may never have lasted against all the wolves.Lol. That's not the banker that's a receptionist.. It's a phone call, and the banker claimed the cookies as collateral and then reinvested them.That was more regular zombie survival. No assault mechs versus zombies. Also the game had issues.There's only one guard? Ehh extraordinary circumstances. File a tax return deduction and deduct the cost of the new queen.WARNING: IMMEDIATE COLLISION DETECTED!

Analyzing wealth level of occupants:

Poor... Slave... Medium... High... RICH!

RICH OCCUPANTS DETECTED!
GLOBAL EMERGENCY!
PRIME MANDATE: IMPORTANT PEOPLE MUST BE PRESERVED AT ALL COSTS

- Running through possible options... FOUND

- Initiating Protocols...
...
...
...
...
- SOLUTION FOUND, CALLING FOR EMERGENCY GRAVITY TETHERS

*Sixteen [the entire counties worth of emergency vehicles mind you] gravity tether equipped vehicles arrive and reduce the craft to a coasting stop*That was never our situation in Michigan.Though we're too poor to give it.They don't know laws surrounding corporate tax either, there's a lot of... sneakiness.Title could be reworked to be honest, but he's very cute!The problem here is that your message should be heard, but you're on a vocal minority website. Honestly you'd need the whole of reddit to make a movement like that even get noticed by the majority offline.It might not be my thing but I'll admit it'd be a strange world if everyone wanted and agreed with me.. though it'd probably be better by quite a bit too..This is more something you ask r science and then read up on what you hear for a few days. This is not something you just take because you see it typed on a random sub.Well the same thing happens when police patrol streets or are on the beat. Statistically people commit less crimes and feel more secure. It's all the concept of someone watching.No. You were distorting, skewing, misrepresenting statements, and overall trying to cause a problem. It screams out from your words. A bit sickening.

There are issues. Whether it's the minority or the majority is impossible to tell with what limited info we have and you sure won't find the truth on this highly bias and misrepresenting sub called news, or in reddit at all unless it's something scientific in a particular sub.

You use the word murder for instance but we all know that officers have to take down criminals and that doesn't mean it's always a murder. You highlight terms just to antagonize and cause problems.

Right now we can't make any progress so long as you keep holding us back from a discourse reasonably.There are problems yes. But if we take your tone to the task and we distort and misrepresent and antagonize like you are, we will only push them further and further together and you will only be reinforcing that which you hate.

From now on, only state things in an unemotional context regarding this subject. Only refer to points or information that you've posted as a citation and has been properly vetted. Only mention research articles and valid criteria such as that, and of course.. divorce yourself of the antagonistic terms.
Misusing all those terms, skewing, distorting, sarcasm.

Is this your own personal sub? Because that's why everyone off this sub knows not to believe anything at face value posted in News. It's literally the laughing stock of reddit because.. well there's so little facts here. The majority of top posts are just as distorted as yours as are the comments and the information doesn't line up.

Let's say there are.. 30 million officers i